



Aixtron Cash Flow Statement, Quarterly, 2016 Q3, 2016 Q2 - Amigobulls































Home > Aixtron stock quote > AIXTRON SE (ADR) Cashflow Statement - Quarterly 
  


   
Aixtron Cash Flow - Quarterly (NASDAQ:AIXG)


Add to My Stocks






$3.06 $0 (0%) AIXG stock closing price Jan 02, 2017 (Closing)


 


The Aixtron cash flow statement is one of the three reports that the company generates every quarter.  In simple terms, the cash flow statement measures the cash that has come into the company, and the cash that has gone out during a given period, while the other statements, the income statement and balance sheet, give details about Aixtron profits and Aixtron debt.  Aixtron cash flow analysis is possible because this statement breaks down how balance sheet accounts and income statement items affect cash and cash equivalents.  Aixtron had cash and cash equivalents of $222.59M at the beginning of the quarter and $131.02M at quarter end for 2016-Q3.   The cash from operating activities for Aixtron is $-39.05M for 2016-Q3, which saw an increase of -11.95% from previous quarter.   View details of Aixtron cash flows for latest & last 40 quarters. 
show more



INCOME-STATEMENT
BALANCE-SHEET
CASH-FLOW



AnnualQuarterly View Previous Quarters
View Next Quarters

 Download



Fiscal year is Jan - Dec.2016 Q32016 Q22016 Q12015 Q42015 Q32015 Q22015 Q12014 Q42014 Q3Aixtron Net Income Cash Flow-33.9M-30.07M-17.13M-32.37M-30.33M-30.49M-10.68M-83.09M-57.53MDepreciation Depletion Amortization Cash-Flow9.99M6.69M3.29M11.49M8.44M5.44M2.64M22.59M15.88MNet Increase (Decrease) in Assets Liabilities-16.14M-21.93M-8.35M-32.14M5.39M----Cash From (used in) Discontinued Operations---------Other Adjustments Net0.99M0.96M0.8M2.33M1.42M17.98M-3.36M15.59M-16.21MAixtron Net Cash from (used by) Operating Activities-39.05M-44.35M-21.38M-50.68M-15.07M-7.06M-11.4M-44.9M-57.87MIncrease (Decrease) in Prop Plant And Equipment-2.95M-1.64M-0.84M-13.72M-10.77M-7.74M-3.86M-16.77M-11.95MAcquisition Disposition of Subsidiaires-4.66M-4.72M-4.61M-6.89M-6.98M24.87M---Increase (Decrease) in Investments--------20.45MOther Cash Inflow (Outflow) from Investment Activities51.52M36.23M13.31M66.39M30.11M-7.24M16.67M-14.05M-0.41MAixtron Net Cash from (used by) Invesment Activities43.9M29.86M7.85M45.77M12.35M9.88M12.8M-30.83M8.08MIssuance (Purchase) of Equity Shares0.31M0.07M--0.16M-0.18M-0.21M-0.25M-0.11MIssuance (Repayment) of Debt Securities---------Increase (Decrease) in Bank & Other Borrowings---------Payment of Dividends & Other Cash Distributions---------Other Cash from (used by) Financing Activities------0.03M--Aixtron Net Cash from (used by) Financing Activities0.31M0.07M--0.16M-0.18M-0.21M0.03M0.25M-0.11MEffect of Exchange Rate Changes on Cash-3.93M-2.94M-2.97M4.77M3.87M5.73M6.94M7.85M6.84MAixtron Net Change in Cash & Cash Equivalents1.22M-17.36M-16.5M-0.3M0.97M8.34M8.38M-67.62M-43.06MCash & Equivalents at Beginning of Year222.59M132.47M222.35M253.65M372.39M94.08M105.82M64.09M39.48MCash & Equivalents at Year End131.02M114.01M111.79M129.14M130.69M137.3M139.97M154.97M179.13M 
All figures in USD. M: Millions of USD, B: Billions of USD.
    
View Previous Quarters
View Next Quarters





			Get Cash flow for another ticker
			







 











ACLS


















Watch Our Axcelis Stock Analysis Video  - 2.8/5










 


  


 


		Download Aixtron cash-flow for the last 40 quarters (Excel csv format) absolutely FREE!	




					Click here to view our Google financial analysis, Amazon financial analysis, Facebook financial analysis



    

While Aixtron stock price history provides the price history of a stock, Aixtron stock comparison chart shows the same in comparison to peers, and cash flow statements provide cash position of the company.  Common terms used in the statement of cash flows are: Aixtron had a Net Change in Cash and Cash Equivalents of $1.22M for the latest quarter 2016-Q3.  If a firm is able to grow its cash, it is considered to be a positive signal and could lead to a jump in the Aixtron stock price , albeit too much cash on hand can imply the company has no or limited avenues for growth in which to invest this cash.  Cash Flow from operating activities: Aixtron reported a negative operating cash flow of $-39.05M for 2016-Q3 and has seen an increase from the previous quarter.  Operating cash flow or working capital comes from main business activities.  Investors look for positive cash flow from recurring operating activities.  Cash Flow from investment activities: This includes buying/selling of land and equipment, acquisitions and mergers, sell-off, investment in other companies like buying bonds, stocks etc. , and was $-39.05M for AIXG in last quarter report.   Cash Flow from financing activities: Financing activities include the cash that comes into a company in the form of loans or interest earned or shareholders money, as well as the cash that goes out.  Aixtron earned $0.24M from financing activities,in the form of repayment of loans or interest paid, dividend pay-out to shareholders etc.  . 


    

Quarterly Cash Flow Statements For AIXTRON SE (ADR) Peers
Axcelis cash flow,  Applied Materials cash flow,  ASM International cash flow,  Cohu cash flow,  Veeco Instruments cash flow, Aixtron historical stock prices, Aixtron stock comparison chart    






























AIXNY Conversations | AIXTRON SE SPONS ADR EA REP 1 O - Yahoo FinanceHomeMailNewsSportsFinanceCelebrityStyleMoviesWeatherAnswersFlickrMobileYahooSearchSearch0Canadian Markets close in 4 hrs 33 minsS&P/TSX15,271.57+5.94 (+0.04%)S&P 5002,472.75-4.82 (-0.19%)DOW22,019.63+3.39 (+0.02%)Market NewsGoldman Sachs buys into Aramco $10 billion loan as it seeks IPO roleAramco plans to raise $100 billion through the listing of five percent of the company.Aixtron SE (AIXNY)Other OTC - Other OTC Delayed Price. Currency in USDAdd to watchlist6.64-0.24 (-3.45%)As of  3:08PM EDT. Market open.SummaryConversationsStatisticsProfileFinancialsOptionsHoldersHistorical DataAnalysts424 reactions on $AIXNY conversationSign in to post a message.Top Reactionsrrobert sPaul Joseph Watson - Reporting for Infowars/Prison Planet The mainstream media is completely blacklisting any mention of the bombshell revelations by investigative reporter Seymour Hersh about murdered DNC staffer Seth Rich, in which Hersh explained how Rich was Wikileaks’ source for the DNC leak and how the “Russian hacking” story was completely concocted by former CIA director John Brennan.In an audio tape obtained by Big League Politics, Hersh says he saw an FBI report leaked to him by an insider which confirms that Rich had contacted Wikileaks with sample emails from the DNC leak and asked for payment for the full data dump.“All I know is that he offered a sample, an extensive sample, I’m sure dozens of emails, and said ‘I want money.’ Later, WikiLeaks did get the password, he had a DropBox, a protected DropBox,” he said. They got access to the DropBox,” added Hersh.The Pulitzer Prize-winning author said Seth Rich first contacted Wikileaks in late Spring of last year and that the DNC later tried to cover up the truth by inventing the story that Russia had hacked their systems and that this was part of a disinformation operation overseen by former CIA director John Brennan.Although he thinks Rich’s murder was a robbery gone wrong, Hersh acknowledges that the former DNC staffer was concerned for his safety.“The word was passed, according to the NSA report, he also shared this DropBox with a couple of friends, so that ‘if anything happens to me it’s not going to solve your problems,’” said Hersh. “WikiLeaks got access before he was killed.”Almost 24 hours after this bombshell story and not one single mainstream media outlet has covered the issue, despite a Wikileaks tweet of the Hersh audio receiving over 4,000 retweets.In contrast, virtually every MSM outlet in existence offered breathless coverage to yesterday’s claims that President Trump was personally involved in helping craft a “fake news” story that Seth Rich was killed as retribution for him leaking the DNC emails in order to “divert attention away from the ongoing Russia investigation.”The nature of both stories is exactly the same – they are both based on unproven claims, although Hersh’s claims seem more credible given his reputation, yet the media has chosen to elevate one story and completely ignore the other.It’s almost like huge media corporations have an agenda to only push a narrative that damages Donald Trump and bolsters the narrative that Russia interfered in the presidential election while burying the truth about Seth Rich’s role in the DNC leak.Surely notPaul Joseph Watson is the editor at large of Infowars.com and Prison Planet.com.MorePaul Joseph WatsonPaul Joseph Watson is on Facebook. Join Facebook to connect with Paul Joseph Watson and others you may know. Facebook gives people the power to share and makes the world more open and connected.www.facebook.comReplyReplies (1)00rrobert sRecent guests from Germany and their knowledge of who's who and what;s going on here in the states was  impressive to say the least ...Perhaps too impressive Perhaps coincidence our German guests would find this  inn ;-))I asked his thoughts concerning  Angela Merkel Response The elections are a few months from now before we'll know A polite way of saying none of my business When asked his opinion concerning more sanctions on RussiaNot a good idea When asked about arming and militarizing the Ukraine ....A very bad idea I wasn't surprised in the least that our guest was well aware of MJ12 as well as the Bush/Clinton crime families His questions : What do you think of President Trump ?  Do you think he can stop them ? When our guest was asked his opinion about  a civil war in Europe ?He politely was non committal I will say this, besides having a command  of our language our German guest was one smart cookie PS The Aixtron matter, its miniature Aachen facility, Osram or White & Co.,  were  not discussed Was it suppose to be ? Although I believe our guest had knowledge of all  the aforementioned related matters  , My personal preference is  to continue to opine,upon  related "Deep Thoughts,"  without favor, , concerning matters unseen to the eye  vs  what is  visible at the surfaceMoreReply00rrobert sEstimated Chinese Gold Reserves Surpass 20,000tby BullionStar - Jul 31, 2017 6:57 AMMy best estimate for above ground gold reserves within China is 20,193 tonnes. 16,193 tonnes held by the citizenry, 4,000 tonnes held by the PBOC.BRICS { Brazil, Russia, India, China, S. Africa} appear to have plans for a gold standard monetary system ?I guess, they haven't heard we have a regiment of both armor and ground troops stationed at Fort Knox to mow the lawn I wonder how The Texas gold depository is fairing soliciting new accounts from  their  rival the New York Federal Reserve depository ? I also wonder if some of the New York R"ederal Depository' customers confronted some of problems the European sovereignty'  experienced ? Maybe Texas will take bit coins vs hard currency in lieu ....::-))))MoreReply00rrobert sIn the era of a high altitude atmospheric EMP blast ,literally  frying  most if not all of their republic' electric grid and machinery, ,And the,  there is HAARP  {The Harmonics weapon system } better known as the weather machine , which begs to ask, what surface nuclear reactor is safe ...Perhaps the weather disasters that befell TEPCO; Fukushima nuclear facilities a clue TEPCO et-alia still do NOT have control of this facility's leakage nor found the core melted reactor[s]  to date A prudent solution would have been converting  all reactors to fusion vs today's fission facilities  As to the rad hardened deep underground facilities ...you can bet all their operational facilities are powered by fusion vs fission As to our defense budget that surpasses the collective military budgets of  9 of this planet ' largest military budgets, Any guesses as to how much this republic' tax payers monies HAVE BEEN AND ARE  being diverted to these underground cities as well as the special ops and troops required to man some 67 of these  rumored rad hardened facilities In addition, to the aforementioned one has to factor DARPA both their payroll and related r&d functions and facilities Reminiscent of President Carter, one of Adm. Rickover's hand picked  Annapolis grad's,  to serve as one of his officers on board one of  his nuclear sub;s  The irony, when President Carter asked his CIA director, one George HW Bush, if he could visit one of these subterranean rad hardened facilities , Bush's response was essentially to telling President Carter, "Need to know Mr President" Although Carter was eminently qualified to review and understand these facilities , I suspect, Carter , a man of faith, would have trouble rationalizing what and who he would see and witness  at one of these facilities I suspect President Trump would have the same problem with the who and what is there as well I use to have to use small words to explain matters to Rocket T Squirrel's pet doggy Most of our large  viewing audience knew from the onset, what I was saying or attempting to relate subsequent to my return from  my extended hiatus " I walk through the valley of the shadow of death, I fear no evil for He is with me " I do pray that The Divine Hand of Providence gives  our President guidance and  protects him from the sons of darknessMoreReplyReplies (1)00rrobert sGeneral J.F.Kelly in and Priebus out as President Trump's chief of staff In a very short Time span Kelly had boots on the ground and operational with espirt de corp among his hard chargers at the border I think President Trump and his inner circle made a wise decision in selecting General Kelly and his council on matters concerning the military complex,/shadow government and their DC proxies including but not limited to the neocons,  The Thule cabal, and related subversive activities I pray Our Lord will continue to protect His man from harm, against the sons of darkness, their minions  and related  malevolent interlopersMoreReply00rrobert ssuspect  Jeff Flake and John McCain have both sampled Genus' purified water treatment   process at Apache Wells, Sidona  and Chandler ....lucky guess If memory serves Genus International was a creation with origins in Sidona via Wyoming It;s  understandable if one confuses Cerberus,. the 3 headed demon dog that guards Hades,  with other related  minions of lucifer or two of the lesser demons Baal and Moloch ,,,,As to the malevolent goddess Isis , who has more names than Carter has liver pills,  most would be more familiar with her Babylonian name Our Lord, The Creator, He Who Sits Highest, knows em all Vanquished to this  prison planet,  I suspect , to reevaluate their former ways and their jealousy  of Our Lord's human creations,, they deemed to be inferior to themselves ?Vengeance is Mine So Saith The Lord The good news, this humble servant of The Lord of Hosts will not be idle in my real life service for  Our Lord , balancing His  booksMoreReply00rrobert sSince CFIUS interceded, and stopped the sale of Genus Inc' sensitive US water shed patents @ 1139 Karlstad Drive, Sunnyvale,, Ca with  the reverse co.  Aixtron and its actions to transfer said sensitive technology to China , who or what is injecting helium into Aixtron and their Aachen mini facility ? Highly unlikely MJ12 and DARPA were happy with the aforementioned planned transfer I suspect the  real principals of the Carlyle Group,, Langley The Co.,, related representatives of MI6 and Illuminati were duly notified of the shadow government; displeasure over this potential SNAFU ...Could the run up in Aixtron' pps be part of  a punitive punishment .for those culpable  in  attempting to transfer the Genus Inc. assets without the authority to do so? I have little doubt Rocket T Squirrel  and his proxies would have been quite content to sit  on the Genus Inc eggs to keep them warm and related created Aixtron  nest I may have omitted specific names , like Mr Peeper's the pedophile, and those names and associations heavy into the trafficking of narcotics and armaments business As to their real  boss, aka the  big pest, and his signature  to  this matter,, I suspect, a reminder that he will be an interested party and in  attendance at my last virtual task for My Father., The Lord of Hosts and Sons of LightMoreReply00rrobert sTrump is threatening to withdraw all US forces from Afghanistan after 17 years,  following recent a nspector General's reports connecting the US opium pandemic to the poppy fields of Afghanistan Trump to bump heads with Mr Poppy, senior alumni of Iran Contra , rogue CIA,operatives,and I suspect the military complex, specifically MJ12 It's a shame that Cynthia McKinney {D} former rep from Georgia isn't around ...One of the few with the courage to stand up to Mr Poppy  and CIA' nefarious operations ....Naturally  the "K" Street lobby labeled Dr McKinney as a nut rather than a patriot I have no doubt Dr McKinney would  break from her former party's congressional puppet peers  to  assist President Trump to confront these traitorous cockroaches .....I remember her fondly as the  spite fire who spoke her mind on  the Congressional floor fore warning people of this republic of ominous enemies of the state that  the deep state couldn't shut up "When the people find out what we have done, they'll hang us from the nearest lamp post " Quite sure your boss, Lucifer, will have little trouble replacing one cockroach with  another Our Lord's Day, the day of reckoning for the unclean and disobedient , will meet Our Creator's Wrath and His Judgment Count on this humble servant of The Lord of Hosts to expedite your black souls to your waiting  millennium residency To our ;large viewing audience When my virtual life is taken subsequent to completing my last virtual task for MY Father,  my real life in the service of Our The Creator begins I have one order and only one order from MY Father when my feet touch the field of battle....ATTACK the black souls before me,  I am to vanquish .... On that day, Vengenance is Mine So Saith Our Lord I never argue with My Father's Plan and His Will ....It is my plan, as one of His humble servants,  not to let Him downMoreReply00rrobert sEU Prepared to Retaliate Against Russia Sanctions Being Prepared By US CongressSanctions bill could fray US-Russia-EU relationsMost of the EU leaders  are already in the pockets of the  sons of darkness, their minions, malevolent interlopers,  aka NWO So, what nation if this insanity continues will be isolated ?Europe? Russia? Or the USA ? Are not these events referenced in Our Lord's Prophecies as the seven horns? Also, I couldn't find any reference to Mr Putin having a semite blood line Which brings up the question who other than Mr Putin, with semite linage,   would fit that description of  lead of the northern hordes   It would appear both Putin and Trump are obstacles,  standing in the way of Lucifer, his minions,, the chief prince of the north,  the antichrist and their NWO .I now wonder based on the stench people associated with Obama have discussed, if it was a scavenger or something MOOR? Perhaps an entity more closely related to one of the malevolent ancient Egyptians ? I have a bad feeling about this Obama entity ......or what ever his true name is ?Nor do I believe his present hiatus will be a permanent oneMoreReply00rrobert sPaul Ryan Defends Robert Mueller: ‘Anything But’ a ‘Biased Partisan’This  Never Trump chap,is one of 6 known republicans who took campaign contributions form George Soros He sits and waits in third place for Trump and Pence to fall victims to the shadow gov'ts witch hunt Certainly a preferred and easier lackey to control by  the shadow gov't  than a  Trump and Pence,  who serve the people of this republic or have tried to I was always leery of Ryan ....With his latest endorsement of Mueller and related shadow government operations to discredit Trump and Pence administration at all costs,  he confirmed my worst suspicions of him .......He obviously cares less how he becomes president or what he has to do for the shadow gov;t to be president ....Hillary Clinton in drag ..MoreReply00rrobert sExcerpts from Hedge Fund Zero ..article ;;;The man behind the "Dossier" ..........""....Ex-British spy Christopher Steele was the author of the Trump Dossier, which FusionGPS put together as opposition research by Trump political opponents in 2016In any case, Simpson's attorneys asked that their client be excused from appearing, adding that allegations he had failed to register as a foreign agent were "nothing more than an effort to smear him."  The lawyers also said that they were "profoundly disturbed" that the hearing had been expanded due to "partisan agendas" to include allegations of Russian meddling in the U.S. election and possible ties between the Trump campaign and Russia. The letter also said they were prepared to fight a subpoena and invoke Mr. Simpson’s constitutional right not to give testimony if compelled to appear.According to the WSJ, the letter explaining Simpson’s refusal to appear cites his obligations to keep his client information confidential and his First Amendment right under the Constitution to engage in political speech and political activity, as well as his Fifth Amendment reight to refuse self-incriminating testimony, also known as the "I admit I am guilty" option.His gambit did not work however, and late on Friday the Committee issued a subpoena to compel Simpson to testify next Wednesday.Committee Chairman Chuck Grassley and the committee’s top Democrat, Dianne Feinstein, in a joint statement said: “Glenn Simpson, through his attorney, has declined to voluntarily attend Wednesday’s Judiciary Committee hearing regarding compliance with the Foreign Agents Registration Act. Therefore, a subpoena has been issued to compel his attendance. Simpson’s attorney has asserted that his client will invoke his Fifth Amendment rights in response to the subpoena.”Yet while the vacation-challenged Simpson is afraid of revealing the true identity of his "client(s)" who commission the Trump smear piece, also on Wednesday appearing in the Senate will be Donald Trump Jr. and Paul Manafort, along with Russia sanctions activist and businessman Bill Browder. The Judiciary Committee said Messrs. Trump Jr. and Manafort are providing documents to the committee and are still negotiating the terms of their testimonies.As the WSJ adds, in addition to the dossier compiled on Trump, Grassley has alleged that Simpson’s firm has worked with a Russian-American lobbyist on a campaign against a package of Russian sanctions that was being considered by Congress. That lobbyist was present in a meeting in Trump Tower in June 2016 with the younger Mr. Trump. Grassley has raised questions about whether Simpson’s firm should have registered as a foreign agent for its work on the Russia sanctions.And while Simpson’s attorney called those questions and allegations “nothing more than an effort to smear him and his firm”, many are curious to find out just who it was that worked with Fusion GPS to launch the narrative that Trump's victory in the elections was the result of Kremlin interference."MoreReply00rrobert sNews: Bern, Berne, Berna .  Switzerland - AIXA.SW drops 0.29 {CHF}  involving 79 total traded shares To the other AIXG shareholder,  not associated with a fruit or a rock The Bern dropped the AIXA share price  0.29 [CHF} on trades of 79 shares Keep in mind the helium could be cut off at any Time Not to mention, the CERN project is in Bern...Educated guess,.will probably get what they are looking for I'll leave the latter part of the aforementioned sentence to your interpretation as to its meaning Have a nice day...MoreReply00rrobert sAIXA.DE @ $8.62 Eu to USd  conversion vs AIXNY @ $.6.64 pps trading on the US OTC = nearly a 23 % discount ?I still remember Mr Pedo transferring  some 25 to 30 million shares [controlling % in Genus Inc down the side to a MOT creation known at that Time  as FreeScale I doubt nary a one of our large viewing audience isn't familiar with the cast of characters involved and associated with Singapore Group' activities and or their European counter part Carlyle Group Certainly the Panama Papers are famiilar with the 2 surviving principals of the Carlyle Group, a chap that goes by the name of  George Soros and a few of their nefarious activities Former Congresswoman from Georgia , Cynthia McKinney, was the only politician I am aware of with a backbone and some real; #$%$ that questioned their illicit and nefarious activities vs the animated talking head puppets that refer to themselves as honorable and the peoples representatives ....The Greedy one's are easy to buy,, those with integrity can be  blackmailed or coerced  those that honor their oath or step down  rather than being coerced ...are special ...These men and women are .Honorable I believe, Cynthia McKinney was such a person ....Hard to forget the Honorable people's representatives ..MoreReplyReplies (2)00rrobert sReading a few recent articles about a horrific order that specific politicians  are known to emit These stories would certainly be in line with my experience with an ancient Egyptian scavenger, a demon if you prefer Once these scavengers posses a host, the host is referred to as vessel A host has only one light i.e their aura, vs a vessel possessed by  multiple auras I digress, the ancient scavenger who possesses the vessel  is the one that emits the the stench, specifically when they speak or act for themselves vs the vessel they possess The longer the demon  and or scavengers posseses  the vessel they will become more proactive by acting  and speaking  for themselves ....at some point the vessel has little or no control over their own body and functions  The stench and the duration of the stench associated with the vessel indicative of demon.scavenger's control of the vessel Certainly the neutrals albeit Ronin clan[s]  or tall greys are quite cognizant of these demons and scavengers PS I can't  stress enough the misery and anguish one's soul  and next life  will encounter from Our  Lord's Wrath, following Lucifer and sons of darkness .MoreReplyReplies (1)00rrobert sAIXA.SW [Switzerland} trades in Swiss Francs i.e CHF $8.41 X 1.041 {CHF} = $8.75 USdRead My Lips ...No New Taxes Did William Casey (CIA Director) really say, "We'll know our disinformation program is complete when everything the American public believes is false."? [ from his 1st staff meeting in 1981 } Mr Poppy;s favorite son & stinky witch The ancient Egyptian ...demon//scavenger controlled ? Rumor: Bows to neither the Illuminati or kisses the Black Popes ring Let's go to the sat print  outs .....You boys and girls know who he/what it is !! What say the National GuardMoreReply00rrobert sOnly two weeks ago representatives of Israel were urging the President of  of Hungry .Orban,, to give one of the Rothschild' main instigator,   George Soros some slack Speaking of the Rothschild' & associates, one can't help but note, one of their cash cows  The Federal Reserve,  is still operating with the tax payers stuck with the vigorous aka vig. A 1/4 of a farthing on the dollar, the latest opinion of value concerning the devaluation and continuing raping of the US dollarIt was former Congressman Jason Chaffetz, one of the honorable representatives of the people, that pushed a bill to open the Feds books Rumor: His children and family were threatened .by  the money changer thugs The rest is history, rather than put his family in jeopardy, sell his soul and integrity,  he opted to suddenly retireIn light of  the all the mysterious suicides and a assassination related to the DNC.leaks and  WikiLeaks  ..Who would have protected The Honorable Jason  Chaffetz and his innocent family members from harm?  We await  Our Lord;s Day and the real battle vs Lucifer, his sons of darkness and his minions , both the cold and warm blooded  armies  and their motto .... Masters of the Human Domain Our Lord's son of light will cull many that now reside and wait behind the 7 gates, once these gates are opened  I do suspect enough of these dark  rerprobates  will escape and create untold chaos and harm among Our Lord's virtual; creations, specifically His human hosts Vengeance is Mine So Saith The Lord ....His Wrath His Judgment  I concur with the Ronin warrior .....Once the evil on Terra 1 is vanquished and interned ....There is no reason for His  Sons of Light to remain here,  with His Lamb being given dominion over  this planet for a millennium We'll be back ...after His Lamb's reign is concluded .on this planet ....Wiser from our experiences, battle hardened and ready to vanquish the hard headed evil ones again ...Naturally with God's Grace I never argue with Our Lord's Plan and Will ....Unknown whether this humble servant of the Host of Hosts, Our Lord , will be one of His human hosts again or not ? ...MoreReply00rrobert sOdd that AIXA.DE is trading at $7.20 EUs' { 1.1431 X $7.20 or $8.23 US } And yet AIXNY is trading on the OTC at $6.70 US The disparity between the 2 trading platforms is a $1.53 pps US Whereas, AIXA.SW last trade being $6.70 CHF  [ 6.70 x 1.034 = $6.93 US AS to AIXG.SE , Mellon, related underlying shares {who knows the meaning} One does get an impression Mellon is attempting to hide under a rock .as the transfer agent for GENUS, INC They must have forgotten or omitted to mention that it was JPM Chase Manhattan Bank that handled both ends of GENUS INC  paper transfer to AIXG  [AIXTRON} a reverse GmbH reverse co. [shell]...  In this case a safe haven for  any potential storm Their mistake .....attempting to cross the GENUS INC facility, the home address of  the original ALD/CVD Tools water shed patents  to the Chinese for pennies on the dollar ....Leastwise what was purported to be the salespriceEducated guess: Was either MJ 12 associates or DARPA who made their displeasure known to their CIA proxies, who intern notified the  Illuminati'  proxy aka Obama, who would rattle  CFIUS' cage to take action regarding Genus'  watershed patents transfer to China Nor surprised if this very matter was broached with President Trump during Xi Jinping's subsequent visit ?Some of the  aforementioned dots maybe out of sequential order and or a omitted , but the aforementioned cast of characters involved and related hypothesis...closer to reality than not ;-)As to the sale of the purported CVD/ALD tools to a Korean front co., oh my, another created false flag .I know your boss ...your real boss ...Perhaps his signature,  multiple Times by my count, to this debacle .was a coincidence .To: The national guardsmen and our large viewing audience What are the odds of that ? To: Bow Wow No commentary or fake news from the peanut gallery is requested or required ...MoreReplyReplies (4)00rrobert sWILLIAM CASEY, EX-C.I.A. HEAD, IS DEAD AT 74By ERIC PACEPublished: May 7, 1987William J. Casey, the Director of Central Intelligence until last February, whose role in the Iran-contra affair is under scrutiny in Congress, died of pneumonia yesterday in Glen Cove Community Hospital on Long Island. He was 74 years old. Mr. Casey died less than 24 hours after the first witness in Congressional hearings on the affair named him as having assisted in providing arms to Nicaraguan rebels after Congress forbade such support. Coincidence? Did William Casey (CIA Director) really say, "We'll know our disinformation program is complete when everything the American public believes is false."? [ from  his 1st staff meeting in 1981 } Certainly the assassination of Seth Rich, the massacre in Orlando Soros organized rallies, and the leaks at The White House would fall in line with Casey thoughts and CIA covert ops MJ12 and NIA would certainly know and could confirm every operation  their intelligence proxies have been instructed to do I won't even  get unto the cost of maintaining a shadow army or its rad hardened cities and infrastructure As to the puppet politicians bribery works ,in lieu,, black mail / coercion  The puppet politicians words and actions are difficult to mask on a day by day basis As to the Jesuit's agents .....surely special agents of The FBI don't need to hear what they already know from this gate keeper MJ12 and the military ....Many of our key senior officers and oath keepers were  replaced or forced into retirement Obama , replaced some 32 senior officers that were in charge of  nuclear buttons in his second term, as but one example Highly unlilkely Obama had an epiphany Certainly Mr Poppy's proxies, Hagen, Brennan, Clapper and other embedded associates with the dark swamp and related shadow gov;t  are of the same mindset .as Casey   ..I digress, it was Casey, who was instructed to go to  Arkansas, to  tell its  Governor, Mr Poppy;s  favorite son , to clean up his act in Little Rock....The rest is history including White Water and the CIA; Iran Contra/ Sandinista illicit activities The question, who would have instructed Casey to go to Little Rock to tell Mr Poppy;s favorite son and a nasty witch to clean up his act as Arkansas' Governor and its 1st lady ? I had all but forgotten about all Bill Casey and some of his nefarious CIA activitiesAnd yet, , nary a soul on the hill has uttered  a word about who's who in the Panama Papers and related In lieu, instead of opening up this malevolent can of worms, we ar presented two harmless and inept  left wing politicians from the left coast garnering news with impeachment , as but another distraction,  from what is the real, clear and present danger to  this republic and its citizenry  nefarious activitiesMoreReply00rrobert sRead the post  again ..Now ask yourself , why  an anonymous  and interested party would go through  the trouble of creating a new pseudonym in order to response to this specific post ? ..If one knows the reason why... would it not be  logical  to deduce which of the transfer agents would have taken the trouble to create a new pseudonym in order to offer words of  encouragement  ?ReplyReplies (1)00rrobert sThe sea anchor dubbed the USS AIXNY registered in NYC has been nearly lapped by its EU registered counter-parts Bureaucrats known to follow these type of races typically respond to questions concerning a fix, with a question Is it happening here? No sir but.... but Permit me to reiterate, is it happening here ? But sir.....Let me use an alternative  respond to your question,,,, If it's not happening here , how is that our problem Is there anything else we help you with ? Let;s guess which specific  helpful bureaucratic agency would best describe the aforementioned Q & A scenario ? "-}MoreReply00Show MoreOwners of Sears Hometown stores slated for closure plan to fight for compensationCBCStart Making $1,000 Every DayTorOptionSponsoredCanada's BCE profit drops as expenses rise; maintains outlookReutersData DisclaimerHelpSuggestionsPrivacyAbout Our AdsTerms (Updated)





Technology Stocks | Seeking AlphaSign in / Join NowGO»Technology StocksFitbit: Encouraging Narrative, Results Still MixedFIT• Today, 11:26 AM • D.M. Martins ResearchIron Mountain: Take A Closer Look Before Going For The DividendIRM• Today, 11:00 AM • Jonathan Weber•2 CommentsApplied Optoelectronics: China Fears Loom Before EarningsAAOI• Today, 10:57 AM • Kumquat Research•15 CommentsFrontier Communications: Much Better Than Market FearsFTR• Today, 10:57 AM • Stone Fox Capital•4 CommentsSilicon Motion: Slyly Taking AdvantageSIMO• Today, 10:54 AM • Jenks Jumps•1 CommentMicron: A Sudden Drop Flags TroubleMU• Today, 10:53 AM • The Structure Of Price•18 CommentsGTT Communications, Inc. 2017 Q2 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesGTT• Today, 10:31 AM • SA TranscriptsFitbit- The Tides Are TurningFIT• Today, 9:22 AM • Jeffrey Himelson•13 CommentsFrontier: Don't Be FooledFTR• Today, 9:00 AM • Business Quant•15 CommentsAT&T Nosedives Over 2%... What Gives?T• Today, 8:00 AM • David Alton Clark•44 CommentsWhy Amazon Will Not Kill This BusinessAMZN• Today, 5:45 AM • Vitaliy Katsenelson, CFA•15 CommentsTeradata - When Analyst Disdain Can Be A Good ThingTDC• Today, 5:06 AM • Bert Hochfeld•4 CommentsIteris: Free Option On The Growth Of Autonomous VehiclesEditors' Pick • ITI• Today, 5:00 AM • Laughing Water Capital•2 CommentsCorning: Uncertainty Created The Drop And An OpportunityGLW• Today, 4:51 AM • Jacob Urban•4 CommentsFollowing The Surprising PureFunds Dismissal, Here's How The Cybersecurity ETF Will ChangeHACK• Today, 1:11 AM • Dave DierkingCastlight Health, Inc. 2017 Q2 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesCSLT• Yesterday, 9:17 PM • SA TranscriptsFormFactor, Inc. 2017 Q2 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesFORM• Yesterday, 7:45 PM • SA TranscriptsSprint: A Good Time To Buy?S• Yesterday, 7:28 PM • Orthodox Investor•81 Comments3 Reasons To Hold Onto XperiXPER• Yesterday, 7:28 PM • Focus Equity•3 CommentsiPass Inc. 2017 Q2 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesIPAS• Yesterday, 7:12 PM • SA TranscriptsBrooks Automation, Inc. 2017 Q3 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesBRKS• Yesterday, 6:49 PM • SA TranscriptsFirst Solar And The Gift Of U.S. Market DominionFSLR• Yesterday, 6:03 PM • Robert Dydo•13 CommentsItron, Inc. 2017 Q2 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesITRI• Yesterday, 5:41 PM • SA TranscriptsWhat You Need To Know As Hortonworks Announces Q2 ResultsHDP• Yesterday, 5:17 PM • Virginia Backaitis•6 CommentsBlackBerry: A Mature StartupBBRY• Yesterday, 5:14 PM • Renars G•83 CommentsCommerceHub, Inc. 2017 Q2 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesCHUBA• Yesterday, 5:09 PM • SA TranscriptsRealPage 2017 Q2 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesRP• Yesterday, 4:38 PM • SA TranscriptsBuying Opportunity For KEMET Bulls After Preliminary Earnings VolatilityKEM• Yesterday, 4:01 PM • Pantho Investments•3 CommentsApple's Investment Theme Has Not ChangedAAPL• Yesterday, 3:34 PM • George Kesarios•22 CommentsKDDI To Acquire SORACOM For IoT CommunicationsKDDIY• Yesterday, 3:18 PM • Donovan JonesCognex Is A Terrific Company But Already Fully ValuedCGNX• Yesterday, 2:57 PM • Shareholders Unite•17 CommentsApple's Quarterly Results: No Pause HereAAPL• Yesterday, 2:24 PM • Edison Investment Research•11 CommentsBox Runup And Insider Selling May Indicate Full ValuationBOX• Yesterday, 2:13 PM • Donovan Jones•6 CommentsCyberArk - A Summer Low Buy Before A Fall High?CYBR• Yesterday, 2:07 PM • Accendo Markets•2 CommentsIntel: Cloud Continues Strong Momentum, But Shareholders Will Not Be RewardedMBLY, NVDA• Yesterday, 1:45 PM • Michael Wiggins De Oliveira•10 CommentsAMD: The Good, The Bad, The VegaAMD• Yesterday, 12:58 PM • Austin Craig•219 CommentsRadisys: Time To Buy?RSYS• Yesterday, 12:26 PM • Mark Gomes•13 CommentsAMD: Threadripper Will DominateAMD• Yesterday, 12:18 PM • Kumquat Research•59 CommentsApple Delivering On Need To Complement iPhone SalesAAPL• Yesterday, 12:09 PM • Gary Bourgeault•21 CommentsNavient Acquires Duncan Solutions For Transportation Revenue ManagementNAVI• Yesterday, 11:35 AM • Donovan Jones•6 CommentsSemiconductor Equipment Stocks - What's Going On?AMAT, LRCX, KLAC• Yesterday, 11:13 AM • Robert Castellano•10 CommentsSilicon Motion Technology Is A BuySIMO• Yesterday, 10:57 AM • Shareholders Unite•3 CommentsFrontier: Get Out While You CanFTR• Yesterday, 10:35 AM • Quad 7 Capital•85 CommentsGarmin Ltd. 2017 Q2 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesGRMN• Yesterday, 10:33 AM • SA TranscriptsS&P Index Decision Punishes Snap, But Helps Ordinary InvestorsSNAP• Yesterday, 10:19 AM • Ian Bezek•30 CommentsRedfin May Not Be Innovative Or Disruptive, Valuation In QuestionRDFN• Yesterday, 10:13 AM • Bull & Bear Trading•59 CommentsKemet Corporation 2017 Q1 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesKEM• Yesterday, 9:57 AM • SA TranscriptsSnatch Up Fitbit's Shares Ahead Of Its Earnings ReleaseFIT• Yesterday, 9:37 AM • Jeffrey Himelson•65 CommentsRotork: A Surprising Change To Make The Strong, Stronger?Editors' Pick • RTOXF• Yesterday, 9:11 AM • Dividend Drive•1 CommentInterXion Holding N.V. 2017 Q2 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesINXN• Yesterday, 8:26 AM • SA TranscriptsDrill Baby Drill: Bri-Chem Earnings Preview And Forecast UpdateEditors' Pick • BRYFF• Yesterday, 6:48 AM • Darren McCammon•8 CommentsUnisys Corporation 2017 Q2 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesUIS• Yesterday, 3:20 AM • SA TranscriptsJuly 2017 Recap: Least Active July Since The Financial Crisis With 9 IPOsRDFN, APRN• Yesterday, 1:22 AM • Renaissance Capital IPO Research•1 CommentInvesting In AMDAMD• Tue, Aug. 1, 9:57 PM • Raymond Caron, Ph.D.•108 CommentsGlu Mobile Inc. 2017 Q2 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesGLUU• Tue, Aug. 1, 9:43 PM • SA TranscriptsCoherent, Inc. 2017 Q3 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesCOHR• Tue, Aug. 1, 9:31 PM • SA TranscriptsZix Corporation 2017 Q2 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesZIXI• Tue, Aug. 1, 9:14 PM • SA TranscriptsSnap Stock: Lockup Expiry Yet To Take EffectSNAP• Tue, Aug. 1, 7:18 PM • Amigobulls•33 CommentsLogMeIn Agrees To Acquire Nanorep For Virtual Assistant TechLOGM• Tue, Aug. 1, 7:04 PM • Donovan JonesAmazon: When Earnings Miss For The Right ReasonsAMZN• Tue, Aug. 1, 6:52 PM • Josh Blechman•47 CommentsApple: End The BuybackAAPL• Tue, Aug. 1, 6:09 PM • Feria Investor•142 CommentsAmazon's AWS cloud platform is no match for AzureAMZN• Tue, Aug. 1, 5:40 PM • Michael Wiggins De Oliveira•71 CommentsTwitter: Wait Wait WaitTWTR• Tue, Aug. 1, 5:29 PM • Celeritas Investments•36 CommentsApple First Look: Strength Across The BoardAAPL• Tue, Aug. 1, 5:24 PM • D.M. Martins Research•47 CommentsApple Earnings: No Worries HereAAPL• Tue, Aug. 1, 5:08 PM • Bill Maurer•78 CommentsDump Amazon Now?AMZN• Tue, Aug. 1, 5:07 PM • Bill Gunderson•54 CommentsEVERTEC 2017 Q2 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesEVTC• Tue, Aug. 1, 4:48 PM • SA TranscriptsQuotient Technology Inc. 2017 Q2 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesQUOT• Tue, Aug. 1, 4:46 PM • SA TranscriptsThe Missing 'M' In Facebook MessengerFB• Tue, Aug. 1, 4:44 PM • Karen Webster•23 CommentsRedfin: Disruptive Predator Or Sessile Bottom Feeder?RDFN• Tue, Aug. 1, 4:24 PM • The Capitalist Pig•13 CommentsSequans Communications 2017 Q2 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesSQNS• Tue, Aug. 1, 3:09 PM • SA TranscriptsReversal Of Fortune Ahead For Facebook?FB• Tue, Aug. 1, 3:05 PM • Gary Bourgeault•16 CommentsTwitter's New Plan To Drive Growth Could BackfireTWTR• Tue, Aug. 1, 2:55 PM • Amigobulls•12 CommentsNokia: Slow And Steady, No Need To Buckle UpNOK• Tue, Aug. 1, 2:47 PM • D.M. Martins Research•24 CommentsBlue Apron: Q2 Earnings Preview And AnalysisAPRN• Tue, Aug. 1, 2:44 PM • Kevin Mak, CFA•10 Comments123456...1166Next Page


Aixtron's (AIXG) CEO Martin Goetzeler on Q4 2016 Results - Earnings Call Transcript | Seeking AlphaSign in / Join NowGO»Aixtron's (AIXG) CEO Martin Goetzeler on Q4 2016 Results - Earnings Call TranscriptFeb.25.17 | About: Aixtron Aktiengesellschaft (AIXG) Aixtron SE (ADR) (NASDAQ:AIXG)
Q4 2016 Earnings Conference Call
February 23, 2017 09:00 AM ET
Executives
Guido Pickert - IR
Martin Goetzeler - President and CEO
Bernd Schulte - COO
Analysts
Thomas Becker - Commerzbank
Malte Schaumann - Warburg Research
Gunther Hollfelder - Baader Bank
Karsten Iltgen - Bankhaus Lampe
Juergen Wagner - MainFirst Bank
Gunther Hollfelder - Baader Bank
David Mulholland - UBS
Operator
Good morning and good afternoon, ladies and gentlemen and welcome to AIXTRON 2016 Annual Results Conference Call. Please note that today's call is being recorded. 
Let me now hand you over to Mr. Guido Pickert, Director of Investor Relations and Corporate Communications at AIXTRON for opening remarks and introduction.
Guido Pickert
Thank you, operator. Let me start by welcoming you all to AIXTRON's Q4 and full year 2016 results conference call. Thank you for attending this call. I'd like to welcome our President and CEO, Martin Goetzeler as well as our COO, Dr. Bernd Schulte.
As the operator indicated, this call is being recorded by AIXTRON and is considered copyright material. As such, it cannot be recorded or rebroadcast without expressed permission. Your participation in this call implies your consent to this recording. As with previous results conference calls, I trust that all participants have our results presentation slides, page 2 of which contains our Safe Harbor statement. I would like to point out that it applies throughout this conference call.
You may also wish to have a look at our latest IR presentation, which includes additional information on AIXTRON's markets and its technologies. Both presentations and further documents are available on our website. This call is not being immediately presented via webcast or any other medium. However, we will place an audio file of the recording or a transcript on our website at some point after the call.
I would now like to hand you over to Martin Goetzeler, AIXTRON's President and CEO, for opening remarks. Martin?
Martin Goetzeler
Thank you, Guido. Ladies and gentlemen, good day to you all. Let me welcome you on behalf of AIXTRON's Executive Board to the presentation of our 2016 results. Let me start by making some general comments before going into the numbers. I will then hand over to Bernd who will talk about his priorities for 2017 in and around our technology portfolio. I will close the presentation with a summary of the broader business issues we are addressing and give you a view about AIXTRON's business prospects in 2017 and beyond.
In February of last year, we gave guidance that revenues for the full year 2016 would be somewhere between €170 million and €200 million. We expected a significantly stronger revenue generation in the second half of 2016 compared to the first half of 2016. We also stated that we would reach an EBITDA, EBIT, net result and free cash flow slightly less compared to 2015, but to remain negative for the full year 2016. We reaffirmed this guidance in our Q2 conference call in August, and then in October. We narrowed the revenue guidance to €180 million to €200 million, also adding that order intake for the year would be somewhere between €200 million to €220 million. Revenues came in at 196.5 million for the year and our order intake at 225.1 million, which was the highest since 2011.
We also managed to improve profitability year on year and inherently Q4 was our best quarter in five years. But as expected and communicated, we remained unprofitable over the full year 2016 due to continued high research and development cost. We see signs of a stabilization in the LED market but more importantly we have seen a significant recovery in both revenues and orders for applications beyond LEDs. And according to our estimate, we have become the global leader in MOCVD equipment sales last year, which is a result of the successful diversification strategy, particularly in the various areas of advanced compound semiconductors. These semiconductors are key enablers for large technology trends such as electric vehicles, energy storage and renewables, not to mention autonomous driving, big data, cloud computing or 5G mobile networks. We believe that AIXTRON technology will position its customer to participate in the growth opportunities of this major technology trends by using RF, laser, IR sensor, or high frequency and high power device.

Let me now take you through our numbers for the full year 2016 starting with the slide one, which gives an overview of revenues, equipment orders and order backlog. In 2016 we generated EUR196.5 million in the revenues, which was virtually unchanged compared to the previous year's EUR197.8 million. Net sales, equipment sales in 2016, at EUR155.7 million were higher than 2015 EUR151 million. The remainder of revenues mainly EUR40.8 million representing 21% of revenues were generated by the sales of spare parts and service. On a regional basis, the majority of total revenues of 65% were generated by sales to customers in Asia with Americas accounting for 19% and Europe with 16%. In terms of product mix, optoelectronics excluding LEDs was the biggest business at EUR53.2 million representing 34% of equipment sales. 
This was higher compared to last year evidencing the strength in orders for our core non-LED product. In fact order intake AIXTRON totaled EUR225.1 million last year or 75% higher than in 2015. The total equipment order backlog of EUR78.1 million at December 31, 2016 was 67% higher than the opening backlog at January 1, 2016 of EUR46.7 million. This solid backlog will allow a better production utilization in the first half of 2017, compared to 2016. Please also note that we have not revalued this backlog in 2017 as we have assumed the same budget rate of 1.10 USD/EUR. 
Turning to the next slide, in 2016 we generated a gross profit of EUR56.3 million, which was a considerable improvement on the EUR49.8 million from the previous year. This led to a 4 percentage point improvement of gross margin to 29%, which is a reflection of higher efficiencies in production and service. For the full year 2016, we managed to keep operating costs below our EUR80 million annual target. Operating cost for the full year at EUR77.7 million was slightly higher than the previous year's EUR76.5 million and that was slightly below 40% of revenue.
The operating loss or EBIT for 2016 also still not positive at minus €21.4 million, improved over the minus €26.7 million loss we generated in 2015. That said, we did make a profit in Q4 which we generated positive EBIT of €7.9 million, which was driven by strong sales totaling €89.8 million and the gross margin of 33%. The net loss for 2016 was reduced and came in at a loss of €24 million compared to the €29.2 million loss we recorded in 2015. With regards to cash flows, we did see an improvement in operating cash flow in 2016 from minus €45.7 million in 2015 to minus €37.7 million in 2016, which was mainly a reflection of the reduced losses within the business. The level of the negative cash flow was also impacted by the second installment of the agreed repayment of the previous year received deposits to our Chinese customer San'an in Q1 2016. Due to the high shipments and shipment levels at the end of 2016, our receivables increased and our inventories declined. A large part of this open goods was cleared this quarter, positively impacting cash flow and liquidity in Q1 2017. The inventory level now reflects much better our order backlog.
Turning to the next slide, AIXTRON continues to have a solid balance sheet with €160.1 million in cash and cash equivalents brought down to some €120.1 million in cash and €40 million on deposit with a maturity of more than 90 days. Cash levels were down from €209.4 million at the end of 2015, which is main reflection of the negative operating cash flow in 2016. AIXTRON has no financial debt and an equity ratio of 85%.
Now, let me hand you over to Bernd, who will talk about our technology portfolio.
Bernd Schulte
Thank you, Martin. Let me start by saying that the opportunities we see in front of us are manifold. Thanks to the years of investment we have made in technology and product development. There are large global trends, such as the move to renewable energy, big data and the electrification of automobiles, all of which require 25 semiconductor materials. Our product portfolio puts us in a very good position to benefit from these market developments which are supported by the stronger interest for our deposition solutions across a wide range of applications.

However, some of our new technologies still require further upfront expenditures and investments for technology development and we are pursuing different options to reduce these upfront costs. Driving the decision and the execution of these options will be one of our major focuses for this year and could include measures such a joint venturing or other forms of partnering. One area I'm particularly excited about is power electronics.
We are seeing several of our customers now move from R&D and sampling to production. Of particular interest is the growing demand for so called wide band gap materials such as gallium nitride and silicon carbide, which we believe will be increasingly used in everything from mobile phones to electric cars and wind turbines. We think this could be a growing opportunity for us. Another area where we see an increasing potential is for lasers, including so called pixels for 3D imaging, high speed data transfer and sensing.
Finally, bringing new products in a timely fashion to market is a core focus for me as it does not affect revenues but also costs. For this year, the goal is to achieve customer quantification of all OLED deposition and thin film encapsulation technology. We will also continue our efforts focusing on optimizing material costs as well as efficiencies across the whole business. With that, let me give you back to Martin.
Martin Goetzeler
Thanks Bernd. Over the last 12 months AIXTRON has been in the media spotlight due to the planned takeover of the Company by Fujian Grand Chip. We as a management team as well as our Supervisory Board thought this was a very good deal for not only shareholders but also the future of the Company. Following the withdrawal of the takeover offer on December 8, 2016 due to the inability of Fujian Grand Chip to obtain the necessary regulatory approvals, AIXTRON has been focusing its corporate strategy on ensuring that its technology portfolio is optimally structured and positioned. Consistent with this, AIXTRON is currently pursuing various options for reducing the upfront cost needed to develop to the Company's future technologies. These options include, as Bernd just mentioned, looking for suitable partners and intra joint ventures and other alternatives. All these measures are intended to enable AIXTRON to sustainably return to profitability and to achieve positive operating result in 2018. This strategy was laid by the Supervisory Board.
In order to commercialize some of the technologies we are developing in a timely fashion we plan higher R&D expenses. The result is that based on the existing structure, we expect to achieve lower EBITDA, EBIT and net result for fiscal year 2017. However, as previously discussed, we are pursuing the various options in order to reduce upfront cost and to return to sustainable profitability. Depending on the execution of this above mentioned strategy with its various alternatives and due to the uncertainty of its impact on profit management is currently not in the position to offer guidance on EBITDA, EBIT and net results for fiscal year 2017. Management will provide an update on the 2017 earnings outlook as plans materialize.
Regarding free cash flow, AIXTRON expects a further improvement of the figure in 2017. This development is influenced by the significant reimbursement of an advance payment in Q1 2016, which will not repeat. As to revenues and orders, based on the existing business structure and the assessment on AIXTRON's current order situation with the internal budget rate of 1.10 USD/EUR our guidance for both revenues and orders is in the range of EUR180 million to EUR210 million for the full year 2017. 
We see growth opportunities this year and beyond for our MOCVD solutions for the production of wide-band-gap power devices. We also see continued strengths in photonics applications for laser and sensor application. In addition, we expect a solid contribution from memory and logic applications driven by demand for 3D NAND flash memory applications. We remain very much focused on costs, margin contributions and allocation of funds, as well as continuously reviewing the performance and prospects of AIXTRON's product portfolio. As in previous years, we expect that AIXTRON will not require any external bank debt financing in 2017. 

Finally, as this is my last results conference call as CEO of AIXTRON, let me thank the shareholders and analysts for their support, employees and the management team for their contributions in the last years and the dedication despite the uncertainties we have gone through. I'm leaving AIXTRON confident that with the strategy it has adopted, the innovative products it can offer to numerous huge future markets, the processes it has put in place, not to mention the highly qualified group of employees and clear result focus, the company is on the road towards sustainable profitability.
Ladies and gentlemen, this concludes our 2016 annual results presentation. Thank you and all the best to all of you. Bernd and I are available now to answer your questions.
Guido Pickert
Thank you, Martin and Bernd. Operator, please open the line for questions now.
Question-and-Answer Session 
Operator 
[Operator Instructions]. And the first question comes from Thomas Becker from Commerzbank. Please your line is open now.
Thomas Becker
Thank you. A couple of questions with respect to R&D spending this year. So could you please be a little bit more granular referring to in what part you want to step up R&D, again is this OLED, is this power electronics? Second question would be again also on the R&D budget. Can you quantify what percentage of the R&D budget you have spent in last year on the OLED project? That would be great. And with respect to restructuring, so what are the plans going forward? Will you restructure the company, will you enter into a new restructuring program or is this left open until new management, new CEO arrives?
Martin Goetzeler
Thank you, Mr. Becker for the questions. First of all on the R&D, we don't show details on R&D cost for the past and for the future. But what we said in our annual report is that the share for the future technologies and that includes, for example, our organic activities, our power electronics, but also our 3.5 on silicon. Last year exceeded 60% of our R&D spending. That's the number which we communicated also in our annual report. Why would it go up this year or what is the reasoning behind, let me -- here I can only comment that in some areas, we are getting closer to the qualification stage and in order to do so we need to increase our efforts and this definitely on one side it's positive. On the other side, as you also I think implied, it's challenging and that creates this necessity to find solutions to lower the upfront expenses via partnering or JV or other alternatives and that's what we also communicated. This is also not depending on the new or old management, as I said to you. This was agreed with the Supervisory Board. However, we are looking on various options here for partnering also for the structural approaches. But I would like to ask for your understanding that in this call we cannot go further into details on that.
Thomas Becker
With respect to the restructuring to say of the Company, is there anything baked into the EBITDA loss for this year? You do not give a quantitative guidance but are there any one-offs included?
Martin Goetzeler
Are we talking now about last year or this year?
Thomas Becker
This year going forward, basically the question is going forward are there any restructuring programs planned this year?
Martin Goetzeler
What I can reconfirm is that we are looking at these different options for partnering, for possible JVs, other alternatives and depending basically on the outcome this will basically -- then we will be able to communicate anything on changes in the Company. But in general, we are looking and this is what we also wrote in our communication, in our annual report, we are focusing as we said, to look for partners. We are looking for options, JVs, and other alternatives and that's the current status and I would ask you for your understanding that we cannot give more details on that.

Thomas Becker
Last question from my side is with respect to the end market dynamics in 2017. Is it fair to assume that the LED business or the market momentum in the classic LED market that this has let's call it bottomed out, it's not saying that it will go up, but that it will not go down further, is it fair to assume?
Martin Goetzeler
Mr. Becker, Bernd will answer that question.
Bernd Schulte
Hello, Mr. Becker it's Bernd Schulte. Yes I think it's a fair assumption that the LED business has bottomed out in 2016. I think what we're hearing from customers is they are running at very high utilization rate also the pricing has stabilized which are good indications that the market looks more positive than 2016 into this year. Nevertheless, we all, keep in mind that 2016 was very [Indiscernible] 
Thomas Becker
Additional one with respect to the atomic layer deposition business that you have, there is a second customer qualified that to my understanding will this customer, which is qualified also asked for volumes this year.
Martin Goetzeler 
We do not expect really volume manufacturing a lot of volume from this customer this year.
Operator 
Next up is Mr. Malte Schaumann from Warburg Research. Your line is open now. 
Malte Schaumann
Just a follow up on your LED market comments, even in a growing maybe end market but do you really think that AIXTRON might be able to participate given that BQ was getting all the awesome stuff and Chinese competitors are increasingly penetrating the existing customers in China or should we rather look then for maybe, let's say, flat LED sales for you?
Martin Goetzeler
Yes, the LED market certainly you have to differentiate in the GaN LED market for blue LEDs and the red LED markets, for red, orange and yellow. Certainly you are right in your statement that the situation in China, particularly in China for blue LED has become extremely competitive for the equipment manufacturers also with the increasing level of qualification of Chinese competitors. And we will only participate in markets where we can get appropriate margins. So, if the markets continue to develop with a huge margin pressure, we will always consider whether we participate specific bids or not. Differently in the red orange yellow market, there we are seeing also a healthy growth which we have not seen for several years and we expect also this year for us a good opportunity here to participate for red orange yellow.
Malte Schaumann 
Okay. Specifically on the optoelectronics market that really came up with a very good sales volume in 2016 about 50 million. I recall that earlier in the year you were not really sure how that market will develop and would have been satisfied with, let's say, 20 million, 30 million in sales after the strong year 2015. So what is your current perspective going forward? Do you think that market might be able to deliver a good growth? Would you be satisfied with stable sales? Should we expect a decline in the high level? So what's your view on that area?
Bernd Schulte
Certainly 2016 was, after many years of relatively low volumes, an extremely good year and a very strong increase. And that is of course, prudent not to assume continuing this business highs. However, we're hearing from the end markets very encouraging signals about introduction of photonics devices into end user product in the consumer electronics, namely cellphones, et cetera. And I think to answer your question directly, I think over the mid-term, I see a very sustainable business. How much that influence this year depends on the adoption of these new, these two devices in the consumer electronic applications. So how fast will the consumer electronics companies ramp these new gadgets into their products.
Malte Schaumann

Okay. And that would lead to potential growth in the future or would that just may not that tough, but justify the current sales level?
Bernd Schulte
I think maintaining the current stature would be already good, but I think, I could even show some growth on the moderate level.
Malte Schaumann
Yes, okay.
Martin Goetzeler
It really depends, as we said, on the pace of the adaption. But I also mentioned in my talk that this is one of the opportunities for this.
Malte Schaumann
Yes, okay. And maybe your view on the power electronics market, how that is going to develop, it was not that strong in 2016. Is that trend about to turn around? Do you see customers moving to what kind of volume production?
Martin Goetzeler
While we've seen customers moving to volume production already. However, they do not do this buying 20, 30 systems at once. So they're renting step by step typically buying maybe two or three tools at once that's typically the volume order they place because we're growing from a very low level. And, again, here it is about the pace of the penetration of the gallium nitride and silicon carbide devices into the power market which currently is served by silicon devices. And it is all about the adoption in the end products. It is not a question of if it's just a question of when.
Bernd Schulte
If you look at the distribution quarter by quarter you saw AIXTRON post a good recovery in the second half.
Malte Schaumann
That's right. And how would you answer the question then of when, is there a point in time when you would really expect a surge in sales or is it really a very slowly developing market over the next two, three, four years?
Martin Goetzeler
It's different than we have seen it in the LED space. It is a conservative market with a healthy growth and you compete with a very strong competitor that's Silicon. I think it's probably the strongest competitor you can consider. And it really depends how fast industry can reduce costs and show the performance. As I said, it's a matter of adoption and how that translate in our true sales that basically the adoption end products will show. Nevertheless, it will be a growing area.
Bernd Schulte
And Mr. Schaumann, that was also one of the items I mentioned in my talk really as an opportunity for growth.
Malte Schaumann
Then two questions left. The first is regarding silicon, what does it take really to maybe increase sales there, maybe not in 2017 but then 2018, 2019, that in the [indiscernible] that's sufficient really to see when customers move forward to see increasing demand for your systems or do you really need to penetrate additional application films for the systems?
Martin Goetzeler
Yes, first you have to [indiscernible] your current accounts and your current films. That's important to stay competitive and keep your customers happy. And second then, as you say, you have to qualify your technology with new films and bringing those films you have qualified as one customer, those films to other customers. That's basically what we're doing. And yes, so for the short term, you have probably read about the strong demand in memory devices. We're seeing a very positive development.
Malte Schaumann
And anything in the pipeline for new qualifications or why that -- [Multiple Speakers] 
Martin Goetzeler
Yes, there is a pipeline. And as I said, it is not necessarily a new product, a new equipment, but is taking equipment what you have and qualify different films.
Malte Schaumann
Okay. Last question is on OLEDs. Once your customer qualifies, everything -- your deposition equipment, everything ready to move to volume production, pilot production whatever or what is the surrounding in terms of masks. Is your chamber then fully qualified at a larger area? So how far away then maybe the largest or most substantial revenue contributions from that way as the customer is able or not able then quickly move to larger production?

Martin Goetzeler
Yes, with OLED you have to go through several steps. First as you know, we have a different deposition technology than the established technology. And the first thing is to prove that feasibility at a customer site, which we are making where we have made last year extremely good progress. The second step is then going through a medium size, just to test this feasibility into a, let's say, semi production environment and then finally, to have a large area system and we are currently in the process of discussion with a leading customer on the second step I mentioned.
Operator
The next questioner is Gunther Hollfelder from Baader Bank.
Gunther Hollfelder
First question is a follow-up on the power semiconductor side, wide-band-gap. The sales in 2016, can you talk about the sale of gallium nitride versus silicon carbide? Is it like 50-50 or its more silicon carbide?
Bernd Schulte
I think it is much more on the gallium nitride. I would say 80% to 90% is gallium nitride.
Gunther Hollfelder
And on the LED business, I think you reported like 26% sales of your group sales related to LED. So I was just wondering out of the 26% how much is related to blue lights to mid power blue light LEDs?
Bernd Schulte
I think in the LED what we are reporting in LEDs, majority is gallium nitride LED. So you can rightly assume that this is blue LED.
Gunther Hollfelder
Okay. And would you differentiate between mid-power and high power then on the blue light side?
Martin Goetzeler
In our LED we have both. We have gallium nitride and gallium arsenide included. There is a misunderstanding, but what we also mentioned in our annual report, I think, is that gallium nitride, we have a significant portion of that sale was also related to our sell off of inventory. So going forward the focus definitely as Bernd explained is on margin business, again, but also on this red, orange, yellow and other specialty applications where we see good margin opportunities.
Bernd Schulte
We do not differentiate in the chip sizes because with the same tool you can you can produce various chip sizes.
Gunther Hollfelder
Okay. And you mentioned also VCSEL laser technology, potential of the opportunity with 3D sensing for example. I was just wondering about the technology manufacturing technology that's used, I mean it seems some of the VCSEL guys they are using MBE technologies or some MOCVD or is it the combination of both or how you see this developing over the next years?
Bernd Schulte
I think the majority in the market for VCSEL is using MOCVD. And I think we have there are four, five different companies in the world who are providing the products and I think we have the good thing is we have a very strong position there. And what I mentioned is that the growth over the last three, four years was quite limited, but in particular, last year we saw a very, very strong demand and [Indiscernible] potential use or the future use of those devices in consumer electronic applications.
Gunther Hollfelder
Right. And then I had a follow up on the silicon business, especially in particular about China [Indiscernible]. So are you in a position or you already in talks with Chinese memory projects? So this might be more an opportunity maybe for CVD technology given the process nodes?
Bernd Schulte
I think you are right. That could be an opportunity but we are in quite initial stage here because first you have to also qualify in their technology expansion.
Gunther Hollfelder
And the last question on OLED, in particular OLED encapsulation, I mean you had this follow up payment in 2016 but at the same time it seems that the sales performance disappointed. I don't know whether you have any intangible or goodwill on the balance sheet, but it seems you decided against an impairment or anything here?

Martin Goetzeler
This question was related to organic…?
Gunther Hollfelder
To PlasmaSi.
Martin Goetzeler
To PlasmaSi. Definitely, you are right. We have goodwill on our books for PlasmaSi but this is a business which we are pursuing and we are following. We are actually also working closely with customers, particularly here we have installed a tool and we are also planning to install further ones over the next couple of quarters. So, it's not that we have huge quantities currently in our forecast, but we are pursuing this business and we want to bring it to market maturity. I'm surprised that there wasn't this perception that we did not follow and continue with our thin-film encapsulation business. It's true that we didn't mention it in detail like for example, our OPD activities, but it's also on a smaller scale and it's actually also a little bit earlier than our OPD business.
Gunther Hollfelder
Okay. I understand. Many thanks.
Operator 
And next up is Mr. Karsten Iltgen from Bankhaus Lampe.
Karsten Iltgen
Yes. Hi. Thank you. One question concerning our R&D budget for this year again. Can you quantify by how much you're planning to increase?
Martin Goetzeler
Again, I think there is a little bit of misunderstanding. We have said that based on current structure, if everything continue as it is, that would come out. Important to understand we are pursuing alternative routes currently in order to find ways to manage and to reduce our upfront investment. And that's currently our focus here. Therefore, it's difficult currently for these scenarios which we don't know exactly which one will definitely at the end be executed to give you a hint on the potential level of, for example, R&D costs. So it's somehow also related to definitely to the scenarios or to the executed strategy at the end and there are options as you know. And nevertheless and this is I think the message which we gave today is there are some areas where we need to get closer to qualification, closer to production level as customers, then you have to increase your efforts. And that, I think, we mentioned a couple of times and therefore you can also see where these additional R&D costs may come from. Thank you.
Karsten Iltgen
But just on a quarterly level, are we going to see R&D stepping up quarter by quarter until you have found a solution in terms of partnership or JV or anything like this?
Martin Goetzeler
I think I'm not sure how much you look also at our employees. We are really looking also, definitely continue to look into our cost and we will manage projects very tightly. So if there are changes in the increases, it would be also for external cost. That's something which we are managing very tightly but it's currently difficult to predict in which quarters can have more. But from that perspective, I would again ask for understanding that we first work on the options and then come back with a clear indication of what that means for accounting.
Karsten Iltgen
The main reason I was asking was because I was surprised by your guidance of declining EBIT this year and I think the only reason you mentioned is potentially increasing R&D. I think there is no other reason or is there why earnings may go down this year?
Bernd Schulte
Based on the current structure, that's the main reason, that's true.
Karsten Iltgen
The way you just described it R&D at the end of the day may not go up this year because you manage it tightly and also you're seeking other options. [Technical Difficulty] at the end of the day if it is not going to decline this year?
Bernd Schulte
Let me summarize again. See, what I said is, that the increase might come from external order or external performances of suppliers who work for us and do some R&D work. It will not come from significant increase of people or so, that's what I said. And that's definitely something which can impact quarter-by-quarter, but currently it's definitely -- it's too early to say how it will impact which quarter but we are planning something for the entire year and based on this, I would also ask you for your understanding that we don't go more into details now how this impacts different quarters.

Karsten Iltgen
And on a different topic, do you have any visibility on order rate in Q1 any sense of where this is heading?
Martin Goetzeler
We definitely have a forecast for our own purposes. But this is not something which we are guiding or we are communicating. So I would ask you on this -- on my last call here not to change that.
Karsten Iltgen
But the lower end of your guidance seems to imply an order rate of only €30 million in Q1, which seems low.
Martin Goetzeler
I think what we showed on the slide in the presentation is between €60 million and €90 million is the guided order intake for the rest of the year in order to fulfill this target. How this distributes over different quarters that's something to see. Your number comes up and this doesn't include definitely spares and services if we are at the lower end of this guidance. But it's always -- it's a calculated number from your side and therefore, I cannot confirm. And I will also not deny it. So as we said, this is our guidance and we stick to this.
Karsten Iltgen
One last thing on power semis, again. The fact that Infineon and Wolfspeed walked away, is it a good or bad thing? And have you been supplying Wolfspeed with systems in the past?
Bernd Schulte
We certainly cannot comment on a particular customer we supply to, but all I can say that we supply to all the major power semiconductor manufacturers. Whether that has been good or bad for us, that's a very complex question. I can only say the future will tell us.
Operator 
The next question is from Juergen Wagner from MainFirst Bank.
Juergen Wagner
Thank you for taking my question. You mentioned in your prepared remarks that trade receivables more than doubled. Have they all converged to cash and you also mentioned for the full year you expect an improvement in free cash flow. Could it be that it might even be possible positive depending on the magnitude of the EBIT loss? And my last question would be, does your order guidance include any OLED business? Those are my questions. Thank you.
Martin Goetzeler
So obviously, receivables I will not go more into detail. But we said a large part of the receivable turned in and I will stick to that. So, it was clear and so it's a large part and you can identify what a large part is, but you also know our normal level of receivables over the quarters before and that I think could indicate how that might end up then in Q1 again, is related to [Indiscernible]. So that's regarding the trade receivable.
The free cash flow, that's a good question. We have to see how the year develops and also how the year afterwards develops because that implies then how much do we have to do on inventory side. So we have besides those receivables which come in the first quarter, we have to really see how the business, how the volumes develop and that's something which we have to bear in mind. 
And then we will see what the impact can be on our free cash flow, but it really is volume driven. Because if we see a similar situation like this last year and it has a different scenario then if we can also continue basically at a very solid and good level quarter by quarter, so that's definitely a different case in terms of cash. So besides this trade receivable impact, which we definitely also have to watch end of this year we have also the non-repeated payment to our customers. So, there you have definitely two impacts which you can consider.
I think on organic, it's really important to not forget what Bernd said. We have this for certain customers particularly in OVPD we have situation that they go to different cycles in order to qualify at the end for production. And depending on which area and which level we are the order intake will be very different because as long as we are in qualification and significant pre-production stage, also the levels of order intake will be significantly lower. So we have some plans also by the way for TFE in our order intake plans, however, not on a large scale.

Operator 
And the next question comes from [indiscernible.]
Unidentified Participant
Good afternoon, hi. Thank you for taking my call. Just a quick one on the restructuring assets, and just reading from the guidance in a statement talking about some options just including, just looking for partners or joint ventures. As shareholders of this company, we were hoping a little bit more detail on this process. I mean we really understand the process is ongoing and there's so much you can share with the investor community here. But I mean the things I was just trying to understand is how long has this process being going on and are you, I mean as the company just working like an advisory firm or some sort of investment bank and just, in this process and when you talk about partners and joint ventures, what sort of parties are you approaching or you just approaching like, I don't know just investment funds or customers or I was just trying to understand who you've been approaching, just for your joint ventures and partnerships? Thank you.
Martin Goetzeler
Yes. Thank you, Mr. Sanol for your question. But please understand because to achieve the best desired output for our shareholders, we should be very careful what we announce to the public. Those processes are very, very sensitive and we are looking in all various opportunities and all what you mentioned could be possible in the discussions with you. But please understand that this is a sensitive process and we should not share more at this point in time.
Operator 
And next Gunther Hollfelder from Baader Bank.
Gunther Hollfelder
I had a follow-up question on the gross margin. 2016 at the sales level, you had a gross much, I think, around 29%. I was just wondering with your focus on the LED side on margins and with an expected, let's say, flat sales volume in 2017, what is the underlying gross margin assumption you have for 2017?
Bernd Schulte
I cannot share that with you Mr. Hollfelder. However, what I can say and what I would like to say is what I don't know if you remember the difference between Q1 and Q4 in our sales and shipment is enormous and that definitely on one side creates under absorption in one quarter and it definitely is not very, very efficient also if you basically add capacity in the other quarter. So we expect that because of this and more distributed loading that there are further opportunities in basically improving our under absorption and improving our production cost deterioration.
Gunther Hollfelder
And is there an impact from the AIX R6 in 2017, a negative impact on the gross margin?
Bernd Schulte
Yes, there is, but there will be also an impact in 2017.
Martin Goetzeler
I'm not sure if you -- just to clarify we have a contribution, but it's significantly under proportion. That's the right wording maybe.
Gunther Hollfelder
So you would say there is less of a negative impact in 2017 compared to [Multiple Speakers]?
Bernd Schulte
Not compared to the two years but from the sale of this equipment.
Operator
Next up is Mr. David Mulholland from UBS.
David Mulholland
I know there is not a lot what you can say around what you're planning, but can you at least talk about, is this something you're trying to partner with customers or is it something you might consider with in terms of peers and other equipment companies or are you open to all of that? And then secondly, obviously you've given a fairly clear commitment on the 2018 profitability. If it fair to interpret that to say that at some point in 2017 you'll draw a line under this if you haven't managed to get clear signs that revenue is coming through or some form of partnership, you will then cut cost, so that you can one way or the other achieve our profitability target?
Martin Goetzeler
I like your question. Unfortunately, I cannot answer more than Bernd already said in his answer and I already said to another question before. We really ask for your understanding. We believe that if we communicate anything here, it could have a negative impact on the activity. So we would appreciate if you can support this and ask for your understanding. On the other side, I can only reconfirm that, and that's true for me, but also for Bernd my successor here that the goal for going for a positive 2018 holds and is now our clear focus.

Guido Pickert
With this we would like to close today's call. Thank you for your question. And especially for your sustained interest in AIXTRON despite all ups and downs that we have gone through over the past years. Please let me direct some -- a few words to Martin who is leaving us very soon. I would personally like to thank you for very intense and trustful collaboration over the past four years. We wish you all the best whatever you will do and wherever it will take you. And I'm certain our paths will cross again sometime in the future. Thank you.
Martin Goetzeler
Thank you, Guido.
Guido Pickert
Operator?
Operator
With this we have come to the end of today's conference call. Thank you very much for your attention. Good bye.
Copyright policy: All transcripts on this site are the copyright of Seeking Alpha. However, we view them as an important resource for bloggers and journalists, and are excited to contribute to the democratization of financial information on the Internet. (Until now investors have had to pay thousands of dollars in subscription fees for transcripts.) So our reproduction policy is as follows: You may quote up to 400 words of any transcript on the condition that you attribute the transcript to Seeking Alpha and either link to the original transcript or to www.SeekingAlpha.com. All other use is prohibited.
THE INFORMATION CONTAINED HERE IS A TEXTUAL REPRESENTATION OF THE APPLICABLE COMPANY'S CONFERENCE CALL, CONFERENCE PRESENTATION OR OTHER AUDIO PRESENTATION, AND WHILE EFFORTS ARE MADE TO PROVIDE AN ACCURATE TRANSCRIPTION, THERE MAY BE MATERIAL ERRORS, OMISSIONS, OR INACCURACIES IN THE REPORTING OF THE SUBSTANCE OF THE AUDIO PRESENTATIONS. IN NO WAY DOES SEEKING ALPHA ASSUME ANY RESPONSIBILITY FOR ANY INVESTMENT OR OTHER DECISIONS MADE BASED UPON THE INFORMATION PROVIDED ON THIS WEB SITE OR IN ANY TRANSCRIPT. USERS ARE ADVISED TO REVIEW THE APPLICABLE COMPANY'S AUDIO PRESENTATION ITSELF AND THE APPLICABLE COMPANY'S SEC FILINGS BEFORE MAKING ANY INVESTMENT OR OTHER DECISIONS.
If you have any additional questions about our online transcripts, please contact us at: transcripts@seekingalpha.com. Thank you!
About this article:ExpandTagged: Technology, Semiconductor Equipment & Materials, Germany, TranscriptsError in this transcript? Let us know.Contact us to add your company to our coverage or use transcripts in your business.Learn more about Seeking Alpha transcripts here.Follow SA Transcripts and get email alertsSearch TranscriptThis transcriptFindAll transcriptsFindCompare To:All AIXG TranscriptsOther Companies in this sector












Home :: AIXTRON















Deutsch 汉语 한국말 日本語 漢語















We help molecules hit the big time.The organic light-emitting diode (OLEDs) brings large-scale areas to light.
Read more...We want customers to be able to start mass production as quickly as possible.Organic films of up to six square meters.
Read more...We want OLEDs to be affordable for consumers.Why we are pursuing our own path to do this.
Read more...We are the bridge between research and implementation.LED innovations – driven by light.Find out more...We support the markets – and grow with them.LED innovations – driven by light.Find out more...We are helping to put the world in a new light.LED innovations – driven by light.Find out more...













Latest News









                                01. August 2017
                                


                            
                                
                                | Press releases



San’an Optoelectronics qualifies AIXTRON Showerhead Reactor for production of Deep UV LEDs





Novel process chamber design enables enhanced fabrication of high performance Deep UV LEDs















                                25. July 2017
                                


                            
                                
                                | Finance news



AIXTRON: Revenues and Order Intake continued to increase in Q2/2017





2017 Revenues and Order Intake Guidance raised
AIXTRON on Track to return to Profitability in 2018















                                08. June 2017
                                


                            
                                
                                | Finance news



AIXTRON SE: Dr. Felix Grawert Appointed as a new Member of the Executive Board





Dr. Grawert to assume his position on October 1, 2017 or earlier
Dr. Schulte and Dr. Grawert to jointly lead the Company
Kim Schindelhauer to resume...















                                08. June 2017
                                


                            
                                
                                | Ad Hoc Releases



AIXTRON SE: Dr. Felix Grawert Appointed as a New Member of the Executive Board





Dr. Grawert to assume his position on October 1, 2017 or earlier
Dr. Schulte and Dr. Grawert to jointly lead the Company
Kim Schindelhauer to resume...















                                25. May 2017
                                


                            
                                
                                | Ad Hoc Releases



AIXTRON SE to sell its ALD/CVD Memory Product line





The transaction is subject to regulatory approvals and expected to close in the second half of 2017












                    Show all articles
                



                Subscribe to RSS Feed
            















Intraday Chart





3 Months




AIXTRON Share

Mehr lesen...Mehr lesen...






CompanyAbout AIXTRONCompany PrinciplesArticles of AssociationHistoryManagementExecutive BoardSupervisory BoardResearch and developmentOngoing research projectsCompleted research projectsLocationsTechnology and marketsCustomers and referencesSuppliersProcurementQualityLogisticsComplianceSpecific topicsProductsQuality guaranteeMaterial categoriesProduct PortfolioTechnologiesApplicationsServiceCustomer serviceUpgradesRequest for QuotationSpare partsTrainingTraining coursesApplication formService contactInvestorsFinancial newsArchive 2016Archive 2015Archive 2014Archive 2013Archive 2012Archive 2011Archive 2010Archive 2009Archive 2008Archive 2007EventsAnnual General MeetingAnnual General Meeting 2017ArchiveAnnual General Meeting 2016Annual General Meeting 2015Annual General Meeting 2014Annual General Meeting 2013Annual General Meeting 2012Annual General Meeting 2011Annual General Meeting 2010Annual General Meeting 2009Annual General Meeting 2008Annual General Meeting 2007Conference CallArchiveFinancial ReportsArchiveIR PresentationArchiveShareBasic DataIPO DataCapital MeasuresResearch CoverageCorporate GovernancePrinciplesDirectors' DealingsArchiveVoting rightsArchiveTotal voting rightsCode of EthicsCode of ConductConflict Minerals RegulationsU.S.-ListingsAmerican Depositary Receipts (ADR) ProgramForm 20-FForm SDFAQFAQ − ADRFAQ − SEFAQ − Conversion to Registered SharesContactCareersThis is AIXTRONGetting started at AIXTRONContact usWorking for usHigh school studentsUniversity studentsTraineesEntry-level hiresCandidates with professional experience5 tips to getting a jobJob vacanciesOnline applicationPressPress releasesArchive 2016Archive 2015Archive 2014Archive 2013Archive 2012Archive 2011Archive 2010Archive 2009Archive 2008Archive 2007Event calendarMedia CenterVideosPhotosContactContact form24/7 Technical Support LineContact personsDirectionsDeutsch 汉语 한국말 日本語 漢語Top










Earnings Call Transcripts | Seeking AlphaSign in / Join NowGO» 








Earnings Transcripts


  Sectors 


All
Most Popular

Basic Materials
Conglomerates
Consumer Goods
Financial
Healthcare
Industrial Goods
Services
Technology
Utilities










Seres Therapeutics' (MCRB) CEO Roger Pomerantz on Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


MCRB•
      Thu, Aug.  3, 11:24 AM

        •
SA Transcripts




Gladstone Capital's (GLAD) CEO David Gladstone on Q3 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


GLAD•
      Thu, Aug.  3, 11:23 AM

        •
SA Transcripts




CommerceHub's (CHUBA) CEO Frank Poore on Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


CHUBA•
      Thu, Aug.  3, 10:54 AM

        •
SA Transcripts




PGT's (PGTI) CEO Rod Hershberger on Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


PGTI•
      Thu, Aug.  3, 10:45 AM

        •
SA Transcripts




Teladoc's (TDOC) CEO Jason Gorevic on Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


TDOC•
      Thu, Aug.  3, 10:35 AM

        •
SA Transcripts




NRG Energy (NRG) Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


NRG•
      Thu, Aug.  3, 10:20 AM

        •
SA Transcripts




Insmed's (INSM) CEO Will Lewis on Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


INSM•
      Thu, Aug.  3, 10:16 AM

        •
SA Transcripts




Franklin Street Properties' (FSP) CEO George Carter on Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


FSP•
      Thu, Aug.  3,  5:42 AM

        •
SA Transcripts




Cabot's (CBT) CEO Sean Keohane on Q3 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


CBT•
      Thu, Aug.  3,  2:36 AM

        •
SA Transcripts




Verisk Analytics's (VRSK) CEO Steve Goldman on Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


VRSK•
      Thu, Aug.  3,  1:44 AM

        •
SA Transcripts




3D Systems (DDD) Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


DDD•
      Thu, Aug.  3,  1:29 AM

        •
SA Transcripts




Tesla (TSLA) Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


TSLA•
      Thu, Aug.  3,  1:13 AM

        •
SA Transcripts
•127 Comments 



MacroGenics' (MGNX) CEO Scott Koenig on Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


MGNX•
      Thu, Aug.  3, 12:50 AM

        •
SA Transcripts




BioMarin Pharmaceutical (BMRN) Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


BMRN•
      Thu, Aug.  3, 12:33 AM

        •
SA Transcripts




Societe Generale's (SCGLF) CEO Frederic Oudea on Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


SCGLF•
      Thu, Aug.  3, 12:24 AM

        •
SA Transcripts




Trimble (TRMB) Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


TRMB•
      Thu, Aug.  3, 12:23 AM

        •
SA Transcripts
•1 Comment 



Oclaro's (OCLR) CEO Greg Dougherty on Q4 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


OCLR•
      Thu, Aug.  3, 12:22 AM

        •
SA Transcripts
•1 Comment 



Qualys (QLYS) Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


QLYS•
      Thu, Aug.  3, 12:15 AM

        •
SA Transcripts




Equinix (EQIX) Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


EQIX•
      Thu, Aug.  3, 12:15 AM

        •
SA Transcripts




Altus Group's (ASGTF) CEO Bob Courteau on Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


ASGTF•
      Thu, Aug.  3, 12:14 AM

        •
SA Transcripts




Sierra Wireless' (SWIR) CEO Jason Cohenour on Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


SWIR•
      Thu, Aug.  3, 12:10 AM

        •
SA Transcripts
•1 Comment 



Fitbit (FIT) Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


FIT•
      Thu, Aug.  3, 12:09 AM

        •
SA Transcripts




Zynga (ZNGA) Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


ZNGA•
      Thu, Aug.  3, 12:07 AM

        •
SA Transcripts




Inovalon's (INOV) CEO Keith Dunleavy on Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


INOV•
      Wed, Aug.  2, 11:51 PM

        •
SA Transcripts




Alteryx's (AYX) CEO Dean Stoecker on Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


AYX•
      Wed, Aug.  2, 11:50 PM

        •
SA Transcripts




Ladder Capital's (LADR) CEO Brian Harris on Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


LADR•
      Wed, Aug.  2, 11:45 PM

        •
SA Transcripts




Molina Healthcare (MOH) Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


MOH•
      Wed, Aug.  2, 11:39 PM

        •
SA Transcripts




Wright Medical Group NV (WMGI) Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


WMGI•
      Wed, Aug.  2, 11:39 PM

        •
SA Transcripts




Exelixis (EXEL) Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


EXEL•
      Wed, Aug.  2, 11:29 PM

        •
SA Transcripts




RingCentral (RNG) Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


RNG•
      Wed, Aug.  2, 11:29 PM

        •
SA Transcripts





123456...4480Next Page





Search Transcripts






You can use: AND,NOT, OR,* *(exact phrase)










 






Aixtron SE | Glancy Prongay & Murray LLP


























Skip to main content



 



 




Home
The FirmOverview
Achievements and Awards

Professionals
Portfolio Monitoring
CasesInvestigations
New Cases
Ongoing Cases
Settled Cases

Practice AreasSecurities
Corporate M&A
Corporate Governance
Consumer Class Actions
Antitrust
Intellectual Property

ContactOffices
FAQ
Report a Fraud










Search form






 







You are hereHome » Cases » Aixtron SE
Aixtron SE

 Join this Action













Summary
Press Release
Complaint
Retention Agreement



 Company Name Aixtron SE 
 Stock Symbol AIXG 
 Class Period September 25, 2014 to December 9, 2015 
 Lead Plaintiff Motion Deadline March 4, 2016 
 Court USDC Southern District of New York 
 Status  New Case 
 The Firm has filed a class action lawsuit in the United States District Court for the Southern District of New York on behalf of a class (the “Class”) of purchasers of Aixtron SE (“Aixtron” or the “Company”) (Nasdaq: AIXG) securities between September 25, 2014 and December 9, 2015, inclusive (the “Class Period”).If you are a member of the Class described above, you may move the Court no later than 60 days from the date of this notice to serve as lead plaintiff. Please contact Lesley Portnoy at 888-773-9224 or 310-201-9150, or at shareholders@glancylaw.com to discuss this matter.On October 13, 2015, the Company issued a press release disclosing that it was revising its previously issued revenue guidance for the full year 2015 from 220 million – 250 million EUR down to 190 million - 200 million EUR due to “a postponement of shipments to a large Chinese customer which were planned for delivery in 2015.” The Company also announced that “[t]hese deliveries are now expected for 2016 depending on the progress of the ongoing milestone based qualification process.”On this news the Company’s American Depository Receipts (“ADRs”) fell $0.84 per ADR, or 12.8%, to close on October 13, 2015, at $5.71 per ADR, on high trading volume.Then, on December 9, 2015, the Company issued a press release announcing that it had “reached an agreement with its Chinese customer San’an Optoelectronics regarding a substantial reduction in the volume of AIX R6 MOCVD systems ordered from 50 to the three which have already been delivered.” The Company also disclosed that “the customer’s specific qualification requirements were not achieved.”On this news the Company’s ADRs fell $3.05 per ADR, or 40%, over two trading days, to close at $4.49 per ADR on December 10, 2015, on unusually high trading volume.The complaint charges Aixtron and certain of its officers with violations of the federal securities laws. Specifically, the complaint alleges that throughout the Class Period, defendants failed to disclose that: (1) that the AIX R6 MOCVD systems that were to be shipped to the Company’s large Chinese customer (San’an Optoelectronics) did not meet the customer’s specific qualification requirements; (2) that, as such, the Company’s agreement with San’an Optoelectronics to ship 50 of the Company’s AIX R6 MOCVD systems to San’an Optoelectronics was unlikely to be executed; (3) that the impending failure to execute the original agreement would have a substantial negative impact on the Company’s prospects; and (4) that, as a result of the foregoing, Defendants’ statements about AIXTRON’s business, operations, and prospects, were false and misleading and/or lacked a reasonable basis.To be a member of the Class you need not take any action at this time; you may retain counsel of your choice or take no action and remain an absent member of the Class. If you wish to learn more about this action, or if you have any questions concerning this announcement or your rights or interests with respect to these matters, please contact Lesley Portnoy, Esquire, of Glancy Prongay & Murray LLP, 1925 Century Park East, Suite 2100, Los Angeles, California 90067, at (310) 201-9150 or by e-mail to shareholders@glancylaw.com.  




 Glancy Prongay & Murray LLP Commences Investigation on Behalf of Aixtron SE InvestorsDecember 10, 2015 04:12 PM Pacific Standard TimeLOS ANGELES--(BUSINESS WIRE)--Glancy Prongay & Murray LLP (“GPM”) is investigating potential claims on behalf of investors of Aixtron SE (“Aixtron” or the “Company”) (NASDAQ: AIXG) concerning the Company’s and its officers’ possible violations of federal securities laws.On December 9, 2015, the Company announced that it had reached an agreement with a Chinese customer to reduce the number of AIX R6 MOCVD systems it would deliver to the customer from fifty down to just three already delivered systems. On this news, the Company’s shares fell $3.05, or more than 40%, over two trading days, to close at $4.49 on December 10, 2015, thereby injuring investors.If you purchased Aixtron securities, have information or would like to learn more about these claims, or have any questions concerning this announcement or your rights or interests with respect to these matters, please contact Lesley Portnoy, Esquire, of GPM, 1925 Century Park East, Suite 2100, Los Angeles, California 90067 at 310-201-9150, Toll-Free at 888-773-9224, by email to shareholders@glancylaw.com, or visit our website at http://www.glancylaw.com. If you inquire by email please include your mailing address, telephone number and number of shares purchased.This press release may be considered Attorney Advertising in some jurisdictions under the applicable law and ethical rules. ContactsGlancy Prongay & Murray LLP, Los AngelesLesley Portnoy, 310-201-9150 or 888-773-9224shareholders@glancylaw.comwww.glancylaw.com  









 Retention AgreementThis Retention Agreement governs the retention of Glancy Prongay & Murray LLP (“GPM”) (the “Attorneys”) by those institutions or individuals (the “Client”) who have authorized the Attorneys to prosecute claims arising out of their purchase of Aixtron SE's securities.WHEREAS the Client has authorized the Attorneys to prosecute claims relating to the securities of Aixtron SE (the “Litigation”);WHEREAS the Litigation entails numerous complex factual and legal issues and entails considerable risk;WHEREAS the Litigation requires the expenditure of substantial resources by the Attorneys retained to prosecute the Litigation;WHEREAS the Client seeks to maximize their recovery while limiting the expenditure of their own resources; andNOW, THEREFORE, the Client and the Attorneys AGREE AS FOLLOWS:I. SCOPE OF SERVICES/CASE HANDLINGA. Upon execution by GPM, attorneys are retained to provide legal services for the purpose of seeking damages and other relief in the Litigation. Client provides authorization to seek appointment as Lead Plaintiff in the class action, while the Attorneys will seek to be appointed Class Counsel. If this occurs, the Litigation will be prosecuted as a class action.B. If you obtain access to non-public information during the pendency of the Litigation, you must not engage in transactions in  securities.C. Attorneys are authorized to prosecute the Litigation. The appointed Lead Plaintiffs will monitor, review and participate with counsel in the prosecution of the Litigation. The Attorneys shall consult with the appointed Lead Plaintiffs concerning all major substantive matters related to the Litigation, including, but not limited to, the complaint, dispositive motions and settlement. Because of potential differences of opinion between Clients concerning, among other things, strategy, goals and objectives of the Litigation, the Attorneys shall consult with the appointed Lead Plaintiffs as to the courses of action to pursue. The Client agrees to abide by the decisions of the appointed Lead Plaintiffs, which shall be final and binding on all Clients.D. GPM is given the authority to opt the Client out of any class action proceeding relating to the claims authorized herein and/or pursue the Client claim individually in a group action, if the Client is not appointed Lead Plaintiff and GPM is not appointed Class Counsel.E. The Attorneys shall provide sufficient resources, including attorney time and capital for payment of costs and expenses, to vigorously prosecute the Litigation.F. Any recovery from defendants that the Attorneys are responsible for will be divided among class members based on the recognized loss by each class member as calculated by a damage allocation plan which will be prepared by a financial expert or consultant, provided to the appointed Lead Plaintiffs, be subject to the Court's approval and will account for such factors as size of securities ownership, date of purchase, date of sale and continued holdings, if any. Under the rules governing class action litigation, while the Lead Plaintiffs recover according to the same formula as other class members, the Court may approve, upon application therefore, reimbursement of the Lead Plaintiffs’ reasonable costs and expenses directly related to the representation of the class. Examples are lost wages and travel expenses associated with testifying in the action.II. CONTINGENT FEE AGREEMENTA. The Attorneys shall advance all expenses in the Litigation. The Client is not liable to pay any of the expenses of the Litigation, whether attorneys fees or costs. Recovery of costs and other expenses is contingent upon a recovery being obtained. If no recovery is obtained, Client will owe nothing for costs and other expenses. In the event that an order is entered awarding costs and expenses in favor of defendants, Attorneys will be responsible for such costs and expenses, not the Client. If the Court does not permit the case to proceed as a class action, we will mutually decide whether, and on what basis, the case will continue.B. If there is a recovery in the Litigation, whether by settlement or judgment, the Attorneys shall be compensated via payment of a reasonable percentage of any recovery as approved by the Court, which amount shall include attorneys’ fees plus reasonable disbursements in the Litigation. On behalf of the class and as a class representative, the Client acknowledges that plaintiffs’ counsel may apply for a fee of up to 33 1/3% of the recovery plus disbursements, subject to court approval. “Disbursements” shall include, but not be limited to, costs of travel, telephone, copying, fax transmission, depositions, investigators, messengers, mediation expenses, computer research fees, court fees, expert fees, other consultation fees and paralegal expenses. Any recovery in the Litigation shall first be used to reimburse disbursements.C. In the event that the Litigation is resolved by settlement under terms involving any “in-kind” payment, such as stock, the contingent fee agreement shall apply to such “in-kind” payment.D. In the course of the lawsuit, the Attorneys may retain and/or work with other law firms, in which case, the Attorneys would divide any legal fees we receive with such other firms. You agree that we may divide fees with other attorneys for serving as local counsel, or for referral fees, or other services performed. The division of attorneys’ fees with other counsel may be determined upon a percentage basis or upon time spent in assisting the prosecution of the action. The division of fees with other counsel is the Attorneys’ sole responsibility and will not increase the fees described above.III. GENERAL REQUIREMENTSA. This Agreement may not be assigned by the Attorneys.B. Client agrees to cooperate in the prosecution of the suit including providing documents to substantiate the Client's claim, and to cooperate in providing discovery information, including a deposition if necessary. Client further agrees to preserve any documents relevant to the Litigation that are currently in their possession during the pendency of the Litigation.C. Client agrees that our files and papers compiled in connection with our investigation and prosecution of this matter constitute the work product and property of this firm over which the firm has complete control with respect to its use and/or disclosure.D. Client recognizes that the Attorneys are representing other Aixtron SE investors in the Litigation. The Client agrees that any conflicts caused by such representation are waived.E. GPM agrees to maintain liability insurance which covers its practice in this litigation and to provide evidence of such coverage if requested.IV. TERMINATIONA. Client may terminate this Agreement as to any Attorneys, with or without cause and without penalty, by providing the Attorneys with written notice of termination. Attorneys may terminate this agreement with or without cause and without penalty, by providing client with written notice of termination if the Client fails to cooperate in the prosecution of this action or such other reason as may be approved upon application to the Court.B. If the Attorneys are terminated for any reason, Attorneys shall be entitled (a) to be reimbursed, pursuant to §II above, for reasonable out-of-pocket costs and expenses that they incurred, but only if and when recovery is obtained, and (b) to be paid such compensation as might be payable to them in accordance with this Agreement, but only if and to the extent and at the time compensation is payable to the Attorneys from any recovery in the Litigation pursuant to §II above.V. NOTICEA. All notices to be given by the parties hereto shall be in writing and served by depositing same in the United States Post Office, postage prepaid and registered as follows:TO THE CLIENTThe address set out in the Authorization to File Aixtron SE Claim form.TO ATTORNEYSGlancy Prongay & Murray LLP1925 Century Park East, Suite 2100Los Angeles, California 90067Attention: Robert V. ProngayB. Any actions arising out of this Agreement shall be governed by the laws of the State of California, and shall be brought and maintained in the Los Angeles Superior Court, which shall have exclusive jurisdiction thereof.C. This agreement, along with the signed Certification and Authorization of Named Plaintiff, sets forth the entire Agreement between the parties, and supersedes all other oral or written provisions.  

 

 Aixtron SE shareholders have an opportunity to recover their investment losses. Click here to join this action.















   

 





Cases


Investigations
New Cases
Ongoing Cases
Settled Cases





Call for a free consultation 1-888-773-9224 


 

 
 

 


Disclaimer
Privacy Policy
Sitemap
 



 


    Copyright © Glancy Prongay & Murray LLP 2003-2017. All rights reserved.   



1925 Century Park East, Suite 2100 Los Angeles, CA 90067phone: (310) 201-9150toll-free: (888) 773-9224info@glancylaw.com 




 
 













Product Portfolio :: AIXTRON















Deutsch 汉语 한국말 日本語 漢語

















Quality guaranteeMaterial categoriesProduct PortfolioTechnologiesApplications











Our market expertise is your recipe for successTo date, AIXTRON has delivered more than 2,000 deposition systems to customers around the world. We have also enhanced existing technologies and take pride that our comprehensive expertise and many years of experience in the deposition of complex semiconductor materials have served as a foundation for many of customers’ success.




Production Systems




Compound Semiconductors



MOCVD


Applying this production methodology, the source materials (which are metal-organic compounds) are transported by way of a carrier gas and gradually supplied to the reactor. A complex chemical reaction results in thin semiconductor layers. The introduced gases are of a very high purity and can be exceptionally well dosed, which enables the film growth to be precisely controlled.



Planetary Reactor


The Planetary Reactor is based on the principle of a horizontal laminar flow reactor. The laminar flow principle ensures extremely precise transitions between different materials, and an unparalleled control over the deposition rates for films that are only a few atoms thick. AIX G5+ for GaN on 200 mm SiAIX G5+ C for GaN on 150/200 mm SiAIX G5 HT-TM AIX 2800G4-TM 


Close Coupled Showerhead


Applying this technology, the process gases are introduced vertically over the entire coating surface in the reactor via the water-cooled showerhead surface. The gas flow into the reactor is designed in such a manner that the Group III and Group V gases are separated until they enter the reactor (by many small narrow tubes at the showerhead inlet). This technology ensures an unmatched level of reproducibility. AIX R6  


SiC Planetary Reactor


For semiconductor properties, Silicon carbide stands out especially when it comes to power rectifiers, as well as switches for converting and distributing electricity. The Planetary Reactor enables several 4- or 6-inch, or 200 mm SiC wafers to be coated at the same time. AIX G5 WW 








Silicon Semiconductors



ALD


Atomic layer deposition is a process for manufacturing ultrathin films for semiconductor components and future non-semiconductor applications. QXP 8300 ALD (Brochure)QXP 8300 ALD (FLyer) QXP 8300 NVM 



CVD/(PE)CVD


Applying this methodology, the deposition of thin films takes place by means of chemical reactions, in which the wafers are exposed to a gas mixture that reacts on the wafer surface. The process can also be plasma-enhanced. LYNX-iXP 







Organic Semiconductors



OVPD


Organic Vapor Phase Deposition (OVPD) is an innovative technology for the thin-film deposition of organic “small molecules,” based on the principle of gas phase transport. When combined with AIXTRON’s patented Close Coupled Showerhead technology, the process can be scaled to any degree and any substrate dimensions. Compared to conventional vapor processes, the gas phase transport allows for more precise control of the deposition rates and thus greater flexibility in manufacturing complex structures. OVPD-200 



PVPD


Polymer Vapor Phase Deposition (PVPD) is a technology for the controlled gas-phase deposition and in situ cross-linking of polymer-based thin-film structures.
When combined with AIXTRON’s patented Close Coupled Showerhead technology, the process is scalable to any degree and can be used for any substrate dimensions. Compared to conventional vapor processes, the gas phase transport allows for more precise control of the deposition rates and thus the creation of new materials through targeted copolymerization, for example. PVPD PRODOS-200 







Nanotechnology



(PE)CVD


AIXTRON‘s BM systems can operate in both thermal CVD and plasma-enhanced CVD modes, which is extremely important for controlling the structure of nanomaterials as it enables virtually all variations and morphologies of carbon nanotubes and graphene to be produced. Our systems feature fast ramp rates, automatic recipe execution, excellent uniformity and reproducibility for nanomaterial growth. The systems are based on the highly scalable showerhead concept and are available for wafer-sizes from 50mm to 300mm diameter. BM 300 










R&D Systems




Compound Semiconductors



MOCVD


Applying this production methodology, the source materials (which are metal-organic compounds) are transported by way of a carrier gas and gradually supplied to the reactor. A complex chemical reaction results in thin semiconductor layers. The introduced gases are of a very high purity and can be exceptionally well dosed, which enables the film growth to be precisely controlled.Close Coupled Showerhead 3x2 inch – 6x2 inch 







Silicon Semiconductors



ALD


Atomic layer deposition is a process for manufacturing ultrathin films for semiconductor components and future non-semiconductor applications.



(PE)CVD


Applying this methodology, the deposition of thin films takes place by means of chemical reactions, in which the wafers are exposed to a gas mixture that reacts on the wafer surface. The process can also be plasma-enhanced. BM II BM Pro BM 300 







Organic Semiconductors



OVPD


Organic Vapor Phase Deposition (OVPD) is an innovative technology for the thin-film deposition of organic “small molecules,” based on the principle of gas phase transport. When combined with AIXTRON’s patented Close Coupled Showerhead technology, the process can be scaled to any degree and any substrate dimensions. Compared to conventional vapor processes, the gas phase transport allows for more precise control of the deposition rates and thus greater flexibility in manufacturing complex structures. OVPD-200 



PVPD


Polymer Vapor Phase Deposition (PVPD) is a technology for the controlled gas-phase deposition and in situ cross-linking of polymer-based thin-film structures.When combined with AIXTRON’s patented Close Coupled Showerhead technology, the process is scalable to any degree and can be used for any substrate dimensions. Compared to conventional vapor processes, the gas phase transport allows for more precise control of the deposition rates and thus the creation of new materials through targeted copolymerization, for example. PVPD PRODOS-200 



PECVD


OPTACAP (TM)The patented OPTACAP™ technology offers an innovative plasma-enhanced CVD approach based on linear plasma sources. It provides high growth rates at very low temperatures.
The enabling features of the proprietary source are: Linear pre-activation region providing very high activation, thus resulting in high utilization of source gases and facilitating high deposition rates. Unique and patent-pending microstructure of the deposited film forming a high-quality flexible encapsulation film. The OPTACAP™ technology achieves very high deposition rates, yielding highly productive deposition of dense inorganic film with excellent barrier capability and extraordinary flexibility.
OPTACAP-200







Nanotechnology



CVD/(PE)CVD


AIXTRON‘s BM systems can operate in both thermal CVD and plasma-enhanced CVD modes, which is extremely important for controlling the structure of nanomaterials as it enables virtually all variations and morphologies of carbon nanotubes and graphene to be produced. Our systems feature fast ramp rates, automatic recipe execution, excellent uniformity and reproducibility for nanomaterial growth. The systems are based on the highly scalable showerhead concept and are available for wafer-sizes from 50mm to 300mm diameter.
Flyer Graphene and 2D/1DBrochure BM Systems























CompanyAbout AIXTRONCompany PrinciplesArticles of AssociationHistoryManagementExecutive BoardSupervisory BoardResearch and developmentOngoing research projectsCompleted research projectsLocationsTechnology and marketsCustomers and referencesSuppliersProcurementQualityLogisticsComplianceSpecific topicsProductsQuality guaranteeMaterial categoriesProduct PortfolioTechnologiesApplicationsServiceCustomer serviceUpgradesRequest for QuotationSpare partsTrainingTraining coursesApplication formService contactInvestorsFinancial newsArchive 2016Archive 2015Archive 2014Archive 2013Archive 2012Archive 2011Archive 2010Archive 2009Archive 2008Archive 2007EventsAnnual General MeetingAnnual General Meeting 2017ArchiveAnnual General Meeting 2016Annual General Meeting 2015Annual General Meeting 2014Annual General Meeting 2013Annual General Meeting 2012Annual General Meeting 2011Annual General Meeting 2010Annual General Meeting 2009Annual General Meeting 2008Annual General Meeting 2007Conference CallArchiveFinancial ReportsArchiveIR PresentationArchiveShareBasic DataIPO DataCapital MeasuresResearch CoverageCorporate GovernancePrinciplesDirectors' DealingsArchiveVoting rightsArchiveTotal voting rightsCode of EthicsCode of ConductConflict Minerals RegulationsU.S.-ListingsAmerican Depositary Receipts (ADR) ProgramForm 20-FForm SDFAQFAQ − ADRFAQ − SEFAQ − Conversion to Registered SharesContactCareersThis is AIXTRONGetting started at AIXTRONContact usWorking for usHigh school studentsUniversity studentsTraineesEntry-level hiresCandidates with professional experience5 tips to getting a jobJob vacanciesOnline applicationPressPress releasesArchive 2016Archive 2015Archive 2014Archive 2013Archive 2012Archive 2011Archive 2010Archive 2009Archive 2008Archive 2007Event calendarMedia CenterVideosPhotosContactContact form24/7 Technical Support LineContact personsDirectionsDeutsch 汉语 한국말 日本語 漢語Top
































AIXTRON  - Annual Report 2016 - Group Management Report































Annual Report 2016




DE|
 |
 |
 












Home


Introduction


Corporate governance


Management Report


Financial Statements


Service









◄ back
	
 /
	
		next ►










The AIXTRON Share»


Group Management Report»






Quickfinder
Company Profile
At a Glance
Letter to the Shareholders
Supervisory Board Report
Corporate Governance Report

Consolidated Income Statement
Consolidated Statement of other Comprehensive Income
Consolidated Statement of Financial Position
Consolidated Statement of Cash Flow
Consolidated Statement of Changes in Equity



History




 My Annual Report


Store page


My Annual Report (0)




SERVICE


 Recommend page


Quick Analyzer



Print

Download Center

Feedback


Help







Group Management Report

Group Management Report as of December 31, 2016

    This Management Report relates to the Consolidated Financial Statements of AIXTRON SE including the following subsidiaries (collectively referred to as “AIXTRON”, “the AIXTRON Group”, “the Group” or “the Company”):         AIXTRON, Inc., Sunnyvale, California (USA); AIXTRON Ltd., Cambridge (United Kingdom); AIXTRON Korea Co. Ltd., Hwasung (South Korea); AIXTRON China Ltd., Shanghai (PR of China); AIXTRON KK, Tokyo (Japan) and AIXTRON Taiwan Co. Ltd., Hsinchu (Taiwan).

 
    The Consolidated Financial Statements of the Company have been prepared in accordance with International Financial Reporting Standards (IFRS) as adopted by the EU. All financial information contained in this Management Report, including comparable prior year numbers, is reported in accordance with IFRS. Further information about the adherence to reporting standards is contained in section “Significant Accounting Policies” of the notes to the Consolidated Financial Statements.


    Due to rounding, numbers presented throughout this report may not add up precisely to the totals indicated and percentages may not precisely reflect the absolute figures for the same reason.


Forward-Looking Statements


        This document may contain forward-looking statements regarding the business, results of operations, financial condition and earnings outlook of AIXTRON. These statements may be identified by words such as “may”, “will”, “expect”, “anticipate”, “contemplate”, “intend”, “plan”, “believe”, “continue” and “estimate” and variations of such words or similar expressions. These forward-looking statements are based on our current assessments, expectations and assumptions, of which many are beyond control of AIXTRON, and are subject to risks and uncertainties. You should not place undue reliance on these forward-looking statements. Should these risks or uncertainties materialize, or should underlying expectations not occur or assumptions prove incorrect, actual results, performance or achievements of AIXTRON may materially vary from those described explicitly or implicitly in the relevant forward-looking statement. This could result from a variety of factors, such as actual customer orders received by AIXTRON, the level of demand for deposition technology in the market, the timing of final acceptance of products by customers, the condition of financial markets and access to financing for AIXTRON, general conditions in the market for deposition plants and macroeconomic conditions, cancellations, rescheduling or delays in product shipments, production capacity constraints, extended sales and qualification cycles, difficulties in the production process, the general development in the semi-conductor industry, increased competition, fluctuations in exchange rates, availability of public funding, fluctuations and/or changes in interest rates, delays in developing and marketing new products, a deterioration of the general economic situation and any other factors discussed in any reports or other announcements , in particular in the chapter Risks in the Annual Report, filed by AIXTRON. Any forward-looking statements contained in this document are based on current expectations and projections of the executive board based on information available the date hereof. AIXTRON undertakes no obligation to revise or update any forward-looking statements as a result of new information, future events or otherwise, unless expressly required to do so by law.
This document is an English language translation of a document in German language. In case of discrepancies, the German language document shall prevail and shall be the valid version.
Our registered trademarks: AIXACT®, AIXTRON®, Atomic Level SolutionS®, Close Coupled Showerhead®, CRIUS®, Gas Foil Rotation®, Optacap™, OVPD®, Planetary Reactor®, PVPD®, TriJet®




1. Fundamental Information about the Group

1.1. Organizational Structure

The table below shows a list of the AIXTRON subsidiaries as of December 31, 2016:



Name
Jurisdiction of Incorporation
Ownership Interest in %

AIXTRON Ltd.
England & Wales
100

AIXTRON Korea Co. Ltd.
South Korea
100

AIXTRON KK
Japan
100

AIXTRON China Ltd.
China
100

AIXTRON Taiwan Co. Ltd.
Taiwan
100

AIXTRON, Inc.
USA
100

AIXTRON AB (in liquidation)
Sweden
100




 


1.2. Management and Control


            As of December 31, 2016, AIXTRON’s Executive Board (Management) consisted of the following two individuals:
        



Name
Position
First Appointment
End of Term
Martin Goetzeler
Chairman, President and
Chief Executive Officer
March 1, 2013
February 28, 2017
Dr. Bernd Schulte
Executive Vice President and
Chief Operating Officer
April 1, 2002
March 31, 2018






            As of December 31, 2016, AIXTRON’s Supervisory Board consisted of the following six individuals:
        



Name
Position
Member since
End of Term

Kim Schindelhauer1)2)3)4)5)
Chairman of the Supervisory Board
2002
AGM 2019

Prof. Dr. Wolfgang Blättchen1)4)
Deputy Chairman of the Supervisory Board, Chairman of the Audit Committee, Independent Financial Expert6)
1998
AGM 2019


Dr. Andreas Biagosch2)
 
2013
AGM 2021
Prof. Dr. Petra Denk2)3)
Chair of the Technology Committee
2011
AGM 2021

Dr. Martin Komischke

2013
AGM 2021

Prof. Dr. Rüdiger von Rosen1)3)
Chairman of the Nomination Committee
2002
AGM 2017

1) Member of the Audit Committee


2) Member of the Technology Committee


3) Member of the Nomination Committee


4) Member of the Capital Market Committee


5) Former AIXTRON Executive Board Member


6) Since 2005






		On January 20, 2017, AIXTRON announced that Martin Goetzeler will leave the Company effective February 28, 2017. AIXTRON Supervisory Board Chairman Kim Schindelhauer will become interim CEO and will take over Mr. Goetzeler´s tasks effective March 1, 2017. Professor Dr. Wolfgang Blättchen, current deputy chairman of the Supervisory Board, will take over as chair of the Supervisory Board during Mr. Schindelhauer's work as CEO of the company.
		
      
  Information to the collaboration between Supervisory and Executive Boards of AIXTRON SE as well as to the management procedures and corporate governance are explained in the Corporate Governance Report which is available on the AIXTRON website under www.aixtron.com/en/investors/corporate-governance/.
  



1.3. Locations 


        The Company has its registered office in Herzogenrath, Germany, and had a total of 13 facilities worldwide owned or rented as of December 31, 2016:
        



Facility location
Use
Approx. size (m²)
Lease expiry

Herzogenrath, Germany (owned)
Manufacturing, sublease
12,457
-

Herzogenrath, Germany (owned)
Headquarters, R&D, Manufacturing, Engineering
16,000
-

Aachen, Germany (leased)
R&D
200
02/28/2017

Cambridge, UK (leased)
Manufacturing, Engineering, R&D
2,180
09/13/2019

Cambridge, UK (leased)
Service, Engineering
696
06/27/2020

Sunnyvale, CA, USA (leased)
Manufacturing, Sales, Service, Engineering, R&D
9,338
10/31/2017

Hwasung, South Korea (leased)
Sales, Service
1,151
08/09/2020

PyongTak, South Korea (leased)
Service
98
11/30/2018

Shanghai, China (leased)
Sales, Service
594
08/31/2018

Suzhou, China (leased)
Application Laboratory
537
12/31/2017

Hsinchu, Taiwan (leased)
Sales, Service
988
12/31/2017

Tainan, Taiwan (leased)
Service
109
05/27/2017
Tokyo, Japan (leased)
Sales, Service
364
09/30/2018






1.4. Business Model


        AIXTRON is a leading provider of deposition equipment to the semiconductor industry. The Company’s technology solutions are used by a diverse range of customers worldwide to build advanced components for electronic and optoelectronic applications based on compound, silicon or organic semiconductor materials. These include LED applications, display technologies, data storage, data transmission, energy management, storage and conversion, communication, signaling and lighting, as well as a range of other leading-edge applications.
        

        AIXTRON’s business activities include developing, producing and installing equipment for the deposition of semiconductor and other complex materials, process engineering, consulting and training, including ongoing customer support and after-sales service. AIXTRON also offers a comprehensive range of peripheral equipment and services.
        

        AIXTRON supplies its customers with both production-scale material deposition systems and small scale systems for Research & Development (R&D) or small scale production.
        

        Demand for AIXTRON’s products is driven by increased processing speed, improved efficiency, energy storage and energy efficiency requirements and the necessity to reduce the cost of ownership for current and emerging microelectronic and optoelectronic components. The ability of AIXTRON’s products to precisely deposit thin material films and the ability to control critical surface dimensions in these components, enables manufacturers to improve performance, yield and quality in the fabrication process of advanced microelectronic and optoelectronic devices
        

        Environmental protection and the responsible use of resources are an essential part of AIXTRON’s business strategy. The Company’s engineers work on improving AIXTRON’s systems continuously, both in terms of resource conservation and environmental-friendly design and function. 
        

        Since 2014, the energy management system of AIXTRON SE has been certified according to ISO 50001. Also since 2014 the environmental management system at AIXTRON, Inc. has been certified according to ISO 14001. Both systems contribute to the efficient use of energy and the careful use of resources.
            Please refer to chapter “Risk Report” for potential factors that could adversely affect the Company’s business activities, model and strategy going forward.
        



1.5. Technology and Products


        AIXTRON’s product range includes customer-specific systems capable of depositing material films on a diverse range of different substrate sizes and materials.
        

        The deposition technologies for opto and power electronics include Metal-Organic Chemical Vapor Deposition (”MOCVD”) for the deposition of compound materials to produce for instance LEDs, power electronics or other optoelectronic components. 
        

        For thin film deposition technologies for organic electronics applications including Organic Light Emitting Diodes (OLED), AIXTRON offers Polymer Vapor Phase Deposition (PVPD) and Organic Vapor Phase Deposition (OVPD). For thin film encapsulation, AIXTRON offers a Plasma Enhanced Chemical Vapor Phase Deposition (PECVD) technology. PECVD is also being employed for the deposition of complex Carbon Nanostructures (Carbon Nanotubes, Nanowires or Graphene). 
        

       For logic and memory applications, AIXTRON systems are capable of depositing material films on wafers of up to 300mm in diameter for the production of memory chips, by employing technologies such as: Chemical Vapor Deposition (CVD) and Atomic Layer Deposition (ALD). Additionally, MOCVD technology is applied to deposit compound materials for the development of future logic devices.
        

        The following table summarizes the products and technologies AIXTRON offers to its customers for use in specific applications and devices:
        



Technologies
Technologies for opto & power electronics applications
Technologies for organic and carbon nano applications
Technologies for logic & memory applications

Deposition Technologies
MOCVD
OVPD®
CVD

 

PVPD®
ALD
 
 
OPTACAP™
PECVD
MOCVD

 

CVD/PECVD


Products
Planetary Reactor®
AIX G5+C
AIX G5 WW
AIX 2800G4-TM
OVPD® R&D and Production Systems
Lynx-iXP CVD

 
Close Coupled Showerhead®
AIX R6
CCS FT R&D
PRODOS PVPD® R&D and Production Systems
QXP-8300 ALD Metal
QXP-8300 ALD Oxide

 

OPTACAP™ R&D and Production Systems
EXP MOCVD
 
 
Nano CVD Reactors BM Series
CRIUS® R MOCVD
 
 
 
 

Potential Applications/Devices
LEDs
OLEDs for displays
CVD WSi Gate stacks for 2D and 3D NAND 

 
Optoelectronics (photo diodes, lasers, modulators for telecom/datacom)
OLEDs for solid state lighting
DRAM Gate and Capacitor Metal Nitride, DRAM Capacitor high k Dielectric

 
Laser devices for consumer electronics (CDs, DVDs)
Organic transparent thin film solar cells
2D and 3D NAND high k IPD (Inter Poly Dielectric) and Blocking Oxide

 
High-Frequency devices (such as Hetero Bipolar Transistors and High Electron Mobility Transistors) for wireless datacom
Electronic semiconductor structures, e.g. for flexible displays
ReRAM and PCRAM Material and Electrode

 
Silicon Carbide (SiC) based High Power Devices
Functional polymer layers
Logic and MIM high k Gate stack and Metal

 
Gallium Nitride (GaN) based Power Devices
Dielectric or passivating polymer layers
III-V High Mobility Device for Logic Devices

 
Solar cells
Carbon Nanostructures for electronic, energy storage, display & heat sink applications
III-V based Nanowire, TFET and Optical Interconnect

 

Graphene structures for electronic applications


 
 






        AIXTRON is constantly working on the improvement of existing technologies and products. In the course of the last three years, AIXTRON has introduced several new system generations and technologies, such as the automated AIX G5+C for opto & power electronics applications. 
        



1.6. Research and Development


       In addition to the state-of-the-art R&D center at its headquarters in Herzogenrath, AIXTRON also operates R&D laboratories in Aachen (Germany), in Cambridge (United Kingdom) and in Sunnyvale (United States). These in-house laboratories are equipped with AIXTRON systems and are used to research and develop new equipment, materials and processes for the production of semiconductor structures. 
        

        AIXTRON’s R&D activities in 2016 included development programs for new products as well as continual improvement programs for AIXTRON’s existing products. Design-to-Cost-activities have been implemented for numerous R&D projects in order to reduce material costs on a continuous basis e.g. by improving the design of externally procured components. AIXTRON is also working on customer-specific development projects and often does research within the framework of publicly funded projects. 
        

        The Company’s R&D capability remains of important strategic significance, as it provides for a competitive, leading edge technology portfolio and supports the future business development. Therefore, AIXTRON is committed to investing specifically in research and development projects to not only further pursue the Company’s leading technology position in MOCVD equipment for applications such as specialty-LEDs and for the production of wide band gap materials for Power Electronics or next generation logic & memory applications. AIXTRON also targets to penetrate growth areas in the field of Organic Semiconductors. The Company's R&D activities in fiscal year 2016 were focused on the improvement of existing tools and the development work for next generation MOCVD technologies. These expenditures are monitored very closely. The Company's R&D program in 2016 comprised a team of an average of 252 highly skilled R&D employees (2015: 265; 2014: 285). 
        
 
        For more information regarding R&D expenses from 2014 through 2016, refer to “Development of Results” in this report.
        
 
        The following provides specific examples of AIXTRON's research and development activities in fiscal year 2016:
        

        Recent examples of R&D activities are the “PeroBOOST” project investigates the development of solar cells from perovskites and the “HEA2D” project to investigate the production, qualities, and applications of 2D nanomaterials. In a three-year “PeroBOOST” project, AIXTRON collaborates with a consortium of research institutions with aims to develop the basis for innovative and efficient solar cells utilizing the recently discovered superb properties of organo perovskite materials. In addition to being expected to involve lower costs, this technology also opens up a variety of novel future applications due to its manufacturability on flexible substrates. The joint project HEA2D with five partners is now researching various deposition processes for 2D materials, processes for transfer onto plastic foils, and mass integration into plastics components. When integrated into mass production processes, 2D materials have the potential to create integrated and systematic product and production solutions that are sustainable in social, economic, and ecological terms. One focus of AIXTRON’s subproject involves researching processes and systems technology for the deposition of optically active 2D semiconductor materials such as molybdenum sulfide or graphene.
        



1.7. Patents


        AIXTRON aims to secure its technology by patenting and protecting inventions, provided it is strategically expedient and possible for the Company to do so. As of December 31, 2016, the Company had 207 patent families available (December 31, 2015: 189 patent families). For 20 patent families, patent protection was applied for within fiscal year 2016. Patent protection for inventions is usually applied for in those sales markets relevant for AIXTRON, specifically in Europe, China, Japan, South Korea, Taiwan and the United States. Patents are maintained and renewed annually and will expire between 2017 and 2036. AIXTRON pursues a continuous assessment of its intellectual property.
        
 
       AIXTRON also has exclusive and non-exclusive licenses to patents owned by others covering certain AIXTRON’s products.
        

       AIXTRON is the licensee of certain patents owned by Centre National de la Recherche Scientifique and Universal Display Corporation which are important to the Company’s operations in the fields of complex material deposition. AIXTRON sells certain reactor technologies under the terms of those licenses, which apply to the principles of delivering precursor material into a vacuum vapor deposition chamber. 
        



1.8. Manufacturing and Procurement


        The AIXTRON Manufacturing operation is involved in the final assembly stage of production, including equipment configuration and tuning as well as the final inspection. The Company purchases all of the components and most of the assemblies required to manufacture the equipment from third-party suppliers and contractors. AIXTRON’s contractors and suppliers are carefully selected and qualified to be able to source, supply and/or partially assemble and test individual equipment parts and sub-assemblies. For strategic reasons, there are typically several suppliers for each AIXTRON equipment component/assembly. However, AIXTRON single sources some key components for its systems and is therefore dependent on contracts with the specific supplier of such components. AIXTRON’s own staff manages the whole manufacturing process and in conjunction with external contractors executes the final manufacturing and testing steps.   
        

       All AIXTRON manufacturing facilities have an ISO 9001 certified process oriented quality management system. During 2016, the certification was confirmed at AIXTRON SE following a successful certification audit without any deviations. During 2016, external auditors also confirmed the certification at AIXTRON, Ltd as well as at AIXTRON, Inc. 
Since 2014, the energy management system of AIXTRON SE has been certified according to ISO 50001. Also since 2014 the environmental management system at AIXTRON, Inc. has been certified according to ISO 14001. Both systems contribute to the efficient use of energy and the careful use of resources.  
        

The Company complies with national and international standards and procedures for the equipment industry that are applicable to AIXTRON products.
        

        The “CE” marking confirms the conformity of AIXTRON products with the applicable European directives and standards. Moreover, relevant US American standards for admission of AIXTRON products to the US market and the recommended requirements of the SEMI organization are also complied with. When developing new AIXTRON products, among other things, the European Directive RoHS “Restriction of Hazardous Substances” is strictly adhered to. The certifications from independent institutions, such as “TÜV” and “ETL” also confirm compliance of AIXTRON’s products with national and international requirements and specifications.
        

       AIXTRON commits itself and its suppliers to ethical and moral standards for the purchase and usage of conflict minerals (gold, tantalum, tin and tungsten). AIXTRON is continuously striving for transparency regarding the origin of these minerals.
        



1.9. Sales and Service


        The AIXTRON Group markets and sells its products worldwide, principally through its own direct sales organization, but also through appointed dealers and sales representatives. 
        

        AIXTRON’s own Sales and Service Organization provides a full range of customer services, from the initial support of the customized development of an AIXTRON system, through to the final installation and the ongoing customer training as well as the operational support of its systems (after-sales service). 
        

        Through the deployment of specialized key account managers supporting AIXTRON customers with the target to improve their competitiveness, customer relationships were enhanced.
        



1.10 Employees


        AIXTRON’s success very much depends on the achievements and motivation of the Company’s staff. The employees are recruited on the basis of professional and personal qualifications and experience. Apart from the direct advertising of job opportunities to attract new employees, AIXTRON regularly participates in job fairs and other career events, has local press coverage, and enjoys close collaborative relationships with universities worldwide, including the RWTH Aachen University and the University of Cambridge.
        
 
       As a global Company with an international corporate culture, AIXTRON places great value on diversity and sees it also as a competitive advantage. The overall aim is to create a productive work environment, to prevent social discrimination of any kind, and to cultivate equal opportunities.
        

       As part of its innovation management process, AIXTRON has an employee suggestion scheme to encourage all employees to submit their ideas to improve the Company, for instance with ideas to improve processes or products or to, save cost, etc. In 2016, a total of 97 ideas were accepted/implemented.
        

        Management and leadership quality of an organization also have great impact on the success of a company. AIXTRON promotes these qualities within a specific leadership program, coaching members of the management team in management and team building techniques. 
        

       In 2016, the total number of employees decreased by 6%, from 748 employees at the end of 2015 (2014: 789) to 705 at December 31, 2016. Manufacturing & Service as well as R&D positions still comprise the largest group of permanent employees. 
        



Employees by Function
2016
2015
2014
2016-2015

 
Dec-31
%
Dec-31
%
Dec-31
%
abs.
%

Sales
58
8
62
8
65
8
-4
-6

Research & Development
250
35
257
34
292
37
-7
-3

Manufacturing & Service
301
43
323
44
322
41
-22
-7

Administration
96
14
106
14
110
14
-10
-9

Total
705
100
748
100
789
100
-43
-6




       As of December 31, 2016, the majority of AIXTRON’s worldwide permanent employees were, as in previous years, based in Europe.
        



Employees by Region
2016
2015
2014
2016-2015

 
Dec-31
%
Dec-31
%
Dec-31
%
abs.
%

Asia
116
16
138
18
154
20
-22
-16

Europe
455
65
475
64
521
66
-20
-4

USA
134
19
135
18
114
14
-1
-1

Total
705
100
748
100
789
100
-43
-6






1.11. Customers and Geographic Regions


        Among other areas of activity, AIXTRON's semiconductor device customers are engaged in the manufacturing of LEDs, lasers, wireless devices, power electronics, other optoelectronic devices, as well as logic and memory chips. Some of these customers are vertically integrated device manufacturers who serve the entire value chain down to the end consumer. Others are independent component suppliers who deliver chips and components produced on AIXTRON equipment to the next link in the value chain, namely, the electronic device manufacturers. The Company's customers also include research centers and universities. Most of the world’s leading electronic device manufacturers produce in Asia and consequently, the majority of AIXTRON sales continue to be delivered into this region.
        
 
        See also “Development of Revenues” for a breakdown of revenues by technology and region.
        



1.12. Competitive Positioning


        AIXTRON’s main competitor in MOCVD applications remains Veeco Instruments Inc. (USA) (Veeco). AIXTRON also competes with a number of Asian manufacturers including Taiyo Nippon Sanso (Japan). Additional companies continue to attempt to qualify their own MOCVD tools with customers. For example, Jusung Engineering Co. Ltd. (South Korea) or Nuflare Technology Inc. (Japan) are known to have been active in the development of in-house equipment solutions for the production of LEDs. Certain Chinese companies, such as Advanced Micro-Fabrication Equipment Inc. or Tang Optoelectronics Equipment (Shanghai) Corporation Limited are working on the qualification of MOCVD equipment, supported by respective government initiatives.
        

        Based on the latest published market share research by Gartner Dataquest (Forecast: Semiconductor Manufacturing Equipment, Worldwide, April 2016), it was estimated that the share of the worldwide MOCVD equipment market (estimated 2015 total market value: USD 336 million) held by AIXTRON in 2015 was around 37%. Particularly due to stronger demand from opto- and power electronic applications, the market share is expected to increase again significantly in 2016. In the same report, the Company’s strongest competitor in terms of sales, Veeco Instruments Inc., had an estimated market share of approximately 59%. Viewed in the mid- to long-term, AIXTRON continues to target retaining a market leading position in the global MOCVD market 
        

        For CVD-, MOCVD- and ALD-technologies for Silicon applications, AIXTRON competes with a variety of other equipment companies, including LAM Research, Inc. (USA), Applied Materials, Inc. (USA), Tokyo Electron Ltd. (Japan), ASM International N.V. (Netherlands), IPS Technology (South Korea), Jusung Engineering Co. Ltd. (South Korea), and Hitachi Kokusai Electric Co. Inc. (Japan). With the Company’s currently available silicon semiconductor manufacturing technologies and thin film processes, AIXTRON is potentially well positioned to offer advanced films for 18nm node and below for Memory and Logic Integrated Circuits (ICs). AIXTRON technologies enable extremely high precision in depositing very thin material layers and facilitate the consistent coating of complex three-dimensional microelectronic device structures. Moreover, they offer new material deposition possibilities for next generation semiconductor devices, and, in AIXTRON’s opinion, present high development potential for the future.
        

       However, as AIXTRON only addresses a specific niche, market share of the total Silicon Semiconductor market is not considered meaningful at this point in time.
        

        For emerging Organic Semiconductor applications, AIXTRON competes with established manufacturers such as Ulvac, Inc. (Japan), Tokki Corporation (Japan), SNU Precision (South Korea), Sunic System (South Korea) and a number of other smaller companies. While these competitors use the vacuum thermal evaporation (VTE) or polymer technologies to produce OLEDs, AIXTRON offers OLED manufacturers its own highly innovative OVPD® and PVPD® large area deposition technologies. In AIXTRON’s opinion, due to a perceived superior process technology enabling a reduction of OLED manufacturing costs, these technologies have the potential to compete successfully with VTE and polymer technologies, especially in the field of large area displays. AIXTRON is positioning itself as an alternative deposition system supplier for next generation OLEDs and large area deposition applications such as displays, future lighting, solar cells, and other electronic OLED applications.
        

        For thin film encapsulation applications, AIXTRON’s PECVD technology competes with manufacturers such as Ulvac, Inc. (Japan), SNU Precision (South Korea), Applied Materials Inc. (USA) and a number of other smaller companies applying PECVD or ALD technology. 
        

       As AIXTRON’s organic material deposition and encapsulation technologies as well as most customer applications are still in the market entry phase, Organic Semiconductor market share information is considered not meaningful at this point in time.
        



1.13. Financial and Non-Financial Performance Indicators


        The Executive Board has implemented dedicated control systems and procedures to manage, monitor, analyze, and document Company risks and opportunities, including a key performance indicator system addressing relevant product groups, with a primary focus on the “Market”, “Finance” and “Technology Development” control areas.
        

        In the “Market” control area, using third party reports and direct customer dialog, AIXTRON pursues a customer- and market-led product development strategy through the careful examination of market trends and customer requirements. The objective of this strategy is to ensure the timely market availability of new and appropriately competitive product generations in line with customer requirements.
        

       In the “Finance” control area, the Executive Board uses a range of internal and external financial and non-financial performance indicators with particular focus on: order intake, revenues, margin contributions, EBIT, EBITDA and free cash flow. The objective of these controls is to ensure that profitable revenue growth is matched with cost and asset efficiency to achieve sustainable value generation.
        

        In the “Technology Development” control area, the Executive Board again uses a range of performance indicators to evaluate the progress of key research and development projects. The Management regularly reviews compliance with project plans, pre-defined targets and quality gates, such as timelines, quality, cost and margin targets. Following the release of new products for example, the Management monitors closely the development of the respective revenues and related returns. The objective of this review process is to ensure that ongoing technological developments retain not only the necessary level of technological standards but also commercial competitiveness throughout the life of the product.
        



1.14. Government Regulation


        Due to the nature of AIXTRON’s products, the shipment of some products to customers in certain countries requires the Company to obtain an export license from statutory authorities in Germany, the UK and the US, including, for example, the Bundesamt für Wirtschaft und Ausfuhrkontrolle, BAFA in Germany, the Department for International Trade in the UK as well as the Department of State and the Department of Commerce in the US. 
        

        Research and development activities, as well as the manufacturing and demonstration of the Company’s products involve the use of potentially harmful chemical and hazardous materials and radioactive compounds and as a result, AIXTRON is subject to stringent environmental and safety regulations in connection with its business operations (such as industrial safety regulations, the ordinance on hazardous substances, labor protection laws or the workplaces ordinance).
        

        The Company is also subject to other regulations, for example the provisions of the US Foreign Corrupt Practices Act and the UK Bribery Act relating to the maintenance of books and records and anti-bribery controls. AIXTRON has an anti-corruption guideline in place which is mandatory for every AIXTRON employee.
        


2. Report on Economic Position

2.1. Global Economy


        As a producer of capital goods, AIXTRON could be affected by the global economic development as far as it could have an effect on its own supply chain and cost of sales as well as on its customers' sales projections and therefore also on their investment behavior.
        

       Global economic development remained subdued throughout the year 2016 with growth in the advanced economies, especially the United States, slowing down significantly and the unexpected Brexit vote adding another remarkable risk to future growth perspectives. In its World Economic Outlook Update, published January 16, 2017, the International Monetary Fund (IMF) projected global growth in 2016 slightly below the previous year's level at an estimated 3.1% (2015: 3.2%), with growth in the advanced economies for 2016 being forecast at 1.6% (2015: 2.1%) and in the emerging and developing countries at 4.1% (2015: 4.1%). 
        

        However, this global economic environment had no specific effects on AIXTRON's business development in fiscal year 2016 as AIXTRON is more dependent on innovation-driven industry business cycles such as the progressing technology changes in semiconductor markets.
        

       Growth figures from the U.S. which fell short of expectations and a correspondingly cautious monetary policy by the Federal Reserve saw a slightly weakening US dollar throughout most of the year 2016. Only towards the end of the year, triggered by a new interest rate increase, the US dollar surged to a year-high of 1.038 USD/EUR. The year-end exchange rate on December 31, 2016 was 1.055 USD/EUR compared to 1.089 USD/EUR; an increase of approximately 3%. The average exchange rate used by AIXTRON to translate income and expenses denominated in US dollars in fiscal year 2016 was 1.11 USD/EUR (Q1/2016: 1.09 USD/EUR; Q2/2016: 1.13 USD/EUR; Q3/2016: 1.11 USD/EUR; Q4/2016: 1.09 USD/EUR) which was stable compared to the previous year (2015: 1.11 USD/EUR). 
       

       AIXTRON Management continues to carefully monitor the developments of the global economy and the financial markets, and regularly examines what can potentially be done to mitigate negative exogenous effects on AIXTRON’s business. 
        



2.2. The Semiconductor Equipment Market


        The total ALD market of which AIXTRON addresses only a specific niche with its system technologies, was estimated by Gartner Dataquest in its latest forecast of December 2016 (Forecast: Semiconductor Manufacturing Equipment, Worldwide, 4Q16 Update) to be valued at USD 1,028 million for 2016.
        

        In 2016, the electronics equipment industry in total grew by 41% (according to Gartner Dataquest, Forecast: Semiconductor Manufacturing Equipment, Worldwide, 4Q16 Update, December 2016). 
        

        In comparison, the subset, semiconductor capital spending is expected to have declined by 5.1% in 2016. A further subset, specific spending on Wafer Fab Equipment (WFE), which includes spending on deposition tools supplied by AIXTRON for the production of specialized applications such as gate stacks and capacitors, is expected to have grown by 8.1% year on year (according to Gartner Dataquest, Forecast: Semiconductor Manufacturing Equipment, Worldwide, 4Q16 Update, December 2016). 
        
 
       Compared to 2015, AIXTRON’s equipment revenues for memory and logic applications increased by 11% to EUR 32.4 million (2015: EUR 29.3 million) in fiscal year 2016.
        



2.3. The LED Market


        In 2016, the market for Gallium nitride based, LED devices which can be produced with AIXTRON’s compound semiconductor MOCVD equipment, was expected to have grown by 13% measured in units according to a report from IHS (an independent semiconductor market research institute), published in July 2016. However, according to industry sources, LED prices have stabilized throughout the year. Concurrently, the market for Gallium nitride based, high brightness LED devices was predicted to grow in 2016 by 2% to USD 16.8 billion from USD 16.4 billion in 2015 (IHS).
        

       In the more recent forecast “Semiconductor Manufacturing Equipment, Worldwide, 4Q16 Update” (December 2016) Gartner Dataquest anticipated that the total value of the 2016 MOCVD equipment market would decrease to approximately USD 250 million. Veeco and AIXTRON are expected to remain the main players in this market.
        

        AIXTRON’s revenues for MOCVD equipment to manufacture optoelectronic devices excluding LEDs increased by 14% from EUR 46.7 million in 2015 to EUR 53.2 million in 2016. AIXTRON’s 2016 revenues of MOCVD manufacturing equipment for LEDs slightly increased from EUR 39.7 million in 2015 to EUR 41.1 million. 
        



2.4 The Wide-Band-Gap (WBG) Gallium nitride and Silicon Carbide power semiconductor market


       According to the market research institute IHS (February 2016), the market for Wide-Band-Gap (WBG) Gallium nitride (GaN) and Silicon Carbide (SiC) based power management devices is expected to grow from 231 million shipped units in 2015 to 297 million shipped units in 2016. Based on the opinion of both market research institutes IHS and Gartner, the penetration of WBG devices relative to total power device market is expected to rise from low single digit in 2016 to low double digit in 2021.
        

        The growing demand for more efficient power management and switching applications as well as governmental policy changes and efforts from the supply chain, have contributed positively to increasing the momentum for wide band gap development activities across automotive, commercial, industrial and consumer segments.
        

       The revenues of AIXTRON’s MOCVD equipment for the manufacturing of WBG Gallium nitride (GaN) and Silicon Carbide (SiC) based power management devices in 2016 were EUR 21.8 million, lower than EUR 25.8 million in 2015 reflecting customer capital expenditure plans.
        



2.5 The OLED market


        The market for large OLED displays is the most imminent opportunity for AIXTRON’s Organic Semiconductor deposition and encapsulation technologies. The TV market is predicted to increasingly adopt OLED displays within the next years, at which point, it is expected that OLEDs will have the potential to penetrate the high end of the volume TV market to a larger degree. With its thin film encapsulation technology, AIXTRON additionally targets the market for flexible displays which offer the best solution for small and medium size displays used in mobile and wearable applications.
        

        According to the market research institute Display Supply Chain Consultants (January 2017), the market for OLED TV is expected to have grown to 900,000 shipped units in 2016. The penetration of OLED TV relative to the total flat panel display TV market is expected to have reached 0.3% in 2016. 
        



2.6. Results of Operations


2.6.1. Development of Revenues


                In fiscal year 2016, AIXTRON recorded total revenues of EUR 196.5 million, which was virtually stable compared to 2015 (2015: EUR 197.8 million; 2014: EUR 193.8 million). The 2016 equipment revenues increased to EUR 155.7 million (2015: EUR 151.0 million; 2014: EUR 148.5 million), with demand for MOCVD Equipment for optoelectronics (excluding LEDs) being the largest contributor to AIXTRON's equipment revenues, representing 34%. Total equipment sales generated 79% of total revenues in 2016 (2015: 76%; 2014: 77%). 
                

                21% of total revenues in 2016 were generated by sales of spare parts and service, which is lower compared to the same figure in 2015 (2015: 24%; 2014: 23%). In absolute terms, sales of spare parts and service in 2016 were at EUR 40.8 million, 13% decrease compared to 2015 (2015: EUR 46.8 million; 2014: EUR 45.3 million). 
                



Revenues by Equipment, Spares & Service
2016 
2015 
2014 
2016-2015 


 
m EUR
%
m EUR
%
m EUR
%
m EUR
%

Equipment revenues
155.7
79
151.0
76
148.5
77
4.7
3

Other revenues (service, spare parts, etc.)
40.8
21
46.8
24
45.3
23
-6.0
-13

Total
196.5
100
197.8
100
193.8
100
-1.3
-1




               In 2016, the major part of total revenues continued to be generated by sales to customers in Asia, which was 5 percentage points higher than in the previous year at 65% (2015: 60%; 2014: 83%). 19% of total revenues in 2016 were generated in the Americas (2015: 22%; 2014: 4%) and the remaining 16% in Europe (2015: 18%; 2014: 13%).
                



Revenues by Region
2016 
2015 
2014 
2016-2015 


 
m EUR
%
m EUR
%
m EUR
%
m EUR
%


Asia
128.0
65
118.4
60
160.2
83
9.6
8


Europe
30.8
16
35.8
18
25.2
13
-5.0
-14


Americas
37.7
19
43.6
22
8.4
4
-5.9
-14


Total
196.5
100
197.8
100
193.8
100
-1.3
-1







2.6.2. Development of Results

Cost Structure




2016 
2015 
2014 
2016-2015 



Full Year 
Full Year 
Full Year 
  


 
m EUR
% Rev.
m EUR
% Rev.
m EUR
% Rev.
m EUR
%

Cost of sales
140.2
71
147.9
75
154.1
80
-7.7
-5

Gross profit
56.3
29
49.8
25
39.7
20
6.5
13

Operating costs
77.7
40
76.5
39
98.0
51
1.0
1

Selling expenses
13.8
7
11.5
6
14.1
7
2.2
18

General and administration expenses
17.1
9
16.3
8
19.3
10
0.8
5

Research and development costs
53.9
28
55.4
28
66.7
34
-1.5
-3

Net other operating (income) and expenses
(7.2)
4
(6.7)
3
(2.2)
1
0.5
8



Cost of Sales

               In 2016, cost of sales decreased year on year by 5% or EUR 7.7 million from EUR 147.9 million to EUR 140.2 million (2014: EUR 154.1 million). This was due to higher efficiencies in production and service, which also led to lower inventory write downs. Consequently, 2016 cost of sales relative to revenues decreased to 71% (2015: 75%; 2014: 79%).
                
Gross Profit, Gross Margin

               Against this background, the Group’s gross profit in 2016 increased year-on-year to EUR 56.3 million (2015: EUR 49.8 million; 2014: EUR 39.7 million), resulting in an improved gross margin of 29% after 25% in 2015 (2014: 21%). 
                
Operating Costs

                With EUR 77.7 million, total operating costs in 2016 were stable against the previous year's figure of EUR 76.5 million (2014: EUR 98.0 million), mainly due to continued tight cost control. The operating costs were in line with the targeted annual cost level of approximately EUR 80 million. Operating costs relative to revenues in 2016 were at close to 40% (2015: 39%; 2014: 51%). 
                

                This development was influenced by the following factors:
                

Selling expenses in 2016 increased in absolute terms from EUR 11.5 million to EUR 13.8 million mainly due to accelerated depreciation of demonstration equipment in China (2013: EUR 14.1 million). Selling expenses relative to revenues were stable at 7% (2015: 6%; 2014: 7%).
                

                Due to expenses in conjunction with the planned takeover transaction, general and administration expenses in fiscal year 2016 increased slightly by 0.8 million to EUR 17.1 million or 9% of revenues (2015: EUR 16.3 million or 8% of revenues; 2014: EUR 19.3 million or 10% of revenues).
                



Key R&D Information
2016
2015
2014
2016-2015

R&D expenses (in EUR million)
53.9
55.4
66.7
-3%

R&D expenses, % of sales
27
28
34
 

R&D employees (period average)
252
265
285
-5%

R&D employees, % of total headcount (period average)
35
35
36





Research and development costs decreased by 3% year-on-year from EUR 55.4 million in 2015 (2014: EUR 66.7 million) to EUR 53.9 million in 2016, which was mainly due to  the completion of the AIX R6 project whereas our efforts in Power Electronics, OLED and compound semiconductor materials for logic (III-V-on-Silicon, TFOS) were increased.
                



Personnel Costs
2016
2015
2014
2016-2015 


 
m EUR
m EUR
m EUR
m EUR
%

Cost of Sales
23.4
23.8
22.3
-0.4
-2%

Selling, General and Administrative expenses
15.5
15.6
16.1
-0.1
0%

Research and Development costs
24.2
23.6
28.1
0.6
3%

Total
63.1
63.0
66.5
0.1
0%




The average number of Group employees in 2016 declined from 757 in 2015 to 721 (2014: 785). Personel costs of EUR 63.1 million in 2016 were flat compared to EUR 63.0 million in 2015 (2014: EUR 66.5 million) due to local currency effects and increased salaries. As per December 31, 2016, the number of employees, decreased from 748 as per December 31, 2015 to 705 (December 31, 2014: 789).
                

Net other operating income and expenses for fiscal year 2016 were virtually stable at an income of EUR 7.2 million (2015: EUR 6.7 million income; 2014: EUR 2.2 million income). A contractual settlement and R&D funding were major contributors.
                

                In 2016, the Company recorded a net currency loss of EUR -0.2 million (2015: EUR 2.7 million net income; 2014: EUR -0.3 million net loss) resulting from currency transaction and translation differences of balance sheet positions.
                

               The EUR 2.1 million of R&D grants received in 2016 (2015: EUR 3.0 million; 2014: EUR 1.8 million), were recorded as ”other operating income”.
                
EBITDA (Earnings before Interest, Tax, Depreciation and Amortization)

                At EUR -7.9 million EBITDA in fiscal year 2016 further improved against the previous year by 52% or EUR 8.5 million in absolute terms (2015: EUR -16.4 million, 2014: EUR -41.3 million), mainly due to the above-mentioned effects. Depreciation increased mainly due to the accelerated depreciation of demonstration and laboratory equipment.
                



Year ended December 31

(In EUR million)
2016
2015
2014
EBITDA
-7.9
-16.4
-41.3
Depreciation, amortization
and impairment expense
-13.5
-10.3
-17.0
Operating Result (EBIT)
-21.4
-26.7
-58.3



Operating Result EBIT (Earnings before Interest and Tax)

                The absolute operating result (EBIT) improved in a year-on-year comparison by EUR 5.3 million and was at EUR -21.4 million in 2016 (2015: EUR -26.7 million; 2014: EUR -58.3 million) resulting in an improved EBIT margin of -11% (2015: -14%; 2014: -30%). This is attributable primarily to the afore-mentioned cost effects.
                    
                
Result Before Taxes

Result before taxes improved year-on-year by EUR 5.0 million from EUR -26.0 million in 2015 (2014: EUR -57.1 million) to EUR -21.0 million in 2016, with a net finance income of EUR 0.4 million (2015: EUR 0.8 million income; 2014: EUR 1.2 million income).
                



Interest & Taxes
2016
2015
2014
2016-2015 


 
m EUR
m EUR
m EUR
m EUR
%


Net Interest Income/Expense
0.5
0.8
1.2
-0.3
-38


Interest Income
0.6
0.8
1.2
-0.2
-25


Interest Expenses
-0.1
0.0
0.0
-0.1
n.m.


Tax Expenses
-3.1
-3.2
-5.4
0.1
-3





                In 2016, AIXTRON recorded a country specific tax expense of EUR 3.1 million (2015: tax expense of EUR 3.2 million; 2014: tax expense of EUR 5.4 million). Unrecognized deferred tax assets related to tax losses at December 31, 2016 totaled EUR 185 million (2015: EUR 161.2 million; 2014: 129.5 million).
                
Profit/Loss Attributable to the Equity holders of AIXTRON SE (after taxes)

                The 2016 after-tax result attributable to the equity holders of AIXTRON SE was EUR -24.0 million or -12% of revenues compared to EUR -29.2 million (-15% of revenues) in 2015 (2014: EUR -62.5 million or -32% of revenues).
                
Net Result AIXTRON SE – Use of Results

               AIXTRON SE, the parent company of the AIXTRON Group, recorded a net accumulated loss in accordance with German generally accepted accounting principles, (German GAAP) based on the German Commercial Code, HGB, of EUR -120.5 million for 2016 (2015: loss of EUR -87.3 million; 2014: loss of EUR -53.6 million). 
                

				The 2016 loss will be carried forward and consequently no dividend payment will be made for 2016 (2015: no dividend; 2014: no dividend).
				



2.6.3. Development of Orders




Orders
2016
2015
2014
2016-2015 


(in EUR million)



m EUR
%

Total order intake incl. spares & service
225.1
167.1
198.7
58.0
35

Equipment order backlog (end of period)
78.1
42.9
65.2
35.2
82




               As a matter of internal policy, the 2016 US dollar based order intake and backlog were recorded at the 2016 budget exchange rate of 1.10 USD/EUR (2015: 1.25 USD/EUR; 2014: 1.35 USD/EUR). In order to better reflect industry practice, Management has decided to report total order intake including spares & service from 2015 rather than continuing to report equipment order intake only. For comparison reasons, previous years' figures have been changed to reflect this policy. Due to the generally quick turnaround of spares & service into revenues, the equipment order backlog figures will remain unchanged and continue to include equipment orders only.
                

                In 2016, total order intake including spares & service was 35% higher year-on-year at EUR 225.1 million (2015: EUR 167.1 million; 2014: EUR 198.7 million). This was driven by stronger demand from LED including Red-Orange-Yellow and specialty-LEDs as well as power electronic applications. Demand from Silicon and Optoelectronic applications continued at a solid level.
                

                The total equipment order backlog of EUR 78.1 million at December 31, 2016 was 67% higher than the 2016 opening backlog of EUR 46.7 million (both at budget rate of 1.10 USD/EUR) (December 31, 2014: EUR 65.2 million at budget rate of 1.35 USD/EUR). This strong backlog will allow a better production utilization in the first half of 2017 compared to 2016. The budget rate in 2017 did not change which is why the 2017 opening backlog equals the backlog as of December 31, 2016.
                

               As a matter of internal policy, AIXTRON follows clear internal requirements before recording and reporting received equipment orders as order intake and order backlog. These requirements comprise of all of the following minimum criteria:
                

the receipt of a firm written purchase order,   
					
the receipt of the agreed deposit,   
					
accessibility to the required shipping documentation,   
					
a customer confirmed agreement on a system specific delivery date.   
					


               In addition and reflecting current market conditions, the Company’s Management reserves the right to assess whether the actual realization of each respective system order is sufficiently likely to occur in a timely manner according to Management’s opinion. When Management concludes, that there is sufficient likelihood of realizing revenue on any specific system or that there is an unacceptable degree of risk of not realizing revenue on any specific system, Management will include or exclude the order, or a portion of the order, into or from the recorded order intake and order backlog figures, regardless of compliance with requirements of the points 1-4 above. The backlog is being regularly assessed and adjusted to reflect potential execution risks if necessary. 
				





2.7. Financial Position 


2.7.1. Corporate Financial Management


                AIXTRON has a central financial management system to control its global liquidity, interest and currency management.
                

                Due to the volatile nature of the semiconductor business, a sufficient level of cash is essential to expeditiously finance potential business needs. The Company’s need for cash is generally provided for through operating cash flows. In order to secure future financing and support the indispensable R&D activities, the Company has access to a strong equity capital base. Furthermore, approved by the Annual General Meeting, and subject to Supervisory Board approval, the Company has the authority to issue equity instruments to be able to raise additional liquidity on the capital market if required.
                

                AIXTRON conducts a large part of its business in foreign currencies, i.e. in currencies other than the Euro. The most prevalent foreign currency relevant to AIXTRON is the US Dollar. Unfavorable exchange rate movements, especially the US Dollar/Euro exchange rate, may adversely affect the Company’s results of operation. In order to manage foreign exchange risks, the Company routinely monitors if and to what extent currency hedging instruments should be used. As of December 31, 2016, no hedging contracts were in place.
                



2.7.2. Funding


                AIXTRON SEs stated share capital as of December 31, 2016 amounted to EUR 112,804,105 (December 31, 2015: EUR 112,720,355; December 31, 2014: EUR 112,694,555) divided into 112,804,105 registered shares with a proportional interest in the share capital of EUR 1.00 per no-par value registered share. All registered shares are fully paid in
                

                The Company has a number of stock option programs in place that grant the members of the Executive Board and employees the right to purchase AIXTRON shares under certain conditions. In fiscal year 2016, 83,750 stock options (2015: 25,800; 2014: 81,100) were exercised, resulting in delivery of in total 83,750 ordinary shares. In fiscal year 2016, no new stock options were granted (2015: 0; 2014: 1,150,400).
                



AIXTRON ordinary shares
Dec 31, 16
Exercised
Expired/Forfeited
Allocation
Dec 31, 15

Stock options
2,317,790
83,750
490,275
0
2,891,815

Underlying shares
2,317,790
83,750
490,275
0
2,891,815




               A more detailed description of the different stock option plans and a summary of all the stock option transactions can be found in Note 23 to the Company’s Consolidated Financial Statements “Share-based payments”.
                

                The Company recorded no bank borrowings as of December 31, 2016, 2015 and 2014.
                

                Where necessary, AIXTRON SE provides loans and financial security facilities to its subsidiaries to enable the business to continue to operate efficiently. The Company has granted no security interests in its own land and buildings.
                

                The equity ratio was 85% as of December 31, 2016, compared to 82% as of December 31, 2015 (December 31, 2014: 78%). 
                    
                

                In 2016, the return on equity (ROE) based on the negative 2016 Group’s net result in proportion to the average total shareholders’ equity at the start and end of the year was -6% (2015: -7%; 2014: -15%).
                

                In order to finance future developments, the Company regularly explores and assesses on an ongoing basis, potential funding opportunities available in the market. 
                



2.7.3. Investments


                The AIXTRON Group’s total capital expenditures in fiscal year 2016 amounted to EUR 5.3 million (2015: EUR 13.3 million; 2014: EUR 13.4 million).
                

               In 2016, EUR 4.9 million (2015: EUR 12.5 million; 2014: EUR 12.6 million) were related to property, plant and equipment (including testing and laboratory equipment). The remaining EUR 0.4 million in 2016 (2015: EUR 0.7 million; 2014: EUR 0.8 million) were related to intangible assets including software licenses.
                

                In 2017, investments will again be made mainly for laboratory and test equipment.
                

               The decrease of EUR 52.8 million in bank deposits with a maturity of at least three months during 2016 was recorded as cash inflow from investing activities (2015: decrease of EUR 60.5 million; 2014: increase of EUR 9.9 million). 
                

                All 2016, 2015 and 2014 expenditures were funded out of own available cash resources.
                



2.7.4. Liquidity


               Cash and cash equivalents including cash deposits with a maturity of at least three months, most of which is held in Euros (also see “Investments”), decreased by 24% or EUR 49.3 million to EUR 160.1 million (EUR 120.1 million + EUR 40.0 million financial assets) as of December 31, 2016 (December 31, 2015: EUR 209.4 million, equaling EUR 116.3 million + EUR 93.1 million; December 31, 2014: EUR 268.1 million, equaling EUR 116.6 million + EUR 151.5 million). 
                

                The difference is mainly attributable to the negative net result, the payment of the second installment of the agreed return of EUR 17.2 million advance payments to the Chinese customer San’an and an agreed milestone payment of EUR 4.1m for the purchase of PlasmaSi (acquired in 2015) in Q1/2016. Due to the high shipment levels at the end of 2016 receivables went up significantly at the end of 2016 and related receipt of customer payments will be recorded in early 2017.
                

                There are currently no restrictions on the Company’s use of cash resources. 
				



2.7.5. Development of Cash Flows


				In fiscal year 2016, a cash flow from operating activities of EUR -37.7 million was recorded (2015: EUR -45.7 million; 2014: EUR -33.8 million). The slight improvement in operating cash flow in 2016 was mainly caused by the reduced losses. The level of the negative cash flow was impacted by the incurred losses, the second installment of the agreed repayment of the previously received deposits to San’an in Q1/2016 as well as high shipment levels at the end of 2016 with receipt of payment in Q1/2017. A large part of these open receivables will be cleared in Q1/2017. 
			

				A cash flow from investment activities of EUR 43.4 million was recorded in 2016 (2015: cash flow of EUR 41.2 million; 2014: cash flow of EUR -23.2 million). This figure includes an agreed milestone payment of EUR 4.1m for the purchase of PlasmaSi as well as EUR 52.8 million which were transferred from longer term deposits to cash and cash equivalents. This effect was only partially offset by the previously mentioned lower capital expenditures (2016: 5.3 million 2015: EUR 13.3 million; 2014: 13.4 million).
			

				In 2016, the cash flow from financing activities of EUR 0.3 million (2015: cash flow of EUR -0.1 million; 2014: cash flow of EUR 0.2 million) was recorded mainly from the proceeds from the issue of new shares. In 2016, no dividends were paid to AIXTRON shareholders (2015: 0; 2014: 0). 
			

				Including the previously mentioned lower capital expenditures, the free cash flow (adjusted for acquisition effects), improved by 25% or EUR 14.4 million and amounted to EUR -42.9 million (2015: EUR -57.3 million; 2014: EUR -47.0 million).  
			





2.8. Assets


2.8.1. Property, Plant and Equipment


                The value of property, plant and equipment was at EUR 74.2 million as of December 31, 2016 (EUR 81.3 million as of December 31, 2015; EUR 77.3 million as of December 31, 2014) mainly due to regular and accelerated depreciation of laboratory equipment.
                



2.8.2. Goodwill


                The value of goodwill was at EUR 74.6 million as per December 31, 2016 (EUR 75.9 million as per December 31, 2015; EUR 64.8 million as per December 31, 2014). The difference was due to exchange rate fluctuations. There were no impairments in fiscal year 2016. For further information on the impairment of goodwill, refer to Note 12 to the Company’s Consolidated Financial Statements “Intangible assets”.
                



2.8.3. Other Intangible Assets


                The value of other intangible assets also decreased to EUR 5.4 million as per December 31, 2016 (EUR 6.4 million as per December 31, 2015; EUR 2.5 million as per December 31, 2014) mainly due to regular amortization.
                



2.8.4. Inventories


               Inventories, including raw materials, unfinished and finished goods, decreased to EUR 54.2 million as per December 31, 2016, compared to EUR 70.8 million as per December 31, 2015 (EUR 81.7 million as of December 31, 2014), reflecting successful sale of  AIX R6 inventory and improved inventory management. The current inventory level results in a solid inventory/sales and inventory/backlog ratio. 
                



2.8.5. Trade Receivables


                Trade receivables increased significantly to EUR 60.2 million as of December 31, 2016, reflecting strong shipments at the end of the year (December 31, 2015: EUR 26.0 million; December 31, 2014: EUR 26.3 million). 
                



2.8.6. Liabilities


Trade payables as of December 31, 2016 increased by 49% year-on-year to EUR 14.6 million compared to EUR 9.8 million as of December 2015 (December 31, 2014: EUR 16.4 million), being in line with shipment schedules and related supplier orders. Provisions (current and non-current) decreased from EUR 21.5 million as of December 31, 2015 to EUR 18.3 million as of December 31, 2016 (December 31, 2014: EUR 29.3m) mainly due to reduced liabilities in conjunction with the successful sales of AIX R6. Advance payments from customers as of December 31, 2016 increased to EUR 26.1 million compared to EUR 24.0 million as of December 31, 2015 (December 31, 2014: EUR 67.0m), reflecting the higher order backlog. Other current liabilities decreased from EUR 25.0 million as of December 31, 2015 to EUR 2.4 million as of December 31, 2016 mainly due the payment of the agreed refund to San’an as well the agreed milestone payment for the purchase of PlasmaSi (December 31, 2014: EUR 3.2 million). 
                





2.9. Management Assessment of Company Situation


        Following the termination of the planned takeover transaction by a Chinese investor in December 2016, AIXTRON now is focusing on the optimal structure of its technology portfolio as part of its corporate strategy. Against this background, AIXTRON is currently pursuing different options in order to successfully reduce required upfront expenses for the development of future technologies. These options include looking for partners, joint ventures or other alternatives. 
        

       At the same time, AIXTRON continues to invest consistently into deposition or encapsulation technologies for Power Electronics, Optoelectronics, OLED, Memory, Logic and Carbon Nanomaterials including Graphene. The Company has seen market interest and demand from customers in all of these fields supporting the Companies’ diversification strategy.
        

        For MOCVD equipment to manufacture power management devices, revenues in 2016 were EUR 21.8 million, down from EUR 25.8 million in 2015 reflecting customer capital expenditure plans. Based on a growing penetration of power electronics devices based on the new materials GaN and SiC, further future growth is expected in this area. 
        

       Revenues for MOCVD equipment to manufacture devices for optoelectronic applications excluding LEDs have increased by 14% to EUR 53.2 million from EUR 46.7 million in 2016.
        

        Revenues for LED-related MOCVD equipment increased in the reporting period slightly from EUR 39.7 million in 2015 to EUR 41.1 million in 2016, including AIX R6 sales from inventory.
        

       Revenues for AIXTRON’s logic and memory tools have increased by 11% to EUR 32.4 million in 2016 compared to EUR 29.3 million in 2015. The Company expects future growth potential in this area depending on customers’ capital expenditure plans.
        

        Market entry remains the main focus in the area of OLED deposition and encapsulation technologies. The successful market entry of this highly innovative technology against the incumbent technologies depends on imminent customer commitments to adopt the OVPD large area technology initially for pilot manufacturing and high volume manufacturing at a later stage. The short term win of a customer contract is decisive for the further development of the OVPD technology. 
        

        In addition to above mentioned activities, Management will continue to focus on costs, margin contributions as well as the allocation of funds and will continuously review the performance and prospects of the Companies’ product portfolio.
		

			The business development in all areas was in line with Management’s expectations. However, the Company’s Management continues to consider this development as not satisfactory. Further improvements will depend on the continuous execution of the operating programs and the market entry of new technologies in the portfolio.
		

        The Company continues to have a strong balance sheet and a strong liquidity without any bank borrowings.
        

        The earnings and free cash flow guidance for fiscal year 2016, which was published in the Annual Report 2015 and substantiated during the year, was successfully achieved. 
        


3. Report on Post-Balance Sheet Date Events

	On January 4, 2016, a U.S.-based law firm filed a complaint on behalf of a shareholder of the Company, naming AIXTRON as a defendant in a putative class action asserting claims under the Securities and Exchange Act of 1934. On December 20, 2016, the Court entered an opinion granting AIXTRON’s motion to dismiss all claims asserted against it. Subsequently, plaintiff confirmed in January 2017 that he will not pursue an appeal and the time to pursue an appeal has expired. As a result, the order dismissing the complaint is final and the case is closed.  


On January 20, 2017, AIXTRON announced that Martin Goetzeler will leave the Company effective February 28, 2017. AIXTRON Supervisory Board Chairman Kim Schindelhauer will become interim CEO and will take over the tasks of Mr. Goetzeler effective March 1, 2017. Professor Dr. Wolfgang Blättchen, current deputy chairman of the Supervisory Board, will take over as chair of the Supervisory Board during Mr. Schindelhauer's work as CEO of the company.


The Group has commenced pursuing options for some of its activities in order to allow the continuation of development projects with high up-front expenses. These options include looking for partners, joint ventures or other alternatives. 


As per January 9, 2017, AIXTRON has executed a voluntary delisting of its American Depositary Shares from NASDAQ and has filed for deregistration from the Securities and Exchange Commission. On this day, reporting obligations under the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 also terminated.


There were no known business events with a potentially significant effect on AIXTRON’s results of operation, financial position or net assets as of December 31, 2016.
    

4. Remuneration Report

The remuneration report summarizes the principles of the remuneration system for the members of the Executive Board and Supervisory Board of AIXTRON SE explains the structure and amount of the remuneration paid. The remuneration of each member of the Executive Board and Supervisory Board for fiscal year 2016 is presented on an individual basis. The remuneration report is based on the recommendations of the German Corporate Governance Code and includes the disclosures required by the German Commercial Code (Handelsgesetzbuch - HGB) and the International Financial Reporting Standards (IFRS). The remuneration report is part of the Group Management Report.


4.1. Principles of Management Compensation


4.1.1. Executive Board


               The Supervisory Board as a whole is responsible for establishing the structure of the remuneration system and for the total remuneration for individual members of the Executive Board. It regularly discusses and reviews remuneration for appropriateness and to ensure that Management is not taking unreasonable risks.
                

                The remuneration level of the Executive Board members of AIXTRON SE is aligned not only with the commercial and financial situation and future prospects of the Company and the level and structure of Executive Board remuneration at comparable companies but also with the compensation structure in place in other areas of the Company. In addition, the responsibilities, experience and contribution of each individual Executive Board member, and the desire to retain them, are taken into account when calculating the remuneration.
                

                The current remuneration system was approved by AIXTRON’s shareholders at the Annual General Meeting held on May 23, 2013.
                

               Executive Board remuneration currently consists of three components: fixed remuneration (including benefits in kind and payments into a private pension insurance), a variable bonus, and may include stock-based remuneration.
                

4.1.1.1. Fixed remuneration


                        The Executive Board employment contracts stipulate an annual income for the fixed remuneration component. The fixed remuneration component is non-performance-related and is paid out on a monthly basis (13 times a year) as a salary. Additional payments in kind are made, chiefly consisting of company car usage and payments for private pension insurance.
                        



4.1.1.2. Variable bonus


                        The limited variable bonus scheme for the collective Executive Board (profit-sharing) is based on consolidated net income for the year and is paid from an “accrued internal bonus pool”, defined as up to 10% of the modified consolidated net income for the year, but not to exceed EUR 6.5 million in total. The modified consolidated net income for the year is obtained from the Company’s Consolidated Financial Statements (IFRS) certified by the auditor, less a consolidated loss carry forward figure and those amounts that are to be allocated to retained earnings in the Annual Financial Statements of AIXTRON by law or in accordance with the Articles of Association. The consolidated loss carry forward is obtained from consolidated net losses from previous years, less consolidated net income from subsequent fiscal years.
                        

                        The variable bonus – paid out of the above mentioned “accrued internal bonus pool” – will be paid half through a monetary element and half in shares. That part of the variable bonus payable in shares will be converted into whole numbers of shares of the Company and will be deferred until the third bank working day following the ordinary General Meeting in the third fiscal year after having been granted to the Board members. The number of the shares to be granted for the part of the variable bonus payable in shares will be determined in accordance with the closing price of the share of the Company on the third bank working day following the ordinary General Meeting, which is presented with the annual financial statements of the Company and the consolidated financial statements for the fiscal year for which the bonus is granted. The shares will be delivered from treasury shares. Thus, during the multi-year waiting period, the Executive Board members will take part in both positive and negative developments of the Company's share price so that the variable compensation structure is clearly oriented toward a sustainable business development.
                        



4.1.1.3. Stock-based remuneration


                       In addition, as a variable component acting as a long-term incentive with an element of risk, the members of the Executive Board may receive a share-based payment in the form of options that are granted under AIXTRON’s stock option plans. The stock option plans, including the exercise thresholds, are adopted at the Companies’ General Meeting. The number of options granted to the Executive Board is stipulated by the Supervisory Board. Further details on the outstanding stock options of the Executive Board as well as comments on the respective stock option plans are set out further in this report under “Executive Board remuneration” of the chapter “Individual remuneration structure”.
                        



4.1.1.4. Commitments in connection with the termination of Executive Board membership


                        If the tenure of any Executive Board member ends prematurely as result of a revocation of the appointment, such member of the Executive Board will receive a severance payment in an amount equal to the fixed and variable compensation expected to be owed by the Company for the remaining term of the employment contract, however, not exceeding an amount equal to twice the annual compensation (severance cap). Any payments beyond this severance payment shall be excluded.
                        

                       If the tenure of any Executive Board member ends prematurely because the employment contract is terminated by mutual agreement, the total amount of any payments agreed to be paid by the Company to the Executive Board member as part of such an agreement may not exceed the amount of the severance payment which the Executive Board member would receive in the event of a revocation of the appointment with due regard to the severance cap.
                        

                        If the tenure of any Executive Board member ends prematurely because the employment contract is terminated after a change of control, such member of the Executive Board will receive a severance payment in an amount equal to the fixed and variable compensation expected to be owed by the Company for the remaining term of the employment contract, however, not exceeding the severance cap, i.e. an amount equal to twice the annual compensation. Any payments beyond this severance payment shall be excluded. A change of control situation exists if a third party or a group of third parties who contractually combine their shares in order to act subsequently as a third party, directly or indirectly holds more than 50% of the Company’s registered share capital.
                        



4.1.1.5. Other


                        The current Executive Board members have no individual Company pension benefits, which would result in pension provisions being required to be made by AIXTRON, and receive no loans from the Company.
                        





4.1.2. Supervisory Board


                Remuneration of the Supervisory Board is regulated in Article 17 of AIXTRON’s Articles of Association. Accordingly, the annual fixed compensation for individual members of the Supervisory Board is EUR 25,000. The Chairman’s compensation is three times this amount and the Deputy Chairman’s one and a half times the amount received by a regular member of the Supervisory Board.
                

                The members of the Supervisory Board also receive, in aggregate, a limited variable compensation of 1% of the Company’s net income, less an amount corresponding to 4% of the paid-in contributions to the share capital. The Chairman of the Supervisory Board receives 6/17, the Deputy Chairman 3/17, and each other member of the Supervisory Board 2/17 of the variable remuneration. The variable compensation is limited to fourfold the annual fixed compensation of each Supervisory Board member. In addition, committee members receive an attendance fee of EUR 2,000 for attending a committee meeting, with the Chairman of the committee receiving triple this amount. The total annual attendance fee per Supervisory Board member is limited to one-and-a-half times that individual’s fixed remuneration.
                

                The Supervisory Board members receive no loans from the Company.
                



4.1.3. D&O insurance


                The Company has a D&O insurance contract in place, covering the activities of members of the Executive Board and members of the Supervisory Board. Pursuant to the amended § 93, Section 2 AktG following the Act on the Appropriateness of Executive Board remuneration (VorstAG), as well as to the amended recommendation in chapter 3.8. German Corporate Governance Code, the deductible for members of the Executive Board and members of the Supervisory Board is equal to a minimum of 10% of the respective, potential loss incurred. The deductible cannot exceed a factor of 1.5 of the respective annual fixed remuneration.
                





4.2. Individual remuneration structure


4.2.1. Executive Board remuneration


                The total Executive Board remuneration in fiscal year 2016 amounted to EUR 1,055,631 (2015: EUR 1,040,631; 2014: EUR 2,014,775). The success-independent, fixed remuneration of the Executive Board in 2016 was at EUR 1,055,631 (2015: EUR 1,040,631; 2014: EUR 1,136,774).
                

                No variable bonus was granted for fiscal years 2016 and 2015. For each of the years 2013 and 2014, Mr. Goetzeler was granted a total of 59,647 AIXTRON shares as a contractually guaranteed bonus (2015: 35,053 shares; 2014: 24,594 shares). The transfer of the shares is deferred until the third bank working day following the ordinary General Meeting in the third fiscal year after having been granted. During the past fiscal year, no stock options were granted to the Members of the Executive Board (2015: 0; 2014: 100,000).
                





4.3. Information according to Nr 4.2.5 German Corporate Governance Code (DCGK)


4.3.1. Value of benefits granted displayed according to DCGK 


                The following table according to DCGK shows the value of benefits granted to the individual members of the Executive Board in fiscal year 2016 as well as the minimum and maximum values that can be achieved.
                

                For the one-year variable compensation, in line with the requirement of the DCGK, the target value (i.e. the value in the event of 100% goal achievement) granted for the year under review is stated. The multi-year variable compensation granted in the year under review is broken down into different plans are stated.
                

enlarge 





Benefits granted
Martin Goetzeler   
Dr. Bernd Schulte


 
Chief Executive Officer   
Chief Operating Officer


 
Member of the Executive Board   
Member of the Executive Board


 
since March 1, 2013   
since March 7, 2002


 
2015
2016
2016 (min)
2016 (max)
2015
2016
2016 (min)
2016 (max)


Fixed compensation
600,000
600,000
600,000
600,000
415,000
430,000
430,000
430,000


Fringe benefits
13,104
13,104
13,104
13,104
12,527
12,527
12,527
12,527


Total
613,104
613,104
613,104
613,104
427,527
442,527
442,527
442,527


One-year variable compensation
0
0
0
4,000,000
0
0
0
2,500,000


Multi-year variable compensation
0
0
0

0
0
0



Deferral from one-year variable compensation
0
0
0
0
0
0
0
0


Stock option program 2012 (blackout period: 4 years)
0
0
0
0
0
0
0
0


Stock option program 2007 (blackout period: 2 years)
0
0
0
0
0
0
0
0


Stock option program 2002 (blackout period: 2 years)
0
0
0
0
0
0
0
0


Total
0
0
0
4,000,000
0
0
0
2,500,000


Service cost
0



0
0




Total
613,104
613,104
613,104
4,613,104
427,527
442,527
442,527
2,942,527







Benefits granted
Martin Goetzeler   
Dr. Bernd Schulte


 
Chief Executive Officer   
Chief Operating Officer


 
Member of the Executive Board   
Member of the Executive Board


 
since March 1, 2013   
since March 7, 2002


 
2015
2016
2016 (min)
2016 (max)
2015
2016
2016 (min)
2016 (max)


Fixed compensation
600,000
600,000
600,000
600,000
415,000
430,000
430,000
430,000


Fringe benefits
13,104
13,104
13,104
13,104
12,527
12,527
12,527
12,527


Total
613,104
613,104
613,104
613,104
427,527
442,527
442,527
442,527


One-year variable compensation
0
0
0
4,000,000
0
0
0
2,500,000


Multi-year variable compensation
0
0
0

0
0
0



Deferral from one-year variable compensation
0
0
0
0
0
0
0
0


Stock option program 2012 (blackout period: 4 years)
0
0
0
0
0
0
0
0


Stock option program 2007 (blackout period: 2 years)
0
0
0
0
0
0
0
0


Stock option program 2002 (blackout period: 2 years)
0
0
0
0
0
0
0
0


Total
0
0
0
4,000,000
0
0
0
2,500,000


Service cost
0



0
0




Total
613,104
613,104
613,104
4,613,104
427,527
442,527
442,527
2,942,527




 



4.3.2. Allocation displayed according to DCGK


                As the benefits granted to the members of the Executive Board in a fiscal year does not always result in a corresponding payment in the respective fiscal year, the following table shows severally - in line the relevant recommendation of the DCGK - the value of the actual allocation (amount disbursed) in fiscal year 2016.
                

                According to the recommendations of the DCGK, for the fixed compensation and the one-year variable compensation the allocation (amount disbursed) for the respective fiscal year is entered. For subscription rights and other share-based payments, the time of allocation and the allocation amount is deemed to be the relevant time and value under German tax law. 
                

enlarge 






Martin Goetzeler 
Dr. Bernd Schulte


 
Chief Executive Officer 
Chief Operating Officer


Benefits allocated
Member of the Executive Board 
Member of the Executive Board


 
since March 1, 2013 
since March 7, 2002


 
2015
2016
2015
2016


Fixed compensation
600,000
600,000
415,000
430,000


Fringe benefits
13,104
13,104
12,527
12,527


Total
613,104
613,104
427,527
442,527


One-year variable compensation
0
0
0
0


Multi-year variable compensation
0
0
0
67,132


Deferral from one-year variable compensation
0
0
0
0


Stock option program 2012 (blackout period: 4 years)
0
0
0
0


Stock option program 2007 (blackout period: 2 years)
0
0
0
67,132


Stock option program 2002 (blackout period: 2 years)
0
0
0
0


Other
0
0
0
0


Total
0
0
0
0


Service cost
0
 
0
 


Total
613,104
613,104
427,527
509,659








Martin Goetzeler 
Dr. Bernd Schulte


 
Chief Executive Officer 
Chief Operating Officer


Benefits allocated
Member of the Executive Board 
Member of the Executive Board


 
since March 1, 2013 
since March 7, 2002


 
2015
2016
2015
2016


Fixed compensation
600,000
600,000
415,000
430,000


Fringe benefits
13,104
13,104
12,527
12,527


Total
613,104
613,104
427,527
442,527


One-year variable compensation
0
0
0
0


Multi-year variable compensation
0
0
0
67,132


Deferral from one-year variable compensation
0
0
0
0


Stock option program 2012 (blackout period: 4 years)
0
0
0
0


Stock option program 2007 (blackout period: 2 years)
0
0
0
67,132


Stock option program 2002 (blackout period: 2 years)
0
0
0
0


Other
0
0
0
0


Total
0
0
0
0


Service cost
0
 
0
 


Total
613,104
613,104
427,527
509,659





                As of December 31, 2016, the AIXTRON Executive Board held a total of 283,500 options for the purchase of 283,500 shares of the Company (December 31, 2015: 395,500; December 31, 2014: 398,140). The number of shares underlying the options is set out below. The actual profits from exercising the stock options may differ significantly from the figures shown in the table.
                



Executive Board Member
Allocation date
Outstanding
Exercisable
Grant Date Option Value
Exercise price
MaturityTotal Outstanding Shares

 
 
(Shares)
(Shares)
(EUR)
(EUR)
  

Martin Goetzeler
Oct 2014
50,000
0
189,000
13.14
Oct 202450,000

Dr. Bernd Schulte
Oct 2014
50,000
0
189,000
13.14
Oct 2024

 
Nov 2010
52,000
26,000
461,240
26.60
Nov 2020

 
Nov 2009
52,000
39,000
448,240
24.60
Nov 2019

 
Dec 2007
52,000
52,000
225,680
10.09
Dec 2017

 
May 2002
27,500
0
152,625
7.48
May 2017233,500

Total
 
283,500
117,000


283,500




                In accordance with IFRS 2, the “grant-date fair value of the options” is also used as the basis for recognizing options issued after November 7, 2002 under expenses on the Income Statement. For stock options issued prior to November 7, 2002, the fair value was determined using the Black-Scholes model.
                

                The expenses for share based compensation of each individual member of the Executive Board are as follows:
                



in EUR thousands
2016
2015
2014

Martin Goetzeler
47
47
263

Dr. Bernd Schulte
47
53
53

Wolfgang Breme
0
0
-76




               In 2016, options to acquire 60,000 AIXTRON shares expired (2015: 2,640; 2014: 158,976). The expenses for the unvested expired options have been reversed in accordance with IFRS 2. 
                

               In fiscal year 2016, current Executive Board members exercised 52,000 options (2015: 0; 2014: 48,000).
                




Date of exercise
Number of shares

2016



Dr. Bernd Schulte
September 12, 2016
52,000

2014



Dr. Bernd Schulte
November 21, 2014
35,000

Wolfgang Breme
August 28, 2014
13,000




                The current Executive Board members have no individual company pension benefits which would result in pension provisions being required to be made by the company. Instead, the Executive Board annual pension allowance is paid by AIXTRON and included in the fixed remuneration, and is transferred by the Executive Board members into independent insurance contracts with a benevolent fund or similar plan. In the years 2016, 2015 and 2014, payments of EUR 80,000 per annum were made to Martin Goetzeler. The allowance amounts to EUR 40,000 for other members of the Executive Board. In the years 2016, 2015 and in 2014, payments of EUR 40,000 per year were made to Dr. Bernd Schulte and Wolfgang Breme (in 2014: five months pro rata until termination of appointment) respectively. This allowance is part of the total fixed annual salary of the executive board members.
                



4.3.3. Supervisory Board Remuneration


                In fiscal year 2016, the remuneration of the Supervisory Board totaled EUR 448,750 (2015: EUR 302,500; 2014: EUR 292,500). The division between the individual members of the Supervisory Board for the years 2014 to 2016 is presented in the table below:
                



Supervisory Board Member
Year
Fixed
Variable 
Attendance Fee
Total

 
 
(EUR)
(EUR)
(EUR)
(EUR)

Kim Schindelhauer 1/2/3/4/5
2016
75,000
0
100,000
175,000

(Chairman of the Supervisory Board)
2015
75,000
0
18,000
93,000

2014
75,000
0
16,000
91,000

Prof. Dr. Wolfgang Blättchen 1/4
2016
37,500
0
72,250
109,750

(Deputy Chairman of the Supervisory Board)
(Chairman of the Audit Committee)
2015
37,500
0
24,000
61,500

2014
37,500
0
24,000
61,500

Dr. Andreas Biagosch 2
2016
25,000
0
8,000
33,000


2015
25,000
0
8,000
33,000

2014
25,000
0
8,000
33,000

Prof. Dr. Petra Denk 2/3
2016
25,000
0
30,000
55,000

(since May 19, 2011)
(Chair of the Technology Committee)
2015
25,000
0
26,000
51,000

2014
25,000
0
24,000
49,000

Dr. Martin Komischke
2016
25,000
0
0
25,000


2015
25,000
0
0
25,000

2014
25,000
0
0
25,000

Prof. Dr. Rüdiger von Rosen 1/3
2016
25,000
0
26,000
51,000

(Chairman of the Nomination Committee)
2015
25,000
0
14,000
39,000

2014
25,000
0
8,000
33,000

Total
2016
212,500
0
236,250
448,750


2015
212,500
0
90,000
302,500


2014
212,500
0
80,000
292,500

1) Member of the Audit Committee     


2) Member of the Technology Committee     


3) Member of the Nomination Committee     


4) Member of the Capital Markets Committee     


5) Former AIXTRON Executive Board Member     





                In accordance with the article of association of the company, the annual attendance fee of Prof. Dr. Blättchen in fiscal year 2016 was capped at one-and-a-half times his fixed remuneration. For fiscal years 2015 and 2014, both Mr. Schindelhauer and Mr. Blättchen have received a subsequent payment of EUR 16,000 each.
                As in previous years, there were no payments made to any Supervisory Board member for advisory services in fiscal year 2016.
                




 5. Opportunities and Risk Report 


5.1. Opportunities


        The development of leading edge complex material deposition technology remains AIXTRON’s core competency. It is an area where the Company has developed global leadership positions. AIXTRON Management intends to keep this focus and positioning while at the same time expanding this core know-how into both existing and emerging markets. 
        

       AIXTRON remains committed to investing in R&D to maintain and expand the Company’s leading technology position e.g. in MOCVD equipment for applications such as optoelectronics including lasers and LEDs, power electronics or next generation logic applications. AIXTRON’s enabling technologies to manufacture the devices for these applications are the basis for emerging Megatrends such as Big Data, Cloud Computing, Electric Vehicles, Autonomous Driving or highly efficient Energy Storage. Therefore, AIXTRON expects future growth in all of these areas.
        

        Important fields for AIXTRON are power management devices based on wide band gap materials such as Gallium Nitride (GaN) and Silicon Carbide (SiC). These devices are extremely energy efficient. Such device applications can be found in electric vehicles, transformers, converters as well as in feed-in of renewable energy into the grid and they will be considered for power management on high performance logic chips. AIXTRON expects growth of equipment demand as the penetration of above mentioned devices gain momentum. 
        

        AIXTRON continues to pursue the market entry into the large area organic semiconductor application markets with the Company’s deposition technology for organic materials, OVPD and PVPD. The exclusively licensed OVPD technology allows a highly efficient deposition of organic material, especially on large area substrates, and offers a number of advantages over the incumbent technologies especially in terms of material consumption. AIXTRON’s PECVD technology for thin film encapsulation offers highly flexible and effective barrier films for flexible and rigid organic electronics. Demonstration and qualification efforts are closely linked to the expansion plans of potential customers in this field. 
        

        The Company also aims to make further inroads into the research and development community with its PECVD technology to manufacture advanced carbon nanostructures including carbon nanotubes, carbon nanowires and graphene. The potential applications for these materials include, among other things, energy storage, display technologies, semiconductor technologies and composite materials. The installed base of AIXTRON R&D tools and the close collaboration with customers allow the Company to align its roadmaps with the market requirements of this emerging technology. Building on a leading position captured over several years, AIXTRON expects the market opportunity for equipment to expand.
        

       For memory applications, AIXTRON’s ALD and CVD deposition tools provide efficient and innovative solutions. AIXTRON sees growth potential with its technologies for memory applications. In addition, based on R&D projects and customer feedback, AIXTRON sees tangible opportunities to further support the miniaturization of logic device structures with the use of compound semiconductor materials produced on AIXTRON’s MOCVD tool technology.
        

        AIXTRON expects that the following market trends and opportunities in the relevant end-user markets could have a positive effect on future business:
		
Short-Term


            Further increasing adoption of LEDs and specialty LEDs (in particular Red-Orange-Yellow, UV or IR) for Display and other applications.
            

            Increased emergence of wide band gap GaN or SiC based devices for energy efficient power management and communications in automotive, consumer electronics and mobile applications.
            

            Development of next generation NAND and DRAM memory devices.
            

           Increasing emergence of compound semiconductor based laser devices for ultrafast data transfer and sensors in infrastructure and mobile applications.
            

            Increasing emergence of compound semiconductor based sensor devices for autonomous driving.
            

Mid- to Long-Term


            Further progress in the development of GaN-on-Silicon LEDs and Wafer Level Packaging.
            

            Development of new wide-band-gap applications such as RF and System-on-Chip with integrated power management.
            

            Progress in the development of large area OLED devices requiring efficient deposition technologies. 
            

            Progress in the development of flexible and rigid OLED devices requiring thin-film encapsulation.
            

            Increased development activity for specialized compound solar cell applications.
            

            Increasing requirements for High-k and interconnect components, implying a new approach to production technologies.
            

            Progress in the development of future logic chips applying wide band gap and high electron mobility materials (III-V-on-Silicon).
            

            Development of applications using Carbon Nanostructures (Carbon Nanotubes, Carbon Nanowires, Graphene).
            

            Development of alternative LED applications such as Visual Light Communication technology or Micro-LED Displays.
            





5.2. Risk Management


        A risk management system has been implemented for monitoring, analyzing, and documenting business risks and measures. Risk and measure reporting is the core component of AIXTRON’s strategic risk and opportunity management. In different areas of the company, risk representatives responsible for risk reporting have been appointed. 
        

        As an international technology company, AIXTRON is engaged in business operations worldwide and is, consequently, exposed to a variety of risks. The Company may also benefit from the opportunities related to the risks it is exposed to. In order to minimize risks, AIXTRON established an enterprise risk management system that is continuously being adapted to the evolving business environment and business processes.
        

        To minimize risks and to capitalize on opportunities, AIXTRON pursues a forward looking product strategy, by observing current and identifying anticipated future market trends and customer requirements and continuously striving to develop and maintain unique selling propositions related to its technology. This product strategy incorporates measures for honing the Company’s profile in its target market, for building new partnerships and alliances, as well as for training third parties engaged to market, sell, and deploy AIXTRON products. In fiscal year 2016, the Company continued to monitor market trends and the activities of its competitors and evaluated market analyses and forecasts produced by leading market research companies. Project management and quality assurance systems are routinely deployed in all areas of product development where risk awareness and evaluation play a crucial role. Therefore, AIXTRON uses systems for project management and quality control in this area.
        

       These measures are accompanied by a training and development program for managers and specialist employees, and by procedures to maintain and expand the necessary infrastructure when required.
       

        AIXTRON deploys accounting, control, and forecasting systems for the global monitoring and management of core enterprise information. Regular reporting processes ensure that information on business and market trends is regularly updated. In addition to annual budget planning, real-time forecasts are used to continuously review and update the Company’s plans. As part of the Company’s financial control procedures, variances between actual and budget figures are continuously identified and analyzed and serve as basis for corrective measures as necessary.
        

        Furthermore, the Executive Board analyzes the Company’s net assets, financial position, and results of operations on a continuous basis. The frequent exchange of knowledge and experiences at all hierarchy levels worldwide ensures the constant and efficient flow of information as well as rapid decision-making.
        

        The Executive Board informs and includes, where required, the Supervisory Board in all key decisions at least once every quarter, and normally at shorter intervals. The Audit Committee of the Supervisory Board meets regularly with the Executive Board to discuss, analyze, and monitor financial issues arising in the course of the Company’s business activities. Internal guidelines governing risk management, insider trading, and the disclosure of share price sensitive information ensure compliance with all applicable laws and the implementation of the corporate governance recommendations specified in the German Corporate Governance Code.
		

        The Company’s Supervisory Board is informed about the status, plausibility, and further development of the risk management system by the Executive Board on an ongoing basis. In addition, it is the Company’s auditor’s duty, to inform the Supervisory Board about their audit of the risk management early warning system.
        



5.3. Internal Control over Financial Reporting


        AIXTRON’s Management is responsible for establishing and maintaining adequate internal control and risk management and for reviewing its continuing effectiveness. Such processes are designed to manage risks and to provide reasonable assurance against material misstatement or loss. Management ensures, to the extent possible, that the system of internal procedures and controls is appropriate to the nature and scale of the Company’s activities and that appropriate processes and controls are in place to effectively manage and mitigate strategic, operational, financial and other risks facing the Company. This also includes the centrally monitored compliance to group wide accounting guidelines and valuation principles in financial reporting.
        

        The Company has an ongoing process of identifying, evaluating and managing risk. Management and Audit Committee confirm that necessary actions are being undertaken to eliminate perceived failings or weaknesses identified from these reviews.
        

        Based on the Company’s assessment, Management has concluded that AIXTRON’s internal control and risk management was effective as of December 31, 2016 to provide reasonable assurance that the system of internal procedures and controls are appropriate and effective. AIXTRON’s Management reviewed the results of Management’s assessment jointly with the Audit Committee of AIXTRON’s Supervisory Board.
        



5.4. Single Risk Factors


                Any of the following risks could have a material adverse effect on AIXTRON’s results of operations, financial position, net assets, liquidity, cash flows, the market price of its shares and the actual             outcome of matters that the forward-looking statements contained in this annual report refer to. The risks described below are not the only ones the Company faces. There may be additional risks AIXTRON is currently unaware of, and risks that are common to most companies including political risks, the risk of force majeure and other unforeseeable events. There may also be risks that AIXTRON now believes are immaterial, but which also may ultimately have a material adverse effect on the Company. For additional information regarding forward-looking statements, see ‘‘Forward-looking statements’’ included in this annual report.
                

5.4.1. Currency Exchange Risks and Other Financial Risks


                The Company’s operations are conducted by entities in many countries and a substantial portion of its sales and production costs are denominated in currencies other than the Euro. As a result, fluctuations between the value of the Euro and other major currencies may affect the Company’s business as well as the business of AIXTRON’s customers and suppliers. In addition, changes in monetary or other policies, including as a result of the regionally unbalanced economic development as well as geopolitical conflicts, would also likely affect foreign currency exchange rates. In order to manage foreign exchange risks, the Company routinely monitors if and to what extent currency hedging instruments should be used and Management actively manages the currency risk of balance sheet items by pursuing an active balancing of assets and liabilities held in foreign currencies. As of December 31, no hedging contracts were in place.
                

                AIXTRON anticipates that international revenues, including revenues from Asia, will continue to account for a significant portion of its revenues. As a result, a significant portion of the Company’s revenues will be subject to risks of dealing with customers on a global scale. These risks include changes in foreign laws or regulations, tariffs or trade barriers, military confrontations, political or economic instabilities, managing foreign subsidiary or distributor operations.
                

                AIXTRON conducts business with a large number of customers worldwide and is therefore exposed to the risk of bad debt losses. This potential risk is significantly reduced by down payments, letters of credit or bank guarantees. Further information on this subject is contained in section 17. “Trade receivables and other current assets” of the Notes to the Consolidated Financial Statements for 2016.
                

                Because AIXTRON operates in a number of countries throughout the world, its operating income is subject to taxation in differing jurisdictions and at differing tax rates. AIXTRON seeks to organize its affairs in a tax efficient and balanced manner, taking into account the applicable regulations of the jurisdictions in which it operates. The tax authorities in the jurisdictions in which AIXTRON operates may audit the Company’s tax returns and may disagree with the positions taken in those returns which could cause AIXTRON to incur significant legal expenses and divert the Company’s management’s attention from the operation of its business. An adverse outcome resulting from any settlement or future examination of AIXTRON’s tax returns may subject the Company to additional tax liabilities and may adversely affect its effective tax rate. An outside audit is currently being performed by the German tax authorities, which may result in supplementary tax payments.
                

                AIXTRON regularly assesses the financial strength of its banking partners and will take appropriate measures should it detect any significant deterioration or risk. 
                

				The Company’s need for cash is targeted to be generally provided for, through operating cash flows and, to a smaller extent, through grants. The Company currently commands adequate cash and cash equivalents to meet business needs and carries no debt. However, should low market demand and resulting low revenue levels persist, then this may significantly harm operating results, cash flows as well as cash reserves in the future. If AIXTRON cannot quickly and appropriately realign its business structure in line with adverse conditions, the need for additional external funding may arise. The availability of equity based funding might be negatively influenced by a low share price. If it is not possible to acquire sufficient funding, AIXTRON could be forced to delay or reduce operations. A share price decline may also result in the necessity of an impairment of assets, primarily goodwill. Please refer to Note 12. to the Company’s Consolidated Financial Statements “Intangible assets” for more information.
				

                AIXTRON’s future budgets for operating expenses, capital expenditures, operating leases and service contracts are based upon the Company’s assumptions as to the anticipated market acceptance of its products and other factors. Significant deviations of these assumption could have material adverse effects on the Company.
                



5.4.2. Company-Specific Risks, Market and Competition Risks


                Persistently subdued global economic development or currency fluctuations might adversely affect the business of AIXTRON’s customers and suppliers and thus also harm AIXTRON's business development.
                

                The semiconductor industries can be cyclical and thus highly volatile and unpredictable. Although semiconductors are used in many different products, the markets for those products are interrelated to various degrees. The industry has historically experienced sudden changes in supply and demand for semiconductors. The timing, length and severity of these industry cycles are difficult to predict. The cyclical nature of AIXTRON’s operations could be influenced and amplified by changes in economic and political conditions. As a result and in addition, persistently subdued market demand for AIXTRON’s manufacturing equipment could lead to low order intake and resulting revenue levels. AIXTRON must be able to react quickly to these changes in supply and demand. The described cyclical nature of AIXTRON’s customers or supply and demand in the addressed markets with its respective impact on market demand and business operations for AIXTRON may adversely affect AIXTRON’s results of operations, financial position, net assets and cash flows. During periods of declining or low demand for semiconductor manufacturing equipment, AIXTRON needs to be able to quickly and effectively align its cost structure with prevailing market conditions, to manage its inventory levels to reduce the possibility of future inventory write-downs resulting from obsolescence. Because a certain proportion of AIXTRON’s costs are fixed in the near term, the Company’s ability to reduce expenses quickly in response to revenue shortfalls is limited. During periods of rapid growth, AIXTRON’s business must be able to acquire and/or develop sufficient manufacturing capacity and inventory to meet customer demand, and to attract, hire, assimilate and retain a sufficient number of qualified people.
                

                AIXTRON’s business operates in a highly competitive industry characterized by increasingly rapid technological changes and changes in the competitive environment. If the Company does not develop new products in a timely manner, in response to changing market conditions or customer requirements, it may not be able to compete successfully in this market. AIXTRON’s competitive advantage and future success depend on its ability to successfully develop new products and technologies as well as new markets for its products and services. They also depend on the introduction of new products to the marketplace in a timely manner as well as the qualification of new products with its customers and the commencement and adjustment of production to meet customer demands. In addition, AIXTRON’s competitors may have greater resources than AIXTRON, or may otherwise be better suited to compete in the Company’s markets.
                

                In order to compete, AIXTRON must attract, retain and permanently motivate executives and other key employees, including those in managerial, technical, sales, marketing and support positions. Hiring and retaining qualified executives, scientists, engineers, technical staff and sales representatives are critical to the Company’s business, and competition for experienced employees in the semiconductor industry can be intense. To attract, retain and motivate qualified employees, AIXTRON relies heavily on paying cash compensations at market-competitive rates and offering additional incentives and bonus payments. If such cash payments cease to be viewed as a valuable benefit by the Company’s key employees, the Company’s ability to attract, retain and motivate its employees could be adversely impacted, which could negatively affect its results of operations and/or require AIXTRON to increase the amount it expends on cash and other forms of compensation.
                

                AIXTRON’s customer base has been in the past and may in the future be highly concentrated. Orders from a relatively limited number of customers have accounted for, and likely will continue to account for, a substantial portion of the Company’s revenues. This may lead to economic setbacks should a principal customer discontinue its relationship with AIXTRON or this may lead to customers to demand pricing and other terms less favorable to the Company. 
                

                AIXTRON’s ability to increase revenues in the future will also depend upon its ability to obtain new orders from existing or new customers. In addition, because a relatively small number of large manufacturers, many of whom are AIXTRON’s customers, dominate the industries in which they operate, it may be especially difficult for the Company to replace these customers if it loses their business. A large portion of orders in AIXTRON’s order backlog are orders from its principal customers. 
                

                AIXTRON often faces lengthy sales and qualification cycles for its products and customer contracts regularly include demanding technical or other commercial hurdles which have to be met. AIXTRON’s products are being tested to determine whether they meet customer or industry specifications. During such a qualification period, AIXTRON invests significant resources and dedicates substantial production capacity to the manufacture of these new products, prior to any commitment to purchase by the prospective customer and without generating meaningful revenues from the qualification process. Therefore in many cases the Company must invest significant time and funds with no assurance that these efforts or expenditures will result in revenues. 
                

                Revenues from AIXTRON’s systems primarily depend upon the decision of a prospective customer to invest in or upgrade its manufacturing capabilities, which typically involves a significant capital commitment by the customer. AIXTRON often experiences delays in obtaining system orders while customers evaluate and receive internal commercial or technical approvals for the purchase of these systems. 
                

                The Company’s customers may experience difficulties in acquiring manufacturing facilities or maintaining a sufficient flow of raw materials and components or accessing sufficient cash funding to achieve their increased manufacturing output. Should this occur, customers could request to delay AIXTRON system shipments. These delays may include the time necessary to plan, design or complete a new or expanded semiconductor fabrication facility. In addition, the Company’s customers could accelerate or delay expenditures, or they could cancel or reschedule their orders. As a result, AIXTRON must be able to react quickly to these changes in supply and demand. AIXTRON therefore may increase production in anticipation of customer orders that may not materialize. Failure to quickly align the Company’s cost structure and manufacturing capabilities with industry fluctuations could lead to significant losses or a failure to capitalize on increased demand opportunities. 
                

					To partly protect AIXTRON from negative effects of the cyclicality of the semiconductor markets, AIXTRON outsources a large part of its production to third party suppliers in order to manufacture and obtain many critical components. Many of these components are only available from a limited number of suppliers or, in some cases, even a single supplier. To minimize risks in this area, the company generally dual sources the supply of procured key items. Because of the cost of AIXTRON’s systems, the Company generally aims to keep its inventories at minimum levels. AIXTRON generally does not have long-term supply agreements with many of its suppliers. Consequently, the Company could experience significant price increases and/or may not be able to obtain replacement components in a timely manner or at all. In addition, AIXTRON is dependent on a limited number of suppliers. Because AIXTRON often does not account for a significant part of its suppliers’ business, the Company may not have access to sufficient capacity from these suppliers in periods of high demand. In addition, AIXTRON risks having important suppliers terminate product lines, change business focus or even go out of business. If AIXTRON were required to change any of its suppliers, it would be required to re-qualify each new supplier. AIXTRON estimates that it could take approximately six to eighteen months to replace suppliers of certain critical components used in its systems. In addition, in connection with third-party manufacturing activities, it is possible that AIXTRON may encounter unforeseen technical complexities that it may be unable to resolve, or that the resolution of such complexities may lead to delays in the implementation of these third-party manufacturing activities.
				

                AIXTRON invests significantly into R&D and AIXTRON’s future success depends highly on its ability to translate the knowledge gained from R&D into commercial success. Should this fail or be delayed, then this could result in unplanned, higher costs or the necessity to write down assets.
                

					AIXTRON’s competitors may have greater resources than AIXTRON, or may otherwise be better suited to compete in the Company’s markets, and AIXTRON’s failure to compete successfully with these companies would seriously affect its business.
				

                As a result of doing business internationally, AIXTRON must comply with different laws and regulations. New or changed domestic or foreign laws and regulations may be imposed on AIXTRON. AIXTRON is also subject to export control and economic sanctions laws, which prohibit the shipment of certain products to embargoed or sanctioned countries, governments and persons. Any change in export or import regulations, economic sanctions or related legislation, shift in the enforcement or scope of existing regulations, or change in the countries, governments, persons or technologies targeted by such regulations, could result in decreased use of AIXTRON products by, or in decreased ability to export or sell products to, existing or potential customers with international operations. Any actual or alleged failure to comply with such laws and regulations or any decreased use of AIXTRON products or limitation on the ability to export or sell products may have a material adverse effect on AIXTRON’s business, financial condition, results of operations and reputation. 
				

                AIXTRON’s operating results may fluctuate significantly, which may cause the market price of its ordinary shares to increase or decrease significantly. The timing of an order often depends on the capital expenditure budget cycle of customers. In addition, the time it takes the Company to build a product to customer specifications, which the Company refers to as the build cycle, typically ranges from three to nine months, followed in certain cases by a period of customer acceptance during which the customer evaluates the performance of AIXTRON’s system and may potentially reject such system. As a result of the build cycle and evaluation periods, the period between a customer’s initial purchase decision and revenue recognition on an order often varies widely, and variations in length of this period can cause further fluctuations in operating results.
				

                AIXTRON’s leases may be terminated or the company may be unable to renew our leases on acceptable terms; if AIXTRON decides to relocate, AIXTRON may incur additional costs if AIXTRON terminates a lease.
                

                AIXTRON’s businesses use potentially harmful chemicals and other hazardous materials. AIXTRON is subject to environmental risks and regulations which could negatively affect the Company’s results of operations and financial condition.
                

                AIXTRON is exposed to risks associated with acquisitions as it may undertake acquisitions of, or significant investments in, other businesses with complementary products, services or technologies. Acquisitions, or other significant investments, may bear risks such as difficulties in integration of the acquired company, lack of synergies, loss of key employees or customers, diversion of management’s attention from daily operations, impairment of acquired assets, worse-than-expected performance of acquired companies, increased project related and administrative expenses or declining share price.
                

                AIXTRON may also be subject of being acquired with or without the consent of management. 
AIXTRON may divest the business as a whole or parts of its business. In addition to some of the acquisition related risks, divestures could bear the risk of losses on disposal.
                

                Information security risks, data protection breaches, cyber-attacks and other related cyber security issues could disrupt AIXTRON’s internal operations, damage the Company’s brand and reputation or otherwise harm its business and may incur significant costs to minimize, mitigate or protect against those risks. Cyber security breaches could compromise the security of AIXTRON’s data and infrastructure, thereby exposing such information to unauthorized access by third parties. 
                

                AIXTRON currently is, was or may become involved in claims, pending or threatened litigation or other legal proceedings.  AIXTRON cannot exclude the possibility of infringing upon intellectual property rights of third parties or of itself being held liable for allegedly infringing upon third party intellectual property rights or to breach applicable securities or other laws. The outcome of current, pending and threatened litigation proceedings cannot be predicted with any certainty. Decisions of courts or other authorities as well as settlements may cause significant expenses. AIXTRON may also have to allocate significant Management time and attention while in all cases the company may not be able to prevail in its legal actions.
For more details to the previously mentioned litigation risk, please refer to “3. Report on Post-Balance Sheet Date Events” included in this report.
                

                AIXTRON voluntarily delisted its ADSs from NASDAQ, effective January 9, 2017, and terminated its ADR program, effective February 16, 2017. On January 9, 2017, the Company filed a certification on Form 15F with the SEC to deregister. Under the SEC rules, AIXTRON’s SEC reporting obligations under the Exchange Act were immediately suspended upon the filing of the Form 15F and the deregistration is expected to become effective 90 days after the filing of the Form 15F which would be on or about April 9, 2017. Delisting, deregistration and suspending its SEC reporting obligations in the US could negatively affect the liquidity and trading prices of its outstanding ADSs and ordinary shares.
                





5.5. Overall Statement to the Risk Situation


        Neither within fiscal year 2016 nor at the time of writing has the Executive Board identified any risks that could jeopardize the Company’s continued existence.
        


6. Report on Expected Developments

6.1. Future Market Environment and Opportunities


       
In their World Economic Outlook Update as of January 2016, the IMF forecasts global growth to increase to 3.4% in 2017 and 3.6% in 2018. Global growth is expected to be supported by economic activity to pick up in pace especially in emerging market and developing economies. At this point in time, AIXTRON does not expect any significant influence on its business development from the global economic environment. However, the possibility of further setbacks to the global economy cannot be ruled out.
        

        Gartner Dataquest estimated (Forecast: Semiconductor Manufacturing Equipment, Worldwide, 4Q16 Update, December 2016) that semiconductor capital spending in 2016 increased to USD 68 billion. In the same report, Gartner forecasts further growth in semiconductor capital spending to USD 70 billion  in 2017 and then growing further to USD 73 billion in 2018 (Forecast: Semiconductor Manufacturing Equipment, Worldwide, 4Q16 Update).
        

       In Wafer Fab equipment, the segment where AIXTRON competes, Gartner expects an increase in market size from USD 34 billion in 2016 to USD 36 billion in 2017, growing further to 36.2 billion in 2018.
        

        The demand will primarily depend on the execution of strategic investments and capacity expansion plans. The market will need to increase manufacturing capacity driven by higher demand for optoelectronic applications and wide band gap devices for power management. 
        

        According to Gartner, the total silicon power transistor market is expected to grow from USD 8.9 billion to 10.2 billion between 2013 and 2018 (Gartner, April 2014). According to a study from IHS, the market for SiC and GaN Power Electronics devices, which can be produced using AIXTRON equipment, is estimated to generate a volume of USD 1.7 billion by 2021. Estimates of an accessible market size for the respective production equipment are based on internal assessments and are therefore not meaningful at this point in time.
        

       AIXTRON Management believes that the markets AIXTRON addresses with its organic large area OVPD and PVPD deposition technologies as well as with its PECVD thin film encapsulation technology bear growth potential in the mid- to long-term driven by increasing demand for OLED displays. The market volume for OLED devices including OLED TVs are expected by IHS in its OLED Shipment and Forecast Report to grow from approximately USD 14 billion in 2015 to approximately USD 27 billion in 2019. OLED TV panel shipments are expected to increase from 0.9 million shipped units in 2016 to 6.8 million shipped units in 2021 (Display Supply Chain Consultants, January 2017). However, as with all emerging technologies, there is an element of risk associated with the timing of AIXTRON’s technology being adopted by the market.
        

        AIXTRON’s PECVD technology for the production of carbon nanostructures continues to contribute positively to total revenues but due to its R&D focus, the revenue volumes are comparably low and are expected to remain on low levels in the short term.
        

        Estimates of an accessible OLED or Carbon Nanostructure equipment market size are based on internal assessments and are therefore not disclosed. 
		

        The total ALD market of which AIXTRON addresses only a specific niche with its system technologies, was estimated by Gartner Dataquest in its latest forecast of December 2016 (Forecast: Semiconductor Manufacturing Equipment, Worldwide, 4Q16 Update) to be valued at USD 1,028 million for 2016 (2017e: USD 1,129 million; 2018e: USD 1,208 million). Influenced by the production qualification of AIXTRON's QXP tool by two major Asian memory chip manufacturers and by solid demand for NAND-flash memory devices, AIXTRON sees further growth potential with this technology.
		

        In all of its addressed markets, AIXTRON expects future growth as AIXTRON technologies to manufacture Semiconductor devices are the enabling technologies for emerging Megatrends such as Big Data, Cloud Computing, 5G Mobile Networks, Electric Vehicles, Autonomous Driving or highly efficient Energy Storage. 
        



6.2. Expected Results of Operations and Financial Position


    	Following the termination of the planned takeover transaction by a Chinese investor in December 2016, AIXTRON now is focusing on the optimal structure of its technology portfolio as part of its corporate strategy. Against this background, AIXTRON is currently pursuing different options in order to successfully reduce required upfront expenses for the development of future technologies. These options include looking for partners, joint ventures or other alternatives. All these measures are targeted to enable a sustainable return to profitability and to report a positive EBIT for full year 2018.
    	 

       For Memory and Logic applications, Management expects a significant contribution again in 2017 due to solid growth of NAND-flash memory applications. However, demand development for production equipment for DRAM memory applications is uncertain due to a cautious investment behavior in the DRAM end markets. Investments for TFOS will be aligned with customers’ requirements.
		
        Management sees near- to mid-term potential for MOCVD equipment from a continuing penetration of wide band gap GaN- and SiC-based power devices. 
        

			In terms of MOCVD equipment for the manufacturing of optoelectronic devices such as red/orange/yellow and specialty LEDs as well as photonics for lasers and sensor applications, Management expects an improving demand. 
		

			Based on the existing business structure and the assessment on AIXTRON’s current order situation with the internal budget rate of USD/EUR 1.10, Management expects for fiscal year 2017 to achieve revenues and an order intake between EUR 180 million and 210 million. 
		

        Due to planned additional upfront expenses for development of future technologies and based on the existing structure, AIXTRON expects to achieve lower EBITDA, EBIT and net result for fiscal year 2017. As previously discussed, AIXTRON is pursuing the options mentioned above in order to return to sustainable profitability. Depending on the execution of above mentioned strategy with its various options and due to the uncertainty of its impact on profit, Management is currently not in the position to offer guidance on EBITDA, EBIT and net result for fiscal year 2017. Management will provide an update on the 2017 earnings outlook as the above mentioned plans materialize.
        

		Influenced by the significant reimbursement of an advance payment in Q1/2016 which will not repeat, AIXTRON expects a further improvement of the free cash flow in 2017.
		

        In addition to above mentioned activities, Management will continue to focus on costs, margin contributions and the allocation of funds and will continuously review the performance and prospects of the Companies’ product portfolio.
        

        As in previous years, Management expects that the Company does not require any external bank debt financing in 2017. Furthermore, the Company will retain its strong equity base also in the foreseeable future.
        



6.3. Overall Statement on the Future Development


        Due to the Companies’ proven ability to develop and market best-in-class enabling deposition equipment for a variety of markets, Management continues to believe in the positive short- mid- and long-term outlook for AIXTRON and its targeted markets.
        

        As at December 31, 2016, AIXTRON had no binding agreements for participation financing, company acquisition or transfers of parts of the Company.
        



7. Information concerning section 315 (4) of the German Commercial Code (HGB) on takeovers

The Company’s stated share capital as of December 31, 2016 amounted to EUR 112,804,105 (December 31, 2015: EUR 112,720,355; December 31, 2014: EUR 112,694,555) divided into 112,804,105 registered shares with a proportional interest in the share capital of EUR 1.00 per no-par value registered share. Each no-par value share represents the proportionate share in AIXTRON’s stated share capital and carries one vote at the Company’s annual shareholders’ meeting. All registered shares are fully paid in. 


The Company has issued a share certificate representing multiples of shares (global share); shareholders do not have the right to the issue of a share certificate representing their share(s). There are no voting or transfer restrictions on AIXTRON’s registered shares that are related to the Company’s Articles of Association. There are no classes of securities endowed with special control rights, nor are there any provisions for control of voting rights, if employees participate in the share capital without directly exercising their voting rights. 


Additional funding needs could be covered by the following additional capital as authorized by the annual shareholders’ meeting:




Funding Sources
2016
Approved
Expiry
2015
2014
2016-2015

(EUR or number of shares)
31-Dec
since
Date
31-Dec
31-Dec
 

Issued shares
112,804,105
--
--
112,720,355
112,694,555
83,750

Authorized Capital 2014 - Capital increase for cash or contribution in kind with or without existing shareholders' preemptive rights
45,883,905
14.05.2014
13.05.2019
45,883,905
45,883,905
0

Authorized Capital 2012 - Capital increase for cash with existing shareholders' preemptive rights
10,422,817
16.05.2012
15.05.2017
10,422,817
10,422,817
0
Authorized Capital 2011 - Capital increase for cash or contribution in kind with or without existing shareholders' preemptive rights

--
--
cancelled
cancelled

Conditional Capital I 2012 - Authorization to potentially issue bonds with warrants and/or convertible bonds in future
40,715,810
16.05.2012
15.05.2017
40,715,810
40,715,810
0
Conditional Capital II 2012 - Stock Options Program 2012
4,208,726
16.05.2012
15.05.2017
4,208,726
4,208,726
0
Conditional Capital II 2007 - Stock Options Program 2007
2,809,738
22.05.2007
31.12.2018
2,872,638
2,890,613
-62,900
Conditional Capital 4 - Stock Options Program 2002
expired
22.05.2002
31.12.2016
463,888
471,713
-463,888
Conditional Capital 2 - Stock Options Program 1999
1,926,005
26.05.1999
31.12.2017
1,926,005
1,926,005
0




In accordance with section 71 (1) no. 8 German Corporations Act, AktG, the Company is authorized until May 13, 2019, with the approval of the Supervisory Board, to purchase its own shares representing an amount of up to EUR 11,262,429 of the share capital. This authorization may not be used by the Company for the purpose of trading in own shares. The authorization may be exercised in full, or in part, once, or on several occasions by the Company. The shares may be purchased (1) on the stock market or (2) by way of a public offer to all shareholders made by the Company or (3) by way of a public invitation to submit offers for sale.


Any amendment to the Articles of Association related to capital measures requires a 75% majority of the share capital represented at the Annual General Meeting (Article 59 SE Regulation, SE-VO; §179 German Corporations Act, AktG). Other amendments to the Articles of Association require a majority of two thirds of the votes cast or, if at least one half of the share capital is represented, a simple majority of the votes cast.


As of December 31, 2016, about 17% of AIXTRON shares were held by private individuals, with around 83% held by institutional investors. The largest AIXTRON institutional shareholder was Argonaut Capital Partners LLP (Edinburgh, UK) with around 8% holdings in AIXTRON stock. 100 % of the shares were considered as free float according to Deutsche Börse’s definition.


The Supervisory Board appoints and removes from office the members of the Executive Board, who may serve for a maximum term of six years before being reappointed.


If a change of control situation exists, the individual members of the Executive Board are entitled to terminate their service relationship with AIXTRON with a notice period of three months to the end of the month and to resign from their post on the termination date. Upon termination of the services as a result of a change of control, such member of the Executive Board will receive a severance pay in an amount equal to the fixed and variable compensation expected to be owed by the Company for the remaining term of the service contract, however, not exceeding an amount equal to twice the annual compensation. A change of control situation exists if a third party or a group of third parties who contractually combine their shares in order to act subsequently as a third party, directly or indirectly hold more than 50% of the Company’s authorized capital. Apart from the above mentioned, there are no further changes of control provisions.

 8. Declaration on Corporate Governance according to § 315 para 5 of the German Commercial Code (HGB)

The Declaration on Corporate Governance including the Corporate Governance Report are available on the Company's homepage under www.aixtron.com/de/investoren/corporate-governance/.

9. Responsibility Statement

Responsibility Statement required by section 37y no. 1 of the Wertpapierhandelsgesetz (WpHG – German Securities Trading Act) in conjunction with sections 297(2) sentence 4 and 315(1) sentence 6 of the Handelsgesetzbuch (HGB – German Commercial Code) for the Consolidated Financial Statements:


“To the best of our knowledge, and in accordance with the applicable reporting principles, the Consolidated Financial Statements give a true and fair view of the assets, liabilities, financial position and profit or loss of the Group, and the Group Management Report includes a fair review of the development and performance of the business and the position of the Group, together with a description of the material opportunities and risks associated with the expected development of the Group.”


Herzogenrath, February 22, 2017
    


AIXTRON SE
    


Executive Board
    





 



 
 
 


Martin Goetzeler 
            Chief Executive Officer 
 
Dr. Bernd Schulte 
            Chief Operating Officer 


 
 
 








▲ top  / 
	
		◄ back
	
 /
	
		next ►








AIXTRON SE © 2017
|
Contact
|
Imprint
|
Sitemap













Aixtron AG, ADR (AIXG)
















































































Home
Downloads
Articles

Roen Financial Report Blog
Alternative Energy Articles
Mentions


Alt Energy

ENERGY EFFICIENCY
ENVIRONMENTAL
FUEL ALTERNATIVES
SMART GRID
SOLAR ENERGY
WIND ENERGY
Alternative Energy Investing Resources


Company Profiles

Sample Company Profiles
Energy Efficiency
Environmental
Fuel Alternatives
Smart Grid
Solar Energy
Wind Energy
Large Cap Legacy

United Technologies Corp (UTX)
Toyota Motor Corporation (ADR) (TM)
Oracle Corporation (ORCL)
RWE AG (ADR) (RWEOY)
SAP AG (ADR) (SAP)
Siemens AG (SI)
Union Pacific Corp (UNP)
Waste Management Inc (WM)
Xcel Energy Inc. (XEL)
3M Company (MMM)
Parker-Hannifin Corp. (PH)
Companhia de Saneamento Basico (SBS)


Small Cap Appreciation

BTU International, Inc. (BTUI)
Brocade Communications, Inc. (BRCD)
Carlisle Companies Inc (CSL)
Corning Inc (GLW)
EnerNOC, Inc. (ENOC)
Fuel Systems Solutions, Inc. (FSYS)
Kaydon, Corp. (KDN)
MasTec, Inc. (MTZ)
Nalco Holding Company (NLC)
Power Integrations Inc (POWI)
Thor Industries Inc (THO)
Valmont Industries Inc (VMI)
Varien Semiconductor Equipment Associates Inc (VSEA)
General Cable Corporation (BGC)
Acuity Brands, Inc. (AYI)
Energy Recovery, Inc. (ERII)
CREE Inc. (CREE)
Itron, Inc. (ITRI)
IXYS, Corp. (IXYS)
SPX Corp (SPW)
The Timken Company (TKR)
Wabtec Corp (WAB)
Casella Waste Systems Inc. (CWST)
Digi International, Inc. (DGII)
Advanced Energy Industries (AEIS)
Broadwind Energy, Inc. (BWEN)
China BAK Battery, Inc. (CBAK)
Cooper Industries plc (CBE)
Calgon Carbon Corporation (CCC)
Codexis, Inc. (CDXS)
China Hydroelectric Corporation (CHC)
CLARCOR, Inc. (CLC)
Clean Harbors, Inc. (CLH)
Donaldson Company, Inc. (DCI)
Comverge, Inc. (COMV)
Capstone Turbine Corp. (CPST)
CSX Corp. (CSX)
US Ecology, Inc. (ECOL)
Ecology and Environment (EEI)
Elster Group SE ADR (ELT)
EMCORE Corporation (EMKR)
EnerSys (ENS)
ESCO Technologies, Inc. (ESE)
Fairchild Semiconductor Intl. (FCS)
Franklin Electric Co. (FELE)
GT Advanced Technologies, Inc. (GTAT)
SmartHeat, Inc. (HEAT)
Headwaters, Inc. (HW)
Hexcel, Corp. (HXL)
Industrial Services of America (IDSA)
Interface, Inc. (IFSIA)
Imperial Resources, Inc. (IPRC)
International Rectifier, Corp. (IRF)
ITC Holding, Corps. (ITC)
Jinpan International Limited (JST)
Kadant, Inc. (KAI)
Kandi Technologies Corp (KNDI)
LKQ, Corp. (LKQ)
Linear Technology Corporation (LLTC)
Liberty Property Trust (LPT)
LSI Industries, Inc. (LYTS)
Metalico, Inc. (MEA)
Mistras Group, Inc. (MG)
Met-Pro, Corp. (MPR)
Microsemi Corporation (MSCC)
Maxwell Technologies Inc. (MXWL)
MYR Group, Inc. (MYRG)
Nexxus Lighting, Inc. (NEXS)
NRG Energy Inc. (NRG)
Norfolk Southern Corp. (NSC)
O2Micro International Limited, ADR (OIIM)
ON Semiconductor Corp. (ONNN)
Otter Tail Corporation (OTTR)
Overseas Shipholding Group Inc. (OSG)
Universal Display Corporation (PANL)
Pike Electric Corp. (PIKE)
Polycom, Inc. (PLCM)
Pall Corp. (PLL)
Plug Power Inc. (PLUG)
Polypore International, Inc. (PPO)
Quanta Services, Inc. (PWR)
Rubicon Technology, Inc. (RBCN)
Rock-Tenn Co. (RKT)
Rockwell Automation (ROK)
Roper Industries, Inc. (ROP)
Reliance Steel & Aluminum Co (RS)
Rentech Inc. (RTK)
Sociedad Quimica y Minera (ADR) (SQM)
Stericycle Inc. (SRCL)
Syntroleum Corp (SYNM)
Trimble Navigation Limited (TRMB)
Trinity Industries, Inc. (TRN)
Tetra Tech, Inc. (TTEK)
Ultralife Corp (ULBI)
Vicor Corp (VICR)
Veeco Instruments Inc. (VECO)
WABCO Holdings Inc (WBC)
WESCO International, Inc. (WCC)
Waste Connections, Inc. (WCN)
Woodward, Inc (WWD)
Xilinx, Inc. (XLNX)
Zoltek Companies, Inc. (ZOLT)
Aventine Renewable Energy (AVRW)
Sustainable Enviromental Technologies Corp. (SETS)
Power One Inc. (PWER)
Exelon Corp. (EXC)
Ecolab Inc. (ECL)
Revolution Lighting Technologies Inc. (RVLT)
Interface, Inc. (TILE)
Kyocera Corp. ADR (KYO)
Sharp Corp. ADR (SHCAY)
Raven Industries Inc. (RAVN)
Cummins Inc. (CMI)
Verenium Corp (VRNM)
Sempra Energy (SRE)
LG Display Co Ltd. (ADR) (LPL)
CECO Environmental Corp. (CECE)
Universal Display Corporation (OLED)
Control4 Corp (CTRL)
NRG Yield Inc (NYLD)
Brookfield Asset Management Inc (BAM)
MiX Telematics Ltd (MIXT)
Albemarle Corporation (ALB)
Nextera Energy Partners LP (NEP)
TransAlta Corporation (USA) (TAC)
Praxair, Inc (PX)
Danaher Corporation (DHR)
Rogers Corporation (ROG)
Infineon Technologies AG (ADR) (IFNNY)
Flextronics International Ltd (FLEX)


Green Investment Pure Play

Ballard Power Systems, Inc. (BLDP)
BioFuel Energy Corp. (BIOF)
Covanta Holding Corp (CVA)
First Solar, Inc (FSLR)
Mesa Energy Holdings, Inc (MSEH)
PowerSecure International, Inc (POWR)
Telvent GIT SA (TLVT)
Trina Solar Limited ADR (TSL)
Ecotality, Inc. (ECTY)
ReneSola Ltd. ADR (SOL)
Tesla Motors Inc. (TSLA)
Consolidated Water Co. Ltd. (CWCO)
China Technology Development Group (CTDC)
GreenHunter Energy, Inc. (GRH)
Cereplast, Inc. (CERP)
Clean Energy Fuels Corp. (CLNE)
Converted Organics, Inc. (COIND.PK)
Canadian Solar, Inc. (CSIQ)
China Sunergy Co., Ltd. ADR (CSUN)
Darling Ingredients Inc (DAR)
Daqo New Energy Corp. (DQ)
DayStar Technologies Inc. (DSTI)
Energy Focus, Inc. (EFOI)
Echelon Corporation (ELON)
Enova Systems, Inc. (ENA)
Energy Conversion Devices, Inc. (ENER)
Evergreen Solar, Inc. (ESLRQ)
FuelCell Energy, Inc. (FCEL)
Fuel Tech, Inc. (FTEK)
Gevo, Inc. (GEVO)
Green Plains Renewal Energy Inc. (GPRE)
Gushan Environmental Energy, Ltd. (GU)
Hoku Corporation (HOKU)
Hanwha SolarOne Company (HSOL)
JA Solar Holdings Co., Ltd. (JASO)
JinkoSolar Holding Co., Ltd. (JKS)
LDK Solar Co., Ltd. (LDK)
SemiLEDs Corporation (LEDS)
Lime Energy Co. (LIME)
Metabolix, Inc. (MBLX)
China Ming Yang Wind Power Group, Ltd. (MY)
Quantum Fuel Systems Technology (QTWW)
Ormat Technologies, Inc. (ORA)
Pacific Ethanol, Inc. (PEIX)
Renewable Energy Group Inc (REGI)
Real Goods Solar, Inc. (RGSE)
SatCon Technology Corp (SATC)
Sino Clean Energy Inc. (SCEI)
Schnitzer Steel Industries (SCHN)
SunPower Corp (SPWR)
Suntech Power Holdings Co., Lt (STP)
STR Holdings, Inc. (STRI)
UQM Technologies, Inc. (UQM)
Valence Technology, Inc. (VLNC)
Andalay Solar Inc (WEST)
Sunedison Inc. (SUNE)
Western Wind Energy Corp (WND.V)
Yingli Green Energy Hold. Co. (YGE)
Clenergen Corporation (CRGE)
Ecosphere Technologies, Inc. (ESPH)
First American Scientific Corp. (FASC)
Cheniere Energy, Inc. (LNG)
Mass Megawatts Wind Power (MMMW)
Nevada Geothermal Power, INC (NGLPF)
Power REIT (PW)
SolarCity Corp. (SCTY)
Enphase Energy Inc. (ENPH)
Power Solutions International (PSIX)
MEMC Electronic Materials Inc (WFR)
Silver Spring Networks Inc (SSNI)
Hannon Armstrong Sustainable Infrastructure (HASI)
Pattern Energy Group Inc (PEGI)
Opower Inc (OPWR)
Envision Solar International (EVSI)
SunOpta, Inc (STKL)
Eco-Shift Power Corp (ECOP)
Vivint Solar Inc (VSLR)
Xylem Inc (XYL)
Abengoa Yield PLC (ABY)
TerraForm Power Inc (TERP)
Solaredge Technologies Inc (SEDG)
Veolia Environnement VE SA (VEOEY)
Hanwha Q Cells (HQCL)


($)Top Renewable Energy Stocks

($)Paradigm Portfolio
($)Top Pure Play Stocks




MF/ETF
Premium

($) Paradigm Portfolio
($) Top Pure Play Stocks
($) Green Dividend Yield Portfolio
Member Services


About

Roen Financial Report
User Guide

User Guide: Home Page
User Guide: Company Profiles
User Guide: Classifying Alternative Energy Companies
User Guide: Subscriber Only Areas
User Guide: Articles
User Guide: How Investments are Picked


Harris Roen
Swiftwood Press
Paradigm Portfolio
How is Fair Value Determined?
Investment Groups
Whitelisting Instructions
Contact






















Aixtron AG, ADR (AIXG)


empty text




Type
Semiconductors


Product or Service
Silicon, Organic and Compound Semiconductors, Carbon Nanotubes and Semicunducting Nanofiber


Application
 Components for LED lighting and power efficiency


Location
Aachen, Germany


Web Address
www.aixtron.com





Aixtron is a German company that provides high-tech equipment to the semiconductor industry. The Company’s technology is used by a diverse range of customers for components that are used in display technology, data storage, signals, lighting, fiber optics, wireless and cell applications.




***STOCK ALERT***

Date
Event
More Info


 9/26/2014
Aixtron receives one of the largest orders for LED lighting in its history. AIXG jumps 14% on the news on the largest one-day volume since January. There still may be upside from here, since AIXG remains 68% below its highs of 2011.
Press release


 7/31/2014
Aixtron AG (ADR) offers a mixed earnings report. Revenues and profits are up, but net income and EPS are flat. Revenues for the fiscal year are projected to be similar to 2013, and the company expects to turn profitable.  AIXG moves up 7% in two days, but the stock is still down 68% from its high in 2011.
Reuters




 

Flash Player 9 or higher is required to view the chartClick here to download Flash Player nowView the full AIXG chart at Wikinvest
IMPORTANT INFORMATION
Individuals involved with the Roen Financial Report and Swiftwood Press LLC do not own or control shares of any companies mentioned in this article. Any advice and/or recommendations made in this article are of a general nature and are not to be considered specific investment advice. Individuals should seek advice from their investment professional before making any important financial decisions. See Terms of Use for more information.
*Hypothetical gain from portfolio recommendations from inception. It should not be assumed that recommendations made in the future will be profitable or will equal the performance of the securities contained within this list. Always consult your financial professional before investing.
























Loading























Company Ratings: AIXG



Fair Value Meter



Industry Rank

Energy Efficiency
5



Speculative Level

Very high























Like Us on Facebook













































Browse SCA Companies



Glossary
Small Cap Appreciation
(SCA)
Companies
A |B |C |D |E |F |G |H |I 

|J |K |L |M |N |O |P |Q |R 

|S |T |U |V |W |X |Y |Z

Large Cap Legacy
Green Investment Pure Play
All Companies


A


(A) Agilent Technologies

(ABAT) Advanced Battery Technologies Inc 

(ACPW) Active Power, Inc.

(ADES) ADA-ES, Inc.

(ADSK) Autodesk, Inc.

(AEIS) Advanced Energy Industries

(AIXG) Aixtron AG (ADR)

(ALTI) Altair Nanotechnologies, Inc.

(ANAD) ANADIGICS, Inc.

(ANDE) The Andersons, Inc.

(ANSS) ANSYS, Inc.

(AOS) A. O. Smith Corp.

(APWR) A-Power Energy Generation Systems

(ASYS) Amtech Systems, Inc.

(AVAV) AeroVironment, Inc.

(AVRW) Aventine Renewable Energy 

(AVX) AVX Corp 

(AYI) Acuity Brands, Inc.

(AZZ) AZZ Inc.

Top of Page 
B


(BGC) General Cable Corporation

(BMI) Badger Meter, Inc.

(BRCD) Brocade Communications Inc.

(BTUI) BTU International, Inc.

(BWA) BorgWarner Inc.

(BWEN) Broadwind Energy Inc.

Top of Page 
C


(CBAK) China BAK Battery Inc.

(CBE) Cooper Industries plc

(CBEH) China Integrated Energy, Inc.

(CCC) Calgon Carbon Corporation

(CDXS) Codexis, Inc.
(CECE) CECO Environmental Corp.

(CHC) China Hydroelectric Corporation

(CLC) CLARCOR Inc.

(CLH) Clean Harbors Inc

(CMI) Cummins Inc.

(COMV) Comverge, Inc.

(CPST) Capstone Turbine Corp

(CREE) Cree, Inc.

(CREG) China Recycling Energy Corp.

(CSL) Carlisle Companies Inc 

(CSX) CSX Corp

(CWST) Casella Waste Systems Inc.
(CTRL) Control4 Corp

Top of Page 
D


(DCI) Donaldson Company, Inc.

(DGII) Digi International Inc.

Top of Page 
E


(ECL) Ecolab Inc.

(ECOL) US Ecology Inc.

(EEI) Ecology and Environment 

(ELT) Elster Group SE ADR

(EMKR) EMCORE Corporation

(ENS) EnerSys

(ENOC) EnerNOC, Inc.

(ERII) Energy Recovery, Inc.

(ESE) ESE

(EXC) Exelon Corp.

Top of Page 
F


(FCS) Fairchild Semiconductor International

(FELE) Franklin Electric Co
(FSYS) Fuel Systems Solutions Inc 

Top of Page 
G


(GLW) Corning Inc 

(GTAT) GT Advanced Technologies Inc

Top of Page 
H


(HP) Helmerich & Payne, Inc.

(HW) Headwaters Inc 

(HXL) Hexcel Corp

Top of Page 
I


(IDSA) Industrial Services of America

(IFSIA) Interface, Inc.

(IPRC) Imperial Resources, Inc.

(IRF) International Rectifier Corp

(ITC) ITC Holding Corps

(ITRI) Itron, Inc.

(IXYS) IXYS Corp 

Top of Page 
J


(JST) Jinpan International Limited

Top of Page 
K


(KAI) Kadant Inc.

(KDN) Kaydon Corp 

(KNDI) Kandi Technolgies Corp.

(KYO) Kyocera Corp. ADR

Top of Page 
L


(LKQX) LKQ Corp.

(LLTC) Linear Technology Corporation
(LPL) LG Display Co Ltd. (ADR)

(LPT) Liberty Property Trust

(LYTS) LSI Industries, Inc.

Top of Page 
M


(MEA) Metalico, Inc.
(MIXT) MiX Telematics Ltd

(MG) Mistras Group, Inc.

(MPR) Met-Pro Corp

(MSCC) Microsemi Corporation

(MSEH) Mesa Energy Holdings, Inc.

(MTZ) MasTec Inc 

(MXWL) Maxwell Technologies Inc.

(MYRG) MYR Group Inc.

Top of Page 
N


(NEXS) Nexxus Lighting, Inc.

(NLC) Nalco Holding Company

(NRG) NRG Energy, Inc.

(NSC) Norfolk Southern Corp 
(NYLD) NRG Yield Inc

Top of Page 
O


(OIIM) O2Micro International Limited (ADR)
(OLED) Universal Display Corporation

(ONNN) ON Semiconductor Corp. (ONNN)

(OSG) Overseas Shipholding Group Inc 

(OTTR) Otter Tail Corporation

Top of Page 
P


(PANL) Universal Display Corporation

(PIKE) Pike Electric Corp

(PLCM) Polycom, Inc.

(PLL) Pall Corp

(PLUG) Plug Power Inc.

(POWI) Power Integrations Inc 

(PPO) Polypore International, Inc.

(PWER) Power One Inc 

(PWR) Quanta Services, Inc.

Top of Page 
Q
 
Top of Page 
R


(RAVN) Raven Industries Inc.

(RBCN) Rubicon Technology, Inc.

(RKT) Rock-Tenn Co.

(ROK) Rockwell Automation

(ROP) Roper Industries, Inc.

(RS) Reliance Steel & Aluminum Co 

(RTK) Rentech Inc.

(RVLT) Revolution Lighting Technologies Inc.

Top of Page 
S


(SETS) Sustainable Enviromental Technologies Corp.

(SHCAY) Sharp Corp. ADR

(SPW) SPX Corp

(SQM) Sociedad Quimica y Minera (ADR)

(SRCL) Stericycle Inc.
(SRE) Sempra Energy 

(SYNM) Syntroleum Corp

Top of Page 
T


(THO) Thor Industries Inc 

(TILE) Interface, Inc.

(TKR) Timken Company, The

(TRMB) Trimble Navigation Limited

(TRN) Trinity Industries, Inc.

(TTEK) Tetra Tech, Inc.

Top of Page 
U


(ULBI) Ultralife Corp

Top of Page 
V


(VECO) Veeco Instruments Inc.

(VICR) Vicor Corp

(VMI) Valmont Industries Inc 

(VRNM) Verenium Corporation

(VSEA) Varian Semiconductor Equip Assoc

Top of Page 
W


(WAB) Wabtec Corp

(WBC) WABCO Holdings Inc 

(WCC) WESCO International, Inc.

(WCN) Waste Connections, Inc.

(WWD) Woodward, Inc

Top of Page 
X


(XLNX) Xilinx, Inc.

Top of Page 
Y


 
Top of Page 
Z


(ZOLT) Zoltek Companies, Inc.

Top of Page 


































Swiftwood Press LLC |82 Church Street, Suite 303 | Burlington, VT 05401Contact Us | Terms of Use |Your privacy is important to us, please read our Privacy StatementIf you have any concerns please do not hesitate to contact us at cservice@swiftwood.comCopyright © 2014 Swiftwood Press. All Rights Reserved.































		 

Subscribe to the Roen Financial Report today
and get two free reports!

- Access to members-only areas of the website.
- Up-to-date stock reports.
- Alternative energy mutual fund & ETF rankings.
- Satisfaction Guaranteed!

SUBSCRIBE NOW




